OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  DTV  TRANSITION 

S.  HRG.  110–760 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

APRIL  8,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

44–299 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2009 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 8, 2008  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Wicker  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Baker, Meredith Attwell, Acting Assistant Secretary for Communications and 
Information, National Telecommunications and Information Administration, 
Department of Commerce  ....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Martin, Hon. Kevin J., Chairman, Federal Communications Commission 

APPENDIX 

Cantwell, Hon. Maria, U.S. Senator from Washington, prepared statement  .....
Kerry, Hon. John F., U.S. Senator from Massachusetts, prepared statement  ...
Nelson, Hon. Bill, U.S. Senator from Florida, prepared statement  .....................
Response to written questions submitted to Meredith Attwell Baker by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Kay Bailey Hutchison  .............................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
...............................................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson 

Response to written questions submitted to Hon. Kevin J. Martin by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Kay Bailey Hutchison  .............................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
..........................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry 
Hon. Bill Nelson 
...............................................................................................

Page 
1 
37 
3 
1 
6 
33 
29 
5 
2 
4 
42 
36 

19 
21 
7 
11 

48 
47 
47 

59 
61 
56 
57 

53 
56 
49 
50 
52 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  DTV  TRANSITION 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  8,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. Our nation relies on television for news, informa-
tion,  and  entertainment.  With  February  17,  2009  only  10  months 
away, too many Americans remain in the dark about what the dig-
ital  television  transition  means.  A  recent  Consumer  Union  survey 
found  that  74  percent  of  consumers  who  know  about  DTV  transi-
tion  have  major  misconceptions  about  what  it  means.  The  same 
survey  found  that  a  staggering  73  percent  were  unaware  of  the 
government  program  created  to  offset  the  cost  of  purchasing  con-
verter  boxes.  And  the  members  of  this  Committee  find  these  num-
bers to be very troubling. 

The  FCC  and  the  NTIA  have  been  charged  with  ensuring  that 
the  DTV  transition  proceeds  smoothly.  I  think  all  of  us  agree  that 
the stakes are very high, and it is imperative that these two agen-
cies make a success of this transition, as their number one priority. 
I  realize  there  are  a  number  of  important  challenges  facing  the 
FCC, including the question on how to proceed with the auction of 
the  D  Block.  We  have  deep  reservations  about  the  FCC  spending 
its limited time and resources in media areas unrelated to the tran-
sition.  Meanwhile,  the  NTIA  is  challenged  by  the  Administration’s 
push  for  a  third  leadership  change  in  the  agency  within  the  past 
year. 

And  so  I  urge  both  agencies  to  keep  an  eye  on  what  is  most 
pressing, and to proceed cautiously when you choose to spend time 
on what is not. To ensure that you focus on the task at hand, I ask 
that both the FCC and the NTIA provide the members of this Com-
mittee  with  a  monthly  status  report  regarding  the  status  of  this 
transition, as well as your continuing challenges. I request that you 
work with our staff to coordinate the details. 

A few moments ago, I was chatting with a young lady about this 
transition,  and  she  was  telling  me  about  her  grandmother.  And  I 
can  imagine  grandmothers  waking  up  the  morning  of  the  17th, 
turning  on  their  TV  set,  and  all  of  a  sudden  nothing  appears.  It 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

would be a sad day for all of us. So I think we should try our very 
best, very best. 

May I ask my Vice Chairman. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank 
you  for  holding  the  hearing.  It’s  nice  to  see  Chairman  Martin  and 
Secretary  Baker  appear  here  today.  Our  nation  faces  an  historic 
change  in  less  than  1  year,  and  Americans  will  reap  the  benefits 
of  this  transition,  in  my  judgment.  First,  public  safety  will  receive 
an  additional  24  megahertz.  Second,  public  safety  will  also  receive 
critical  funding  from  the  proceeds  of  the  digital  transition.  And 
third,  the  viewers  will  enjoy  DVD-quality  signals  and  increased 
programming through multi-casting. 

It’s crucial that government officials, industry, and consumer ad-
vocacy  groups  maintain  a  continuous  drumbeat  throughout  this 
next  year  in  outreach  efforts.  I  am  particularly  concerned  that  el-
derly  viewers  and  rural  and  remote  residents  are  adequately  in-
formed.  Our  Alaska  residents  in  villages  are  the  most  remote  peo-
ple  in  this  country,  and  they  have  the  same  right  to  receive  infor-
mation  about  the  transition  as  Americans  who  live  in  large  cities. 
In  that  view,  my  office  has  been  trying  to  help  out  by  working 
with  local  groups  such  as  our  broadcasters,  AARP  representatives, 
Native groups, senior centers, and the Postal Service to ensure that 
the message about this converter box program gets out to all Alas-
kans.  We  have  also  made  the  converter  box  applications  available 
through my website and through my district offices in Alaska. 

But,  there  are  particular  issues  that  need  the  attention,  I  think, 
of our witnesses. I’m pleased that they would come and be with us 
today. I hope to learn about several problems. First, it’s my under-
standing  that  the  current  coupon  program  does  not  allow  appli-
cants  to  use  a  post  office  box  address  on  their  converter  box  appli-
cation. That’s a particular concern to residents of our state because, 
in  many  instances,  a  post  office  box  is  the  only  address  that  they 
have. 

Second,  many  are  concerned  that  there  are  only  a  limited  num-
ber of converter box models. Seven I am told of the 66 certified con-
verter  boxes  have  an  ‘‘analog’’  pass-through  capability,  which  is  a 
capability  that’s  important  in  areas  that  receive  broadcasting  from 
low-power stations and translator stations, that’s what I’ve been in-
formed. That situation is just—in many places in rural America. 

Finally, let me say Mr. Chairman, I am pleased to hear the FCC 
has listened to concerns that have been raised previously regarding 
the  undue  burden  that  small  cable  operators  could  face  if  they  are 
required  by  the  FCC  to  carry  both  an  analog  and  digital  signal. 
The  capacity  of  their  systems  is—is  small  and  such  a  requirement 
could threaten to put them out of business, resulting in the loss of 
local  jobs  and  local  cable  for  many  viewers  in  rural  parts  of  the 
country. And I commend and thank the FCC for responding to that 
issue and taking a look at it. 

And I look forward to learning how your agencies are addressing 
other  issues.  And,  I  encourage  both  of  you  to  consider  the  digital 
transition as the number one priority issue during this whole year, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

rather  than  take  on  new  burdensome  issues  that  don’t  have  the 
same  critical  aspects  and  are  not  subject  to  the  critical  countdown 
that  is  involved  in  the  digital  issues.  I  don’t  want  to  get  offensive 
but  there  are  other  issues  that  are  just  not  time  sensitive,  a` la 
carte  for  instance  and  net  neutrality.  In  my  judgment  they  are  so-
lutions  looking  for  a  problem.  But  we  have  a  major  problem;  the 
major problem is digital transition, and I hope we all keep our eye 
on  that  problem.  If  we  work  hard  together,  I  think  we  can  get  the 
job  done.  We  here  have  brought  about  this  problem  and  we  know 
the  solution  can  only  be  achieved  through  hard  work  of  everybody 
concerned. So we look forward to working with you and thank you 
very much for being here. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Hutchison? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator  HUTCHISON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  do  appreciate 
your holding this hearing, because I share your concerns, and Sen-
ator  Stevens’,  about  the  awareness  of  the  public  about  this  impor-
tant transition that is going to occur 315 days from now. 

My  staff—because  of  our  proximity  with  Mexico—my  staff  re-
cently  went  down  to  South  Texas  and  had  about  a  dozen  forums, 
all  in  the  Texas  cities  along  the  border,  to  discuss  the  transition 
and  try  to  raise  the  awareness  at  the  local  level  about  what  can 
be  done  now.  And,  what  they  encountered  was  very  different  from 
what  I  have  heard  in  other  parts  of  the  State.  There  is  confusion 
about which households are affected, how to obtain and redeem the 
converter  box  coupons,  and  which  retailers  are  carrying  the  con-
verter boxes. 

We do have public service announcements, and that is important, 
but I think that it’s not nearly enough. So, I certainly look forward 
to  hearing  ideas  on  other  outreach  activities  that  we  can  conduct 
as we move into this critical period leading up to the transition. 

I recently distributed educational pamphlets throughout Texas to 
raise awareness and encourage leaders to engage in outreach at the 
grassroots  level.  I’m  also  working  with  aging  agencies,  health  and 
human  services  professionals,  and  other  organizations  throughout 
my  State,  and  we  have  begun  to  help  them  with  aggressive  out-
reach and volunteer activities, including coupon registration drives. 
The outreach there, though, has revealed some unique challenges 
in the border region. The Rio Grande Valley has more than 300,000 
households,  more  than  one-third  of  these  rely  on  antennas  for  re-
ception.  Yet,  according  to  the  most  recent  Commerce  Department 
data,  less  than  10,000  coupons  have  been  ordered  for  this  area,  so 
it’s a major concern. 

Also,  we  have  the  situation  where  television  stations  on  the 
Mexican  side  of  the  border,  which  are  played  in—in  Texas,  on  our 
side  of  the  border,  will  continue  analog  broadcasting.  So  they  may 
be  reaching  households  in  South  Texas,  whereas  American  broad-
casters  would  not.  I  introduced  a  bill  with  Barbara  Boxer  in  late 
December that establishes a process for broadcasters in the border 
regions to apply to the FCC for permission to continue both analog 
and digital broadcasting after the transition, for a limited time. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Mexican  stations  are  not  required  to  carry  AMBER  Alert  and 
Emergency  Alert  System  messages,  so  I  am  concerned  that  a  sig-
nificant number of households along the border are going to be de-
nied  access  to  important  public  safety  information,  because  they 
may be just watching Mexican stations after the transition. 

I will continue to push for a limited process that grants the FCC 
the flexibility to review applications by border broadcasters only, to 
continue simulcasting if doing so serves the public interest. 

I understand, on the converter boxes, that there is another issue 
that  has  been  raised  during  these  forums.  And  that  is  that  some 
of  the  low-power  stations,  including  some  university  stations  and 
religious  broadcasters  believe  that  many  models  of  the  converter 
box lack the capability to pass through the analog signals that they 
will  continue  using  after  the  transition.  This  is  obviously  a  great 
concern to residents that rely on these stations, as well as the sta-
tions,  to  make  sure  that  the  converter  boxes  will  work  for  every 
type of transmission. 

So, I thank you for holding the hearing. We are trying to address 
these  issues.  We’re  doing  everything  we  know,  right  now,  to  in-
crease  public  awareness  of  the  upcoming  deadline.  And  so,  I  hope 
that  we  can  pursue  some  of  these  things.  I  do  have  questions  that 
I  would  like  to  submit  for  the  record.  I  can’t  stay—sorry—I  have 
a  3  o’clock  meeting,  but  I  will  get  the  testimony  that  you  have 
given us and I will also submit questions for the record. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
And  appreciate  both  of  our  panelists  being  here  today.  I  think 
you  hear,  perhaps,  one  important  message  coming  from  all  of  the 
members of the committee, and that is first and foremost that this 
is  an  important  transition  and  it’s  going  to  require  a  great  deal  of 
attention  by  the  Commission  and  by  NTIA,  and  people  at  the  De-
partment of Commerce to make sure that it goes smoothly. 

That  means  we  need  to  focus  on  information  sharing,  because  I 
think  getting  information  into  consumers’  hands  is  going  to  be  the 
key  to  it  working  as  smoothly  as  possible.  If  the  consumer  has  a 
good  experience,  from  their  perspective,  in  installing  a  converter 
box  and  upgrading  their  television,  it  should  be  seamless.  And  I 
think it’s going to be a very positive process. If they have problems, 
if  they  get  the  wrong  equipment,  if  the  issue  of  boxes  that  don’t 
have  pass-through  capability  is  problematic,  we’re  going  to  hear 
about  it,  you’re  going  to  hear  about  it.  No  one’s  going  to  be  happy 
about  the  process.  So,  we  need  to  remain  focused  on  sharing  that 
information. 

I  do  think  there  are  a  few  other  important  issues  that  the  Com-
mission  needs  to  stay  focused  on.  On  the  heels  of  a  modestly  suc-
cessful  auction,  I  think  there  is  an  opportunity  to  go  back  and  ad-
dress  the  big  problems  that  we  had  in  one  area  of  the  spectrum 
auction, and that’s the D Block. It was extremely disappointing not 
to  yield  the  price  that  even  met  the  reserve  level.  I  don’t  think  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

can  just  go  back  and  drop  the  reserve  level.  That  would  be  a  dis-
service  to  taxpayers.  I  think  we’ve  got  a  much  better  opportunity 
to  re-auction  the  D  Block,  yield  and  realize  a  much  higher  return, 
get  rid  of  some  of  the  encumbrances  that  resulted  in  such  a  low— 
a  low  price  limited  offers,  maybe  even  structure  the  auction  in  a 
way  that  benefits  some  of  the  smaller  providers,  smaller  wireless 
carriers  that  didn’t  participate  as  fully  as  some  would  have  liked 
in the auction process. 

So, there is an opportunity there, but I think it’s something that 
needs  to  be  addressed  quickly  and  in  an  expeditious  way,  and  I 
hope  that  the  Commission  will  do  that.  We’ve  also  talked  before 
about the importance of addressing the technological issues associ-
ated  with  white  spaces.  Again,  this  represents  an  opportunity  for 
the  Commission  to  enact  rules  that  allow  more  spectrum  to  be 
available for broadband access, for Internet access in rural parts of 
the  country,  underserved  parts  of  the  country.  And  I  think  both  of 
those are proceedings and areas of rulemaking that are well devel-
oped and well underway. I think there is a lot of opportunity there. 
Conversely,  some  of  the  more  controversial  issues,  must-carry 
rules,  Internet  regulation,  price  controls,  such  as  a`
la  carte.  In 
most  cases,  these  are  issues  that  have  already  been  dealt  with  by 
the  Committee.  I  know  the  last  time  that  we  dealt  with  price  con-
trols  and  a` la  carte  pricing,  I  think  the  vote  was  20  to  2  against 
such  price  controls.  And  I  would  hope  that  something  like  that 
doesn’t occupy a lot of the Commission’s time, because in all likeli-
hood  we’re  going  to  end  up  right  where  we  are  today,  with  the 
Committee having fairly strong views on the subject. 

So, I think we need to remain—we need to remain focused, in ef-
fect, pick the targets and the opportunities carefully, both at Com-
merce and at the Commission. And if we do so, I think through the 
remainder  of  this  year,  we  can  see  success,  not  just  in  the  digital 
transition,  but  success  in  making  more  spectrum,  more  opportuni-
ties  available  for  innovators,  for  investors,  and  of  course,  for  con-
sumers. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Smith? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  want  to  echo  what  I’ve  heard  my  colleagues  say  and  Senator 
Stevens  in  particular,  there  isn’t  a  more  important  issue  you  have 
at  the  FCC  this  year  than  this  issue.  And  we’re  counting  on  you 
to  get  it  right,  and  if  you  don’t,  we’re  going  to  hear  a  lot  about  it 
in a year. Right now, millions of Oregonians are tuning in to broad-
cast TV to cheer on fellow Oregonian Kristy Lee Cook on American 
Idol—Go  Kristy  Lee!  But  these  same  Oregonians,  in  the  fall,  may 
want  to  watch  the  Oregon  Ducks  play  the  Oregon  State  Beavers, 
and  all  they’re  going  to  find  is  fuzz.  And,  I  don’t  want  that  to  be 
the case. 

I  remain  concerned  that  public  awareness  of  DTV  transition  is 
extremely  low.  And,  a  high  percentage  of  households  that  will  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

impacted by the transition are two I want you to focus on—elderly 
and rural. 

According to AARP, of the roughly 21 million households that are 
going  to  be  impacted,  nearly  half  of  those  will  include  somebody 
over the age of 50. Now, I’m over the age of 50 and I hope I’ve fig-
ured  it  out,  but  there  are  a  lot  of  folks  in  nursing  homes  that  are 
not  getting  the  information  or  where  they  get  their  TV.  Nursing 
homes are not being given these transition boxes, and they need to 
be.  I  fear  there  will  be  an  immense  amount  of  confusion  among 
rural  Americans,  rural  Oregonians,  who  currently  do  not  get  their 
television  over  the  air  from  the  signal  normally,  but  through  re-
peaters or translators, and not from a full-power television station. 
I’m troubled about the fact that many of those repeaters will not 
be transitioning to digital until well after the deadline, and the ad-
verse  effects  and  possible  confusion  may  result  over  this  issue 
among rural households. 

I’ll  be  interested  in  hearing,  today,  what  you  all  are  doing  to 
raise  public  awareness.  And  again,  there  just  isn’t  a  more  impor-
tant issue before you this year. 

Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Pryor? 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  don’t  have  any  statement.  Thank  you,  Mr. 

Chairman. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Chairman  Martin,  thank  you  for  coming  today.  We’ve  been  fo-
cused on this a lot in my State over the last few months. Best Buy 
is one of the companies that’s taken a lead on this, in terms of try-
ing  to  get  the  information  out.  Target’s  also  working  on  it.  But  I 
still  continue  to  be  concerned  because  we  are  just  10  months  from 
the  February  17,  2009  transition  date,  and  recent  surveys  have 
shown—and  I  know  there  are  conflicting  surveys—but  they’ve 
shown  that  consumer  awareness,  while  it  has  grown,  many  people 
do not know that the transition is coming. 

And I know, just talking to them, there is some confusion about, 
you  know,  the  converter  box,  if  they’re  supposed  to  buy  that,  or  if 
they have to get cable, which of course, we tell them that they don’t 
have to get, but that continues to be a problem. 

As  you  know,  we  have  430,000  households  that  rely  exclusively 
on  over-the-air  television  in  Minnesota.  That’s  more  than  20  per-
cent of the households in my State. So the education of consumers 
continues  to  be  a  very  important  issue  for  me,  and  then  I’m  also 
curious—and  we’ll  talk  about  this,  on  some  of  these  more  detailed 
issues  about  falling  over  the  digital  cliff  in  areas  where,  maybe  it 
is more problematic because they’re different, in terms of the signal 
and what will happen. 

Thank you very much. I look forward to hearing your testimony. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

We  are  pleased  to  have,  this  afternoon,  two  very  knowledgeable 
witnesses.  First,  the  Chairman  of  the  Federal  Communications 
Commission,  the  Honorable  Kevin  Martin.  And  second,  the  Acting 
Assisting Secretary of Commerce for Communications and Informa-
tion,  National  Telecommunications  Information  Administration, 
Meredith Attwell Baker. 

May I call upon Chairman Martin? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman 
Stevens,  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  inviting 
me to be here today to update you on the status of the digital tran-
sition. 

On  February  17,  2009,  all  full-power  television  stations  in  the 
country will stop broadcasting analog and begin broadcasting exclu-
sively  in  digital.  The  DTV  transition  will  be  a  historic  moment  in 
the  evolution  of  television.  Television  viewers  will  be  able  to  enjoy 
movie-quality  pictures  and  sound  and  potentially  new  program-
ming choices. 

It  will  also  allow  us  to  significantly  improve  public  safety  com-
munications and will usher in a new era of advanced wireless serv-
ices,  including  the  wide-spread  deployment  of  wireless  broadband. 
A  successful  digital  transition  will  depend  upon  minimizing  the 
burdens on consumers and maximizing their ability to benefit from 
it. 

Now according to recent polling data, consumer awareness of the 
transition  has  grown.  Last  month  the  Association  of  Public  Tele-
vision  Stations  released  a  survey  finding  consumer  awareness  of 
the  transition  increased  from  51  percent  to  76  percent  in  just  3 
months.  In  addition,  they  found  that  roughly  62  percent  of  over- 
the-air consuming households, who are aware of the transition, in-
dicated they would buy a converter box or digital TV, between now 
and when the transition takes effect. This is dramatically up since 
November of 2006, when only 28 percent of the over-the-air house-
holds said they would take one of these options. 

That more and more viewers are aware of the transition is a step 
in the right direction; however, we still have more work to do. For 
example, that same Association found that 17.5 percent of over-the- 
air  consumers  who  are  aware  of  the  transition,  don’t  know  what 
they  will  do,  and  roughly  10  percent  said  they  would  do  nothing. 
Taken  together,  these  recent  surveys  indicate  that  too  many 
Americans remain confused about what they need to do to prepare 
for  the  digital  transition.  This  recently  released  data  also  dem-
onstrates  that  facilitating  a  successful  DTV  transition  is  an  enor-
mous  undertaking,  and  it  is  one  which  no  single  entity,  public  or 
private,  can  achieve  alone,  rather  it  requires  the  commitment  and 
cooperation of government, industry, and consumer groups. And we 
have  made  that  commitment  and  are  actively  working  with  these 
important stakeholders. 

Today’s  hearing  is  a  welcome  opportunity  to  discuss  our  work 
with all of our DTV partners in the public and private sectors, both 
in terms of outreach and education, and necessary regulatory steps 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

to  ensure  that  Americans  can  share  the  benefits  of  this  historic 
transition. 

The  Commission  has  been  working  to  put  in  place  the  rules  and 
policies  to  enable  broadcasters  to  complete  the  conversion  from 
analog  to  digital.  Last  August,  the  Commission  adopted  the  final 
DTV  Table  of  Allotments,  based  upon  the  channel  elections  made 
by  full-power  stations.  This  order  provided  virtually  all,  over  99 
percent  of  the  TV  stations  across  the  country,  with  their  final  dig-
ital television channel assignments. 

In  December  of  2007,  we  also  concluded  our  third  DTV  Periodic 
Review.  This  order  adopted  the  procedures  and  rules  to  guide 
broadcasters through the end of the transition. It’s particularly im-
portant  that  broadcasters’  progress  be  carefully  monitored.  Accord-
ingly, we required each station to file a report on the status of the 
construction of their post-transition facilities. All stations have now 
submitted  their  first  such  report,  and  over  1,000  have  indicated 
they were completely finished with their DTV transition and are al-
ready providing full service to their viewers. 

Much of the focus of our consumer education efforts has been on 
the approximately 15 million homes that rely on over-the-air broad-
cast signals. These efforts have presumed that subscribers to cable 
and  satellite  will  continue  to  be  able  to  receive  digital  broadcast 
signals, just as they receive analog broadcast signals today. 

It  is  critical  to  note,  however,  that  our  rules  needed  to  be  modi-
fied  to  clarify  that  after  the  transition,  cable  and  satellite  compa-
nies  are  required  to  carry  digital  broadcast  signals  to  their  cus-
tomers,  just  as  they  do  analog  signals  today.  Our  goal  of  both  of 
these orders was not to expand carriage, but to ensure that broad-
casters’ switch from analog to digital was not used as an excuse by 
cable  operators  to  stop  carrying  broadcasters’  signals  in  a  format 
that could be viewed by all subscribers. 

Last  fall  the  Commission  adopted  an  order  that  guarantees  the 
35  million  analog  subscribers  will  not  be  left  in  the  dark  once  the 
broadcasters  ceased  broadcasting  in  analog.  I  do  understand  the 
small  cable  systems  are  capacity  constrained.  In  order  to  address 
this  problem,  I  am  circulating  today,  a  proposal  to  my  colleagues 
that  would  give  cable  systems  with  552  megahertz  or  smaller  ca-
pacity  an  exemption  from  carrying  HD  signals,  as  the  Commission 
required  back  in  2001.  A  system  of  this  size  does  not  need  to  file 
a waiver request, they would automatically be relieved of this 2001 
obligation to carry the HD signal. 

In addition, swift enforcement of our DTV-related rules is critical 
to  protecting  consumers  and  reducing  potential  confusion.  The 
Commission’s DTV-related enforcement efforts have focused on pro-
tecting  consumers  from  unknowingly  buying  televisions  that  won’t 
receive broadcast stations following the transition. 

With respect to the Commission’s labeling requirement, the Com-
mission  has,  as  of  April  7,  2008,  inspected  2,176  retail  stores,  36 
websites,  and  issued  347  citations  notifying  retailers  of  violations 
for failing to comply with our requirements. 

Additionally,  we  have  14  Notices  of  Apparent  Liability,  con-
taining fines totaling nearly $5 million, which are currently sched-
uled to be considered by the Commission at our next open meeting 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

later  this  week.  In  addition  to  those  NAL’s,  the  Enforcement  Bu-
reau has also issued another 7 NAL’s worth, about $104,000. 

9 

In  addition  to  our  labeling  investigations,  we  are  continuing  to 
ensure  that  no  manufacturers  are  importing  and  shipping  analog- 
only  televisions.  NAL’s  for  apparent  violations  of  our  rules  in  this 
area are also scheduled to be considered at this week’s meeting. 

And  third,  we  are  ensuring  that  our  digital  tuners  comply  with 
the  V-Chip  regulations,  and  we  have  9  NAL’s  with  fines  totaling 
$6.5  million,  which  are  scheduled  to  be  considered  at  the  Commis-
sion’s meeting, again, later this week. 

In  order  to  educate  consumers  properly,  all  parties  involved  in 
the  transmission—the  FCC,  NTIA,  broadcasters,  the  cable  indus-
try,  satellite,  manufacturers,  retailers  and  consumer  groups—need 
to work together to educate consumers. 

In February, the Commission adopted an order that, among other 
initiatives,  requires  broadcasters  to  provide  on-air  information  to 
their  viewers  about  the  DTV  transition,  and  requires  MVPDs  to 
provide  monthly  inserts  about  the  DTV  transition  in  their  cus-
tomers’ bills. 

In  addition  to  our  DTV  education  item,  the  Commission  is  ac-
tively,  and  directly,  promoting  consumer  awareness  in  the  upcom-
ing transition, through its own education and outreach efforts. The 
FCC’s  outreach  efforts  place  an  emphasis  on  consumers  who  re-
ceive  their  television  signals  over  the  air,  and  on  those  who  are 
hard  to  reach  and  may  be  unaware  of  the  upcoming  transition,  in-
cluding senior citizens, non-English speaking and minority commu-
nities,  people  with  disabilities,  low-income  individuals,  and  those 
living in rural and tribal areas. 

For  example,  beginning  in  July,  DTV  education  posters  will  be 
displayed in all 34,000 post offices around the country. The United 
States Postal Service estimates that an average of 9 million people 
pass  through  their  post  office  lobbies  each  day.  We  have  also  se-
cured  commitments  from  25  States  to  display  DTV  materials  in 
1,100 Department of Motor Vehicle locations. For example, we have 
secured  commitments  from  Alaska,  Hawaii,  Missouri,  New  Hamp-
shire,  North  Dakota,  Puerto  Rico,  Washington  and  West  Virginia. 
In addition, we have identified and contacted 150 mayors’ offices 
in the areas of the country with high concentrations of over-the-air 
households,  to  seek  their  help  to  educate  consumers  in  their  com-
munities. For example, the mayor’s office in Great Falls, Montana, 
has  requested  21,000  DTV  flyers  to  send  to  their  utility  customers 
in all of their utility bills. 

We’ve also reached out to the country’s major professional sports 
leagues,  and  have  received  offers  to  help  promote  the  transition— 
the  NFL,  the  NBA,  the  NHL,  Major  League  Baseball,  and 
NASCAR—have  all  agreed  to  help  raise  awareness  among  their 
fans. For example, the NHL has agreed to run ten 30-second PSAs 
per  day  until  the  transition  date  on  their  cable  channel,  the  NHL 
Network. 

Since the last time I appeared before you, Congress has also allo-
cated  additional  money  to  the  Commission  to  spend  on  consumer 
education efforts, and we intend to put these resources to good use, 
as  these  additional  funds  will  allow  the  Commission  to  expand 
upon its current consumer outreach and education plans. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

In  February,  we  awarded  a  contract  to  Ketchum,  to  support  a 
broad  range  of  consumer  education  services,  including  media  serv-
ices,  publications  and  distribution.  To  spread  the  word  about  the 
transition,  Ketchum  arranged  a  satellite  media  tour  in  February 
for  local  television  news  stations  around  the  country,  including 
those in Hawaii, Missouri, Texas and Florida, and Ketchum will be 
arranging similar satellite interviews throughout the transition. 

Other  efforts  with  them  include  billboards  in  targeted  markets, 
grocery  store  marketing  and  outreach,  and  production  of  television 
and radio public service announcements. 

As  I  mentioned,  we  also  know  that  some  consumers  will  be  dis-
proportionately impacted by the transition, and are harder to reach 
than the population at large. And therefore, we’ve been taking spe-
cific  steps  to  reach  particular  groups.  For  example,  starting  last 
year, FCC field agents have held DTV awareness sessions, and dis-
tributed information to senior centers, and other venues frequented 
by senior Americans. 

Through the work of our field agents, we have been able to reach 
these consumers in a total of 44 States. We have distributed infor-
mation  to  over  3,000  senior  centers,  and  985  community  centers, 
which include large numbers of seniors, and given nearly 589 pres-
entations, and 113 more scheduled in the just the days ahead. 

Last September, we presented two DTV education sessions at the 
national  AARP  convention,  and  we  have  plans  to  make  similar 
presentations  at  this  year’s  convention  and  8  road  shows  that 
AARP is holding around the country. 

We  also  know  the  Hispanic  community  disproportionately  relies 
on over-the-air television. Of the approximately 14.3 million broad-
cast-only  homes,  about  16.5  percent  are  headed  by  persons  of  His-
panic  origin.  The  Hispanic  Chamber  of  Commerce  has  agreed  to 
join  the  Commission  in  conducting  DTV  awareness  sessions,  and 
member chambers in the 15 U.S. cities with the largest number of 
Hispanic television in homes. 

In  addition,  we’ve  partnered  with  Univision  to  hold  DTV  aware-
ness  sessions  at  town  hall  meetings.  Through  these  partnerships, 
we  will  reach  cities  that  are  home  to  over  80  percent  of  the  His-
panic community. 

The  Commission  is  continuing  a  multi-faceted  approach  and  in-
forming people with disabilities about the DTV transition. On Feb-
ruary  28th  of  this  year,  we  held  a  workshop  dedicated  to  DTV 
issues  facing  people  with  disabilities.  And  in  response  to  two  sug-
gestions by panelists, we have drafted a step-by-step guide on how 
to  install  a  digital-to-analog  converter  box,  and  posted  it  on  the 
Commission’s website. 

The  Commission  is  also  taking  specific  steps  to  help  inform  low- 
income consumers about the transition. We have formed a partner-
ship with the Department of Health and Human Services to assist 
the  FCC  in  disseminating  DTV  to  targeted  populations.  For  exam-
ple,  the  Administration  for  Children  and  Families  is  distributing 
information  through  their  1,600  Head  Start  grantees,  covering 
more than 18,000 centers around the country. 

The Commission is also taking specific steps to inform people liv-
ing  in  rural  areas,  and  on  tribal  lands.  For  example,  we  recently 
established  a  partnership  with  the  United  States  Department  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

Agriculture’s 4-H Office. The FCC, NTIA, and USDA participate in 
the annual 4-H Youth Leadership Conference, and presented semi-
nars  to  youth  members  of  4-H  chapters  from  various  states.  FCC 
staff  provided  information  with  these  youth  representatives  and 
their colleagues, so they could take it back home to increase aware-
ness. 

Another  important  component  of  that  plan  is  the  placement  of 
DTV  education  materials  at  state  and  county  fairs  throughout  the 
country in cooperation with all the sponsoring 4-H chapters. 

We’ve  also  forged  an  important  partnership  with  the  Bureau  of 
Indian  Affairs.  This  collaboration  has  resulted  in  the  distribution 
of  DTV  materials  throughout  Indian  Country,  utilizing  all  50  of 
their nationwide offices. 

The  Commission  is  devoting  significant  resources  to  facilitating 
a  smooth  transition.  Nearly  every  Bureau  and  Office  at  the  Com-
mission  has  been  involved  in  the  effort,  including  all  of  our  field 
offices throughout the country. 

The  next  10  months  will  undoubtedly  be  challenging,  neverthe-
less  it’s  our  hope  that  through  the  combined  effort  of  the  govern-
ment, industry and advocacy groups, American consumers will reap 
the rewards that digital transition has to offer. 

Thank  you  very  much,  and  I  look  forward  to  answering  your 

questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Martin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Good  morning  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and  Members  of  the 
Committee.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today  to  update  you  on  the  status  of 
the digital transition. 

On  February  17,  2009,  all  full-power  television  stations  in  this  country  will  stop 
broadcasting  in  analog,  and  broadcast  exclusively  in  digital,  as  mandated  by  Con-
gress  in  the  Digital  Television  and  Public  Safety  Act  of  2005.  A  successful  digital 
transition will depend upon minimizing the burdens placed on consumers and maxi-
mizing their ability to benefit from it. 

The  DTV  transition  will  be  a  historic  moment  in  the  evolution  of  TV.  Television 
viewers  will  be  able  to  enjoy  movie  quality  picture  and  sound  and  potentially  new 
programming  choices.  It  also  will  allow  us  to  significantly  improve  public  safety 
communications  and  will  usher  in  a  new  era  of  advanced  wireless  services  such  as 
the widespread deployment of wireless broadband. 

According  to  recent  data  from  the  Consumer  Electronics  Association  and  the  Na-
tional Association of Broadcasters, consumer awareness of the transition has grown. 
It  is  up  80  percent  from  41  percent  consumer  awareness  in  August  2006  to  74  per-
cent  consumer  awareness  in  January  2008,  according  to  CEA,  and  NAB  reports  it 
has more than doubled since 2007. And recent surveys published by NAB and Con-
sumers  Union  found  79  percent  and  64  percent  of  consumers  were  aware  of  the 
transition  respectively.  More  recently  (in  March),  the  Association  of  Public  Tele-
vision Stations (APTS) issued the findings to a survey it conducted in February indi-
cating  that  consumer  awareness  of  the  transition  increased  from  51  percent  to  76 
percent in just 3 months (November 2007 to February 2008). In addition APTS finds 
that: ‘‘Roughly 62 percent of . . . over-the-air consuming households who are aware 
of  the  transition  indicated  that  they  would  buy  a  converter  box  or  digital  TV  set 
between  now  and  when  the  transition  takes  effect  . . .’’  which  is  up  dramatically 
since  November  2006,  when  only  ‘‘28  percent  of  over-the-air  households  said  they 
would take those options.’’ 

That  more  and  more  viewers  are  aware  of  the  transition  is  a  step  in  the  right 
direction.  However,  we  still  have  more  work  to  do.  Specifically,  the  Consumers 
Union  also  found  that  74  percent  of  consumers  have  ‘‘major  misconceptions’’  about 
the  impact  of  the  transition  on  them.  In  other  words,  too  many  Americans  remain 
confused  about  what  they  need  to  do  to  prepare  for  it.  And  APTS  finds  that  ‘‘17.5 
percent of over-the-air consumers who are aware of the transition ‘don’t know’ what 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

they  will  do  and  roughly  10  percent  said  they  would  ‘do  nothing.’ ’’  Taken  together, 
these surveys are valuable research tools to better guide our education and outreach 
efforts over the next 10 months. 

This  recently  released  data  also  demonstrates  that  facilitating  a  successful  DTV 
transition  is  an  enormous  undertaking.  And  it  is  one  which  no  single  entity,  public 
or  private,  can  achieve  alone.  Rather  it  requires  the  commitment  and  cooperation 
of government, industry and consumer groups. We have made that commitment and 
are actively working with these important stakeholders. 

In  February,  I  participated  in  an  event  marking  1  year  before  the  transition  at 
a local Best Buy store which sells digital televisions and is currently selling digital- 
to-analog  converter  boxes.  Commerce  Secretary  Gutierrez,  Meredith  Baker  and  I 
were  joined  there  by  top  representatives  of  the  Nation’s  broadcasters,  cable  opera-
tors,  and  the  consumer  electronics  industry.  We  are  working  together,  along  with 
others  inside  and  outside  of  government,  in  an  unprecedented  public-private  part-
nership to educate consumers throughout the country. Today’s hearing is a welcome 
opportunity  to  discuss  our  work  with  all  of  our  DTV  partners  both  in  terms  of  out-
reach  and  education  and  necessary  regulatory  steps  to  ensure  all  Americans  can 
share the benefits of this historic digital transition. 
Update on Broadcasters Transition to Digital 

Last  August,  the  Commission  adopted  the  final  DTV  Table  of  Allotments  based 
on  the  channel  elections  made  by  the  full-power  broadcast  stations.  This  order  pro-
vided virtually all (over 99 percent) of the television stations across the country with 
their final channel assignments for broadcasting in digital following the DTV transi-
tion.  By  finalizing  broadcasters’  channel  allotments,  the  Commission  helped  ensure 
that  broadcasters  could  begin  making  final  preparations  for  their  own  conversion. 
Nearly  two-thirds  of  full  power  stations  (1,180)  will  remain  on  the  same  channel 
they are currently using for digital service. Most of these stations, over 1,030, have 
completed  construction  and  are  already  providing  full  service  to  their  viewers.  The 
remainder, roughly 150, are working on completing construction of their full service 
facilities.  One-third  of  full  power  stations,  (roughly  635),  are  changing  channels  for 
their  operation  after  the  transition  and  are  currently  filing  construction  permit  ap-
plications, ordering equipment, and scheduling tower crews. 

In  December  of  2007,  we  also  concluded  the  Third  DTV  Periodic  Review.  This 
Order  adopted  the  procedures  and  rules  to  guide  broadcasters  through  the  end  of 
the transition. Among other important decisions, this order adopted the interference 
standard for post-transition applications and forecast the date, later this year, when 
the  Commission  will  consider  requests  from  broadcasters  to  expand  their  service 
area. 

In  the  Third  DTV  Periodic  Review,  the  Commission  recognized  that  stations  will 
need flexibility to complete the transition. Consequently we adopted procedures that 
will  allow  broadcasters  to  adjust  their  buildout  according  to  their  needs  and  the 
needs  of  their  viewers.  For  example,  we  will  consider  requests  from  broadcasters 
that  find  it  necessary  to  reduce  analog  service  before  the  transition  date,  but  they 
will be required to inform their viewers well in advance of any reductions. 

In addition to getting the proper rules in place, it is important that broadcasters’ 
progress  be  carefully  monitored.  Accordingly,  to  enable  the  Commission  to  closely 
track  broadcasters’  progress  toward  completing  their  transition,  we  required  each 
station to file a report on the status of the construction of its post-transition facility. 
All stations have submitted the first such report, and over 1,000 indicated that they 
were  completely  finished  with  their  DTV  transition.  Broadcasters  are  required  to 
update  the  Commission  with  any  changes  to  their  status  as  events  warrant.  In  the 
Third Periodic, the Commission committed to send Congress a full report on broad-
casters’ DTV build-out in August. Broadcasters that have not completed their transi-
tion must report again by October 20, 2008. 
Carriage of Digital Signals 

Much  of  the  focus  of  our  consumer  education  efforts  has  been  on  the  approxi-
mately  15  percent  of  the  homes  who  rely  on  over-the-air  broadcast  signals.  These 
efforts have presumed that subscribers to cable and satellite will continue to be able 
to  receive  digital  broadcast  signals  just  as  they  do  analog  broadcast  signals  today. 
It  is  critical  to  note,  however,  that  our  rules  needed  to  be  modified  to  clarify  that 
cable  and  satellite  companies  were  required  to  carry  digital  broadcast  signals  to 
their  customers  just  as  they  do  the  analog  broadcast  signals  today.  Our  goal  with 
both  of  these  Orders  was  not  to  expand  carriage  but  rather  to  ensure  that  the 
broadcasters’  switch  from  analog  to  digital  was  not  used  as  an  excuse  to  stop  car-
rying  the  broadcasters’  signal  in  a  format  that  could  be  viewed  by  all  subscribers, 
including analog cable subscribers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

Last fall, the Commission adopted an order that guarantees that analog cable sub-
scribers will not be left in the cold once broadcasters ceased broadcasting in analog. 
Specifically,  the  Commission  took  action  to  ensure  that  after  the  transition,  cable 
operators  will  continue  to  make  every  broadcast  station’s  signal  viewable,  as  the 
statute requires. As a result, we significantly reduced the number of Americans po-
tentially  needing  a  converter  box  to  watch  broadcast  stations  post-transition.  Mak-
ing sure the almost 35 million households that subscribe to analog cable will be able 
to  continue  to  watch  broadcast  television  after  the  transition  as  they  did  before  al-
lows us to focus our energies on assisting the nearly 15 million households that rely 
exclusively on over-the-air signals. 

The  Commission  recently  adopted  an  order  that  will  enable  satellite  subscribers 
to receive digital broadcast signals, as well. The law had required that when a sat-
ellite  operator  chooses  to  carry  any  local  broadcast  signals,  it  must  carry  all  full 
power  local  broadcast  signals  in  that  market.  The  item  recently  adopted  clarifies 
that,  in  such  a  ‘‘local-into-local’’  market,  where  a  full-power  television  station  is 
broadcasting  only  in  digital,  the  satellite  operator  must  carry  that  digital  signal 
upon  request.  This  clarification  is  critical  to  ensuring  that  satellite  customers,  like 
cable  customers,  will  continue  to  receive  the  same  broadcast  stations  they  saw  the 
day before the transition on the day after the transition. 
Enforcement 

The  Commission’s  DTV-related  enforcement  efforts  have  focused  on  protecting 
consumers  from  unknowingly  buying  televisions  that  won’t  receive  broadcast  sta-
tions  following  the  transition.  Specifically,  we  are  enforcing  three  rules:  (1)  the  re-
quirement to label any remaining televisions with analog-only tuners; (2) the prohi-
bition  on  the  importation  and  shipment  of  television  receivers  without  integrated 
digital  tuners;  and  (3)  the  requirement  that  the  V-Chip  functions  with  the  digital 
technology. 

With  respect  to  the  Commission’s  labeling  requirement,  the  Commission  has,  as 
of  April  7,  2008,  inspected  2,176  retail  stores  and  36  websites  and  issued  347  cita-
tions notifying retailers of violations for failing to comply with our requirements. Be-
cause  retailers  are  not  licensees,  we  must  give  them  a  citation  prior  to  issuing  a 
Notice  of  Apparent  Liability  (NAL).  In  July  2007,  we  circulated  to  the  Commis-
sioners’ offices NALs against seven of the largest retailers. In October 2007, we cir-
culated  another  seven  NALs  against  retailers.  All  14  of  these  NALs,  which  contain 
fines totaling nearly $5 million in the aggregate, are currently scheduled to be con-
sidered  at  our  April  open  meeting  later  this  week.  In  addition  to  these  14  NALs, 
the  Enforcement  Bureau  has  issued  another  seven  NALs  worth  an  additional 
$104,000. It is my hope that through our vigorous enforcement actions, retailers will 
take  concrete  actions  to  avoid  consumer  confusion  as  the  digital  transition  draws 
near. 

In  addition  to  our  labeling  investigations,  we  are  continuing  to  ensure  that  no 
manufacturers  are  importing  and  shipping  analog-only  television  receivers  and 
equipment.  We  have  issued  NALs  against  two  companies—Syntax  Brillian  Corp. 
(approx. $2.9 million) and Regent USA, Inc. ($63,650)—for apparent violation of our 
rules in this area. One of these companies has already paid the fine, and a forfeiture 
order  with  respect  to  the  other  company  is  scheduled  to  be  considered  at  the  Com-
mission’s  April  agenda  meeting.  In  March,  we  circulated  an  NAL  against  an  addi-
tional manufacturer and this item is also on the agenda for the April meeting. 

Finally,  we  are  ensuring  that  the  digital  tuners  comply  with  the  V-Chip  regula-
tions. As you know, the Commission’s rules require digital television manufacturers 
to include the V-Chip in their equipment and to ensure that their devices can adjust 
to  changes  in  the  content  advisory  system.  We  began  investigating  allegations  that 
some  manufacturers  were  not  complying  with  our  rules.  As  a  result  of  these  inves-
tigations  we  released  an  NAL  against  Funai  Corporation.  In  October  2007,  we  cir-
culated  NALs  against  an  additional  seven  manufacturers.  Nine  NALs,  which  con-
tain fines totaling over $6.5 million, are scheduled to be considered at the Commis-
sion’s April agenda meeting later this week. 

In addition, FCC field agents soon will begin to visit retailer stores to assess their 

employee training and consumer education efforts regarding the DTV transition. 

Swift enforcement of all our DTV-related rules is critical to protecting consumers 
and  reducing  potential  confusion.  Our  activities  in  this  area  will  continue  to  be  a 
priority during the next 10 months. 
Consumer Education and Outreach 

In  order  to  educate  consumers  properly,  all  parties  involved  in  the  transition— 
the  FCC,  NTIA,  the  broadcasters,  the  cable  industry,  satellite,  manufacturers,  re-
tailers, consumer groups—need to work together to educate consumers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

I commend the industry for the consumer education campaigns that they have ini-
tiated. Specifically, the National Association of Broadcasters (NAB) launched a $700 
million campaign that includes, among other things, television spots, 30 minute edu-
cation  programs  about  DTV  and  a  100-day  countdown  to  the  February  17,  2009 
deadline.  In  addition,  the  National  Cable  and  Telecommunications  Association 
(NCTA) launched a $200 million campaign that includes, among other things, send-
ing  customer  communication  ‘‘tool  kits’’  to  all  their  cable  systems  nationwide,  and 
distributing brochures about the transition at community and public events. 

In  February,  the  Commission  adopted  an  Order  that  requires  commercial  and 
noncommercial  full  power  broadcasters  to  provide  on-air  information  to  their  view-
ers  about  the  DTV  transition  by  compliance  with  one  of  three  alternative  sets  of 
rules. Although the sets of requirements are distinct, all require PSAs and the Com-
mission found that they each entail a similar level of commitment and engagement 
on  the  part  of  broadcasters.  For  example,  where  the  first  option  calls  for  more  fre-
quent  PSAs,  the  second  calls  for  longer  ones,  and  the  third  for  the  same  total 
amount  of  education  but  more  flexibility  regarding  PSA  length.  All  plans  require 
quarterly reporting of both mandatory and voluntary outreach and education efforts. 
This will allow the Commission not only to monitor compliance, but also to stay in-
formed of the creative approaches being taken by disparate broadcasters all over the 
country, and continue to coordinate transition education efforts. 

The  item  also  requires  MVPDs  to  provide  monthly  inserts  about  the  DTV  transi-
tion in their customer billing statements. Phone companies participating in the Low 
Income  Federal  Universal  Service  Program  also  must  provide  notice  of  the  transi-
tion  to  their  low  income  customers  and  potential  customers.  The  item  also  requires 
manufacturers  of  television  receivers  and  related  devices  to  provide  notice  to  con-
sumers  of  the  transition’s  impact  on  that  equipment.  In  addition,  we  require  the 
partners listed on the Commission’s dtv.gov website such as NAB, NCTA, CEA and 
CERC,  as  well  as  the  winners  of  the  700  MHZ  auction,  to  provide  the  Commission 
with quarterly updates on their consumer education efforts. Finally, the item states 
that  we  will  work  with  the  National  Telecommunications  and  Information  Agency 
(NTIA)  to  ensure  that  the  retailers  participating  in  the  converter  box  program  are 
appropriately training their employees and informing consumers. 

In addition to our DTV Consumer Education item, the Commission is actively and 
directly promoting consumer awareness of the upcoming transition through its own 
education and outreach efforts. 

The FCC’s consumer outreach effort places an emphasis on consumers who receive 
their  television  signals  ‘‘over-the-air’’  and  on  those  who  are  hard  to  reach  and  may 
be unaware of the upcoming transition, including senior citizens; non-English speak-
ing and minority communities; people with disabilities; low-income individuals; and 
people living in rural and tribal areas. 

We  have  been  forging  partnerships,  participating  in  media  events,  and  attending 

conferences, to get the word out. 

For  example,  in  the  beginning  of  July,  DTV  education  posters  will  be  displayed 
in  all  34,000  post  offices  across  the  Nation.  The  United  States  Postal  Service  esti-
mates that an average of 9 million people pass through their post office lobbies each 
day. 

We  have  also  secured  commitments  from  25  states,  the  District  of  Columbia  and 
Puerto  Rico  to  display  DTV  materials  in  1,100  Department  of  Motor  Vehicle  loca-
tions.  Specifically,  we  have  secured  commitments  with  Alaska,  Arizona,  Colorado, 
the District of Columbia, Hawaii, Idaho, Louisiana, Maine, Massachusetts, Missouri, 
Montana,  Nebraska,  Nevada,  New  Hampshire,  North  Dakota,  Ohio,  Oklahoma, 
Puerto Rico, Rhode Island, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee, Texas, Wash-
ington, West Virginia, Wisconsin and Wyoming. 

The FCC also distributed DTV transition awareness information that is being pro-
vided  to  all  Federal  Government  employees.  We  estimate  that  this  message  will 
reach over 2.5 million Federal employees throughout the country. 

In  addition,  we  have  identified  and  contacted  150  mayoral  offices  in  areas  of  the 
country  with  high  concentrations  of  over-the-air  households,  to  help  them  educate 
consumers  in  their  communities.  These  efforts  have  thus  far  resulted  in  29  cities 
making  specific  commitments  ranging  from  posting  and  distributing  DTV  informa-
tion  in  public  locations  and  at  events  and  conferences,  to  including  information  in 
newsletters  and  other  publications,  and  establishing  links  to  our  dtv.gov  website, 
and  other  efforts  unique  to  their  communities.  For  example,  the  Mayor’s  Office  in 
Great Falls, Montana has requested 21,000 DTV flyers from us to send to their util-
ity customers along with their utility bills. 

We  also  reached  out  to  the  country’s  major  professional  sports  leagues  and  have 
received offers to help promote the transition. The National Football League (NFL), 
the  National  Basketball  Association  (NBA),  the  National  Hockey  League  (NHL), 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

Major  League  Baseball  (MLB)  and  NASCAR  all  agreed  to  help  raise  awareness  of 
the transition among their fans. For example, the NHL has agreed to run 30 second 
PSAs  per  day  until  the  transition  date  on  their  cable  channel  the  NHL  Network. 
Since  the  last  time  I  appeared  before  you,  Congress  has  allocated  additional 
money  to  the  Commission  to  spend  on  our  consumer  education  efforts.  We  intend 
to put these resources to good use as these additional funds will allow the Commis-
sion to expand upon its current consumer outreach and education plan. 

In February, a contract was awarded to Ketchum to support a broad range of con-
sumer  education  services,  including  media  services,  publications,  and  distribution, 
that will assist and complement the FCC’s ongoing work on educating all American 
consumers about the digital television transition. Ketchum has provided design rec-
ommendations  to  make  our  DTV  messaging,  including  DTV.gov,  more  consumer- 
friendly. Other efforts through Ketchum will include billboards in targeted markets, 
grocery  store  outreach,  and  production  of  television  and  radio  public  service  an-
nouncements.  Ketchum  arranged  a  Satellite  Media  Tour  in  February  on  local  tele-
vision news around the country in states such as Hawaii, Missouri, Texas and Flor-
ida  to  spread  the  message  about  the  transition.  From  those  seventeen  interviews, 
which  were  aired  between  February  22  and  March  2,  Ketchum  reported  more  than 
one  million  audience  impressions.  Ketchum  will  be  arranging  similar  interviews 
throughout the transition to continue our consumer education efforts. 

As I mentioned, we also know that some consumers will be disproportionately im-
pacted by the transition or are harder to reach than the population at large. There-
fore  we  have  been  taking  specific  steps  to  reach  these  groups.  I  would  like  to  take 
a few minutes to describe our efforts targeted at each of these five communities. 
Senior Citizens 

Senior citizens are more likely to have analog television sets and rely exclusively 
on over-the-air broadcasting. We have partnered with organizations that specifically 
serve this harder to reach population. Last September, we presented two DTV edu-
cation  sessions  at  the  national  AARP  convention  in  Boston,  and  we  have  plans  to 
make  similar  presentations  at  this  year’s  convention  in  Washington,  D.C.  In  addi-
tion,  late  last  fall,  I  was  interviewed  about  the  transition  on  AARP  radio  which  is 
broadcast  on  170  outlets  nationwide  reaching  more  than  1,000,000  people.  I  was 
also  interviewed  for,  and  quoted  in  the  January/February  issue  of  AARP’s  widely 
circulated  AARP  Magazine,  which  has  a  circulation  of  23.5  million.  AARP  is  also 
regularly  including  stories  on  the  DTV  Transition  in  their  Monthly  Bulletins.  Fur-
ther,  AARP  will  be  distributing  DTV  information  at  a  series  of  eight  ‘‘road  show’’ 
events they will hold around the country from June to September of this year. 

In  addition  to  working  with  AARP,  we  have  also  been  working  with  other  senior 
organizations  as  well.  For  example,  I  taped  a  PSA  for  Retirement  Living  TV  which 
reaches nearly 30 million homes nationwide. Also I participated in a story about the 
transition for the Erickson Tribune, which is distributed to residents in their retire-
ment  communities  and  is  read  by  more  than  6  million  people.  We  are  also  pleased 
to  be  partnering  with  The  National  Association  of  Area  Agencies  on  Aging  (N4A) 
to  cosponsor  DTV  awareness  sessions  during  the  coming  year  in  conjunction  with 
their 655 area offices throughout the Nation. This is a useful opportunity to educate 
caregivers, social workers and others who care for the elderly in their communities. 
In  addition  to  working  with  these  organizations,  we  have  and  continue  to  set  up 
partnerships with many State aging offices. As a result of our efforts, 26 states, the 
District  of  Columbia,  and  Puerto  Rico  have  agreed  to  conduct  DTV  outreach  with 
the  FCC  in  varying  capacities,  including  distributing  DTV  information  at  con-
ferences and events. 

Commission  staff  located  in  field  offices  throughout  the  country  are  also  working 
on DTV transition education and outreach. Starting last year, FCC field agents have 
held DTV Awareness Sessions and distributed information to senior centers, librar-
ies and other local venues frequented by older Americans. Through the work of our 
field  agents,  we  have  been  able  to  reach  these  consumers  in  a  total  of  44  states— 
ranging  from  Alaska  to  Florida.  We  have  already  distributed  information  to  over 
3,033  senior  centers,  and  985  community  centers,  which  frequently  include  large 
numbers  of  seniors,  and  given  nearly  589  presentations  with  113  more  scheduled 
in the days ahead. 

The FCC also held a DTV Workshop focusing on seniors at FCC Headquarters on 
November  8,  2007.  It  consisted  of  two  panels  discussing  the  transition’s  effect  on 
seniors plus exhibits hosted by other government and industry organizations. Based 
on  the  discussions  and  the  relationships  formed  at  that  Workshop,  we  reached  out 
to  faith-based  organizations,  provided  them  with  consumer  education  materials  on 
the transition, and continue to follow up with them to answer questions on the tran-
sition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

And  I’m  pleased  to  announce  that  on  May  28,  2008,  along  with  Congresswoman 
Eleanor  Holmes  Norton,  we  will  be  hosting  a  DTV  Town  Hall  Meeting  for  seniors 
in D.C. We are working in conjunction with AARP, the DC Office of Aging, the NAB, 
and  the  National  Caucus  and  Center  for  the  Black  Aged.  The  expected  turnout  is 
over 300 seniors from the District’s Aging community. 
Non-English Speakers and Minorities 

We also know that the Hispanic community disproportionately relies on over-the- 
air  television.  Of  the  approximately  14.3  million  broadcast-only  homes,  about  16.5 
percent are headed by persons of Hispanic origin. 

The  Hispanic  Chamber  of  Commerce  has  agreed  to  join  the  Commission  in  con-
ducting DTV awareness sessions at member chambers in the 15 U.S. cities with the 
largest  number  of  Hispanic  TV  homes.  In  addition,  we  have  partnered  with 
Univision  to  hold  DTV  awareness  sessions  at  Town  Hall  meetings  designed  to  edu-
cate members of its Spanish speaking audience. Through these partnerships, we will 
reach cities that are home to over 80 percent of Hispanic communities. 

Additionally, we have taped several on-air interviews regarding the digital transi-
tion  for  Univision’s  news  and  public  affairs  programs  airing  both  in  local  markets 
and nationally. These interviews were done by Keyla Hernandez-Ulloa the Commis-
sion  staffer  hired  to  spearhead  outreach  to  the  Hispanic  community.  We  have  been 
discussing  the  switch  to  digital  on  other  Hispanic  media  outlets  as  well.  For  exam-
ple, I did an interview with the Hispanic Communications Network, which produces 
material  for  radio,  television,  print  and  Internet,  that  will  be  distributed  to  its  230 
member radio network in the United States and Puerto Rico. 

We have also been working with other foreign language media outlets as well. To 
that end we have partnered with KTSF, a major Asian TV station in San Francisco. 
They  have  distributed  5,000  English  and  Chinese  DTV  one-page  flyers  at  their 
booth  during  the  Chinese  New  Year  celebration  events  in  late  February.  Approxi-
mately 100,000 people attended this festival. Also in conjunction with the California 
Public  Utilities  Commission,  on  May  22,  2008,  we  are  participating  with  KTSF  on 
a DTV educational panel for over 100 community leaders in San Francisco. 

The FCC held a DTV Workshop focusing on non-English speakers and minorities 
on  December  4,  2007.  As  a  result  of  that  Workshop,  we  will  be  working  with  the 
American  Libraries  Association  to  conduct  a  nationally  available  Internet  seminar 
or ‘‘webinar’’ about the DTV transition today for librarians in the Webjunction Span-
ish  Outreach  Program.  These  librarians  provide  library  services  to  Spanish  speak-
ers. Also, as a result of input received at the workshop, we translated our DTV one- 
page  flyer  into  Hmong  and  Arabic  (in  addition  to  English,  Spanish,  Vietnamese, 
Chinese, Japanese, Korean, Tagalog, French and Russian). 

In  addition,  we  plan  to  participate  in  a  number  of  national  conventions  rep-
resenting  non-English  speaking  and  minority  consumers  in  2008.  They  include  the 
78th Annual Conference for League of United Latin American Citizens, the Annual 
National Hispanic Leadership Conference and the National Council of La Raza Con-
ference,  the  NAACP  Convention,  the  National  Urban  League  Conference  and  the 
Organization of Chinese Americans National Conference. 
People With Disabilities 

The  Commission  is  continuing  a  multi-faceted  approach  in  informing  people  with 
disabilities  about  the  DTV  transition.  On  February  28,  2008,  we  hosted  a  DTV 
Workshop  dedicated  to  issues  facing  people  with  disabilities.  The  program  featured 
panelists  from  numerous  organizations  whose  missions  are  to  work  directly  with, 
and advocate on behalf of, individuals with hearing, vision, speech, physical, and in-
tellectual  disabilities.  It  elicited  several  concrete  suggestions  that  we  have  imple-
mented. 

For instance, in response to the panelists’ suggestion that we develop ‘‘how to’’ in-
formation  related  to  the  transition,  we  have  drafted  a  step-by-step  guide  on  how  to 
install  a  digital-to-analog  converter  box,  and  posted  it  on  the  Commission’s  DTV 
Website, www.DTV.gov. Similarly, in response to general questions at the Workshop 
concerning the availability of video description (descriptions for people who are blind 
or  have  other  vision  disabilities  about  the  setting  and/or  action  in  a  program  when 
information about these visual elements is not contained in the audio portion of the 
program), we are in the process of drafting a consumer advisory specifically address-
ing that issue. 

Another  suggestion  from  panelists  was  that  we  utilize  national  service  organiza-
tions to inform consumers about the transition. Indeed, we have initiated a partner-
ship  with  the  Corporation  for  National  and  Community  Service,  and  with  the 
United  States  Department  of  Agriculture’s  4–H  office.  Finally,  we  will  build  upon 
our  workshop  by  speaking  directly  to  organizations  that  work  with  and  on  behalf 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

of  people  with  disabilities,  at  their  meetings  and  conferences.  For  example,  we  are 
planning to attend the Summer Quarterly Meeting in Seattle of the National Coun-
cil on Disabilities, which was represented at the February 28 Workshop. 

I  am  also  pleased  to  report  that  www.DTV.gov  now  features  a  DTV  educational 
video in American Sign Language for the deaf and hard of hearing community. Our 
most  commonly  utilized  publications  are  available  in  Braille  and  audio  format  and 
all  of  our  fact  sheets  and  advisories  are  available  in  large  print.  In  addition,  we 
have  two  specific  publications  addressing  DTV  and  closed  captioning,  ‘‘Closed  Cap-
tioning  for  Digital  Television,’’  and  Closed  Captioning  and  Digital-to-Analog  Con-
verter  Boxes  for  Viewing  Free  Over-the-Air  Programming  on  Analog  Televisions.’’ 
The  Commission  also  has  a  dedicated  e-mail  box  for  closed  captioning  questions  at 
closedcaptioning@fcc.gov. 

Commission  staff  continues  to  attend  conferences  to  distribute  DTV  educational 
materials  to  people  with  disabilities.  For  example,  the  FCC  has  attended  and  pro-
vided  DTV  materials  at  the  National  Black  Deaf  Advocates  Conference,  the  Voca-
tional and Educational Services for Individuals with Disabilities Conference and the 
Emergency  Planning  and  Response  for  Special  Needs  and  Disabilities  Conference. 
In  all,  we  are  collaborating  broadly  with  disability  advocacy  groups  and  outreach 
organizations.  For  instance,  the  Hearing  Loss  Association  of  America  (‘‘HLAA’’)  is 
already  linking  to  our  DTV  informational  materials  on  its  website,  which  receives 
approximately one million hits per month. In addition, HLAA has committed to pub-
lish later this spring an article on DTV and closed captioning in Hearing Loss Maga-
zine, which is estimated to reach a readership of 200,000 people. Likewise, later this 
spring  the  article  will  be  published  in  the  ‘‘Blue  Book’’  Resource  Guide  of  Tele-
communications  for  the  Deaf,  Inc.  (‘‘TDI’’),  with  a  readership  of  up  to  an  estimated 
100,000  people,  and  eventually  posted  online  at  TDI’s  website,  which  receives  ap-
proximately 88,000 hits per month. 

Furthermore, HLAA has 200 local and regional chapters around the country, and 
we plan to conduct DTV Awareness Sessions at their monthly meetings throughout 
the  course  of  the  year.  We  recently  conducted  one  in  Yuma,  Arizona  on  March  11, 
one  in  New  Orleans  on  March  15,  and  we  have  another  16  scheduled  through  the 
fall.  We  also  plan  to  utilize  our  Enforcement  Bureau’s  Field  Office  staff  and  CGB 
staff  to  distribute  DTV  informational  and  educational  materials  at  HLAA’s 
‘‘Walk4Hearing’’ events across the country taking place this spring through the fall. 
Low-Income Consumers 

The  Commission  is  also  taking  specific  steps  to  inform  low-income  consumers 
about  the  transition  to  all-digital  broadcasting.  We  have  forged  a  partnership  with 
the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  to  assist  the  FCC  in  disseminating 
DTV material to target populations, including low-income consumers. HRSA (Health 
Resources and Services Administration) has forwarded FCC DTV information to ap-
proximately  4,000  grantee  organizations,  and  the  message  also  went  out  to  groups 
like the state Primary Care Offices and Primary Care Associations and the National 
Association  for  Community  Health  Centers—organizations  which  represent  many 
more non-federally funded health centers and clinics nationwide. HRSA asked these 
organizations  to  post  and  distribute  our  DTV  flyer  in  their  clinics  and  to  distribute 
information  to  patients.  ACF  (Administration  for  Children  and  Families)  is  distrib-
uting  information  through  their  1,600  Head  Start  grantees,  covering  more  than 
18,000  centers  around  the  country.  The  Substance  Abuse  and  Mental  Health  Serv-
ices  Administration  (SAMHSA)  is  distributing  DTV  flyers  to  approximately  50,000 
individuals  each  month  who  call  requesting  information.  Other  HHS  agencies  are 
also  distributing  our  flyers,  displaying  our  posters  and  linking  to  our  dtv.gov  web 
page. 

We  have  contacted  social  worker  associations  in  each  of  the  50  states,  plus  the 
District of Columbia and Puerto Rico, and thus far have received commitments from 
over 20 of them to assist us in getting the word out about the DTV transition. These 
include publishing DTV information in their monthly newsletters, distributing DTV 
materials  at  events  and  conferences,  and  establishing  conspicuous  links  to  our 
website,  www.dtv.gov,  so  that  visitors  to  their  web  pages  can  obtain  more  detailed 
information  about  the  DTV  transition  and  the  steps  they  may  need  to  take  to  pre-
pare  for  it.  We  have  also  reached  out  to  representatives  of  the  state  health  depart-
ments in each of the 50 states and U.S. territories, and thus far have received com-
mitments  from  8  of  them  to  assist  in  distributing  DTV  awareness  materials  to  the 
consumers they interact with on a regular basis. These include, for example, posting 
DTV  materials  in  their  service  and  waiting  areas,  distributing  our  fact  sheets  and 
other  publications  at  events  attended  by  consumers,  inserting  DTV  information  in 
mailings  to  consumers,  and  establishing  conspicuous 
links  to  our  website, 
www.dtv.gov  so  that  visitors  to  their  web  pages  can  obtain  more  detailed  informa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

tion  about  the  DTV  transition  and  the  steps  they  may  need  to  take  to  prepare  for 
it. 

In  late  February,  we  posted  a  simplified  DTV  one-page  flyer  on  our  website,  and 
have  offered  it  for  distribution  to  all  our  partners.  This  was  developed  in  response 
to  requests  for  a  more  streamlined,  non-technical,  and  easy  to  read  DTV  informa-
tional flyer. 

In  addition,  on  April  1,  2008,  the  FCC  sponsored  a  DTV  Consumer  Education 
Workshop focusing on reaching low-income consumers. As a result of our panel dis-
cussions,  we  received  several  positive  suggestions  and  offers  of  assistance  from  our 
panelists on how best to reach members of their constituencies with information on 
the  DTV  transition.  We  will  be  providing  the  organizations  represented  with  DTV 
informational materials such as our posters, flyers, and fact sheets that can be dis-
played  at  their  events  and  facilities  throughout  the  country.  The  National  Energy 
Assistance  Directors  Association  offered  to  provide  DTV  information  to  low-income 
consumers  who  sign  up  for  their  program.  We  also  received  a  suggestion  to  submit 
translated  DTV  articles  to  local  foreign  language  publications  in  cities  that  have 
high  concentrations  of  foreign  language  speakers.  Often,  these  publications  are  the 
primary  source  of  news  and  public  interest  information  for  these  consumers.  In  ad-
dition,  as  noted  earlier,  all  eligible  telecommunications  carriers  (‘‘ETCs’’)  that  re-
ceive  Federal  Universal  Service  funds  are  now  required  to  provide  DTV  transition 
information in the monthly bills of their Lifeline/Link-Up customers. 
Rural and Tribal Consumers 

The Commission is also taking specific steps to inform people living in rural areas 
and on tribal lands about the transition to all digital broadcasting. For example, the 
Commission  recently  established  a  partnership  with  the  United  States  Department 
of  Agriculture’s  4–H  office.  On  April  1,  2008,  the  FCC,  with  NTIA  and  USDA,  par-
ticipated  in  the  annual  4–H  Youth  leadership  conference  and  presented  two  ‘‘Train 
the  Trainer’’  seminars  to  approximately  100  youth  members  of  4–H  chapters  from 
the  various  states.  FCC  staff  provided  information  which  these  youth  representa-
tives and their colleagues back home can use to conduct awareness sessions in their 
communities. In addition, each participating representative will receive a ‘‘DTV Out-
reach  Tool  Kit’’  containing  more  extensive  materials  for  conducting  their  outreach 
sessions.  We  understand  that  the  DTV  outreach  that  will  be  performed  by  these 
young  community  leaders  will  assist  them  in  meeting  the  community  service  re-
quirements of their 4–H membership. Another important component of our partner-
ship  with  USDA  is  the  placement  of  DTV  transition  educational  materials  at  state 
and  county  fairs  throughout  the  country  via  sponsoring  4–H  chapters  and  local  ex-
tension service professionals. 

We also have forged a partnership with the Bureau of Indian Affairs. This collabo-
ration has resulted in the distribution of DTV materials throughout Indian Country, 
utilizing  all  50  of  their  nationwide  area  offices.  Commission  staff  has  attended  and 
provided  DTV  materials  at  the  National  Conference  of  American  Indians,  and  the 
Rural  TeleCon  Conference,  with  many  additional  events  planned  for  this  year  such 
as participation in the National Association of Development Organizations in Alaska 
Conference and the Affiliated Tribes of Northwest Indians Annual Conference. 

So  far  this  year,  we  have  presented  at  the  United  South  and  Eastern  Tribes 
(USET) Annual Impact Week, in Arlington, VA and have distributed DTV materials 
at NCAI’s Executive Council Meeting, in Washington, D.C. We are also planning to 
sponsor  an  Indian  Telecommunications  Initiative  (ITI)  in  Salt  Lake  City  later  this 
year. 

Finally,  on  January  31,  2008,  we  held  a  workshop  at  Commission  headquarters 
focused  on  reaching  rural  consumers  and  consumers  living  on  tribal  lands.  We  re-
ceived many useful suggestions at this workshop on how to better reach these com-
munities.  For  instance,  our  DTV  one  page  informational  flyer  is  being  translated 
into  Navajo,  one  of  the  most-spoken  Native  American  languages  in  the  United 
States. 
Conclusion 

The Commission is devoting significant resources to facilitate a smooth transition. 
Nearly every Bureau and Office at the Commission has been involved in this effort 
including our field offices throughout the country. 

We  intend  to  take  whatever  actions  are  necessary  to  minimize  the  potential  bur-
den  the  digital  transition  could  impose  on  consumers  and  maximize  their  ability  to 
benefit  from  it.  The  next  10  months  will  undoubtedly  be  challenging.  Nevertheless, 
it  is  my  hope  that  through  the  combined  efforts  of  government,  industry  and  advo-
cacy  groups  American  consumers  will  reap  the  rewards  that  the  digital  transition 
has to offer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I now call upon Secretary Baker. 

STATEMENT OF MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER, 

ACTING ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR COMMUNICATIONS 
AND INFORMATION, NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 

AND INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Ms. BAKER. Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and mem-
bers  of  the  Committee,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  be-
fore  you  today  to  discuss  the  progress  being  made  by  NTIA  in  im-
plementing  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program,  and  ensuring 
that all Americans—especially those who are reliant on over-the-air 
television,  are  informed  about—and  prepared  for—February  17, 
2009. I am very pleased to report that, since the program’s launch 
on January 1, 2008, substantial progress has been made. 

NTIA  is  focused  on  consumer  education.  In  order  to  reach  our 
most vulnerable populations, NTIA is collaborating with more than 
200 partner organizations with direct communications to the senior 
citizen, rural, low-income, non-English speaking, and disabled com-
munities.  This  includes  social  service  and  community  organiza-
tions, as well as a variety of Federal agencies. 

Trusted  institutions,  such  as  the  NAACP,  AARP,  Spanish-lan-
guage broadcasters, Goodwill, and the Native American Journalists 
Association,  are  just  a  few  examples  of  entities  whose  involvement 
in consumer education is key to reaching these communities. 

The DTV Coalition is also making great strides in educating the 
American  public  about  their  options  for  making  the  transition.  I 
want  to  especially  commend  NAB,  CEA,  and  NCTA  for  their  lead-
ership  in  reaching  out  to  their  viewers  and  customers,  and  for  the 
substantial  resources  they  are  devoting  to  consumer  education 
about the transition. 

We here at NTIA have done over 100 interviews since the begin-
ning  of  the  year.  Secretary  Gutierrez  himself  has  done  over  25 
interviews,  in  English  and  in  Spanish.  Ketchum—our  consumer 
education  contractor—reports  that  there  have  been  over  200  mil-
lion print and broadcast impressions, and more than 1.8 billion on-
line impressions. 

Mr. Chairman, you have rightly emphasized the importance of a 
coordinated  Federal  effort  to  ensure  a  smooth  DTV  transition. 
NTIA  supports  this,  and  is  working  with  the  FCC  to  ensure  we 
take full advantage of the potential Federal mechanisms to educate 
and  inform  the  public.  We  have  to  have  something  more  formal  to 
announce soon. 

NTIA  is  also  working  closely  with  the  Members  of  Congress  and 
their  staffs,  including  several  members  of  this  committee,  in  pre-
paring  for  town  hall  meetings,  franked  mailings,  and  other  con-
stituent  outreach.  Our  customizable  partner  toolkit,  a  copy  of 
which  you  have  in  front  of  you  at  the  dais,  has  become  a  valuable 
resource  for  many  of  these  offices.  We  encourage  every  Congres-
sional  office  to  take  advantage  of  this  resource,  and  offer  any  as-
sistance we can provide. 

We  are  strongly  encouraged  by  the  large  numbers  of  consumers 
who  are  acting  on  the  information  they’ve  received.  The  program 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

launched on January 1, 2008, and as of today, NTIA—working with 
our contractor IBM—has accepted requests for over 10,024,000 cou-
pons  from  over  5.2  million  households.  Forty-eight  percent  of  the 
applications  identify  themselves  as  reliant  on  over-the-air  tele-
vision. 59.9 percent of these applications are coming from the web, 
38.4  percent  are  from  the  phone,  1.4  percent  by  mail,  and  .2  per-
cent by fax. 

Working with manufacturers and retailers, we began to mail out 
coupons  when  we  were  confident  that  there  were  boxes  on  the 
shelves.  We  began  a  nationwide  mailing  of  coupons,  the  week  of 
February  17.  We  mailed  out  350,000  coupons  for  the  first  few 
weeks, to ensure operational success. 

To date, we have mailed out 3.8 million coupons, and at the cur-
rent  mailing  rate  of  over  a  million  coupons  per  week,  we  expect 
that  anyone  who  orders  a  coupon  by  today  will  receive  it  the  first 
week in May. After we catch up with the backlog, we expect coupon 
requests to take 2 to 3 weeks to process. 

As  of  today,  260,000  coupons  have  been  redeemed.  As  the  mem-
bers  of  this  committee  are  well  aware,  the  rate  at  which  coupons 
are  redeemed  is  a  crucial  metric  for  program  management,  and 
we’re monitoring that data very closely. The first 90-day expiration 
period will occur on May 27, 2008. 

As of today, NTIA has certified 67 converter boxes, some of which 
are  being  made  available  for  as  little  as  $45.  The  response  from 
America’s retailers has been outstanding. As of today, the program 
includes  more  than  1,100  participating  retailers,  with  11,448  out-
lets  nationwide,  including  locations  in  all  50  States,  Puerto  Rico 
and the U.S. Virgin Islands. Four of the largest national consumer 
electronics  chains—Best  Buy,  Circuit  City,  RadioShack,  and  Wal- 
Mart—are  accepting  coupons,  and  carrying  coupon-eligible  con-
verter boxes, as are 10 online and 4 phone retailers, and hundreds 
of smaller local retailers. Kmart, Sam’s Club, Sears and Target also 
are expected to be actively participating shortly. 

While  we  are  very  pleased  with  the  progress  of  the  coupon  pro-
gram  to  date,  as  with  any  program  as  large  and  complex  as  this, 
there  are  bound  to  be  challenges  that  arise.  One  challenge  we  are 
addressing  is  how  to  best  meet  the  needs  of  viewers  of  Class  A, 
low-power  television  and  translator  stations.  NTIA  has  just  cer-
tified the 8th box with an analog pass-through capability, and sev-
eral  more  are  in  an  expedited  process  of  being  certified.  All  of  the 
major  retailers  plan  to  carry  at  least  one  model  of  converter  box 
with pass-through capability. 

To  assist  low-power  stations  to  convert  digital  broadcasts,  Con-
gress  set  aside  $65  million  for  equipment  upgrades  to  stations.  I 
want  to  thank  Senator  Snowe  for  her  leadership  in  introducing 
S.  2607,  which  makes  a  critical,  technical  correction  to  the  pro-
gram. NTIA urges the passage of the Snowe bill. 

NTIA  also  has  under  review  proposed  changes  to  address  eligi-
bility  concerns  regarding  residents  of  nursing  homes,  and  those 
who  receive  mail  to  a  post  office  box.  A  draft  Notice  of  Proposed 
Rulemaking is in the final stages of clearance, and we expect to put 
it out for comment soon. 

In  closing  I’d  like  to  thank  the  NTIA  staff  for  the  continuous 
hard  work  that  they  have  put  forward  in  ensuring  the  success  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

both  this  program  and  the  Nation’s  historic  and  important  transi-
tion  to  DTV.  I’d  similarly  like  to  commend  the  members  of  this 
committee  and  their  staff,  who  are  working  with  us  cooperatively 
and constructively in support of these shared goals. 

Thank you, again, for the opportunity to testify before you today, 

and I’d be happy to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Baker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER, ACTING 
ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR COMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION, 

NATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens and Members of the Committee, thank 
you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  progress  being 
made by the National Telecommunications and Information Administration (NTIA), 
Department  of  Commerce,  in  assisting  Americans  to  prepare  for  the  digital  tele-
vision (DTV) transition. In particular, I am pleased to report to you on NTIA’s suc-
cessful launch 3 months ago of the Television Converter Box Coupon Program (Cou-
pon  Program).  Although  the  Program  is  off  to  a  very  good  start,  we  are  still  in  the 
early phases of this important undertaking. In this statement, I will share with you 
the additional steps NTIA is taking to implement the Coupon Program, the agency’s 
ongoing efforts to expand public education and outreach on the DTV transition and 
the Coupon Program, and challenges that we are addressing. 
Coupon Program Data 

As  I  indicated,  NTIA  successfully  launched  the  Coupon  Program  on  January  1, 
2008.  Since  then,  across  the  Nation,  consumers  have  been  ordering  their  coupons 
through  one  of  four  convenient  methods:  via  a  toll-free  number  (1–888–DTV–2009), 
online  at  www.DTV2009.gov,  by  mail  or  by  fax.  The  phone  line  is  available  to  con-
sumers  24  hours  a  day,  7  days  a  week,  with  live  agents  available  at  all  times,  and 
an Interactive Voice Response system is available for English and Spanish-speaking 
callers.  The  phone  line  can  accommodate  requests  in  more  than  150  different  lan-
guages.  A  special  assistance  line  also  is  available  for  the  hearing  impaired  in 
English  and  Spanish.  Braille  application  forms  are  available  for  the  visually  im-
paired.  As  of  April  4,  2008,  approximately  60  percent  of  the  requests  have  been  re-
ceived  through  our  website,  38  percent  by  telephone,  and  1.6  percent  by  mail  and 
fax. Approximately 89 percent of the household requests seek the maximum number 
of two coupons. 

On January 1, NTIA with its partner IBM took requests from over 249,000 appli-
cants requesting 475,000 coupons. Consumers from every state applied on that first 
day.  By  the  end  of  the  first  week,  NTIA  had  received  over  one  million  requests  for 
two  million  coupons.  As  of  April  7,  2008,  NTIA  has  accepted  more  than  5.2  million 
household  requests  for  almost  9.9  million  coupons,  which  represents  approximately 
46 percent of the program’s base funding. Approximately 48 percent of these house-
holds  identified  themselves  as  fully  reliant  on  over-the-air  television.  Consumers 
have begun to purchase converters with the coupons. 

As  of  April  4,  2008,  consumers  have  redeemed  more  than  280,128  coupons.  Be-
cause consumers have only had coupons for a few weeks, it is too early to draw con-
clusions  about  redemption  rates,  which  will  be  the  key  factor  determining  program 
spending. NTIA will continue to monitor redemption rates carefully as a critical fac-
tor  in  the  financial  management  of  the  program.  Our  expectation  is  that  redemp-
tions  will  be  the  greatest  as  consumers  reach  the  end  of  the  first  90-day  expiration 
period. 
Consumer Education and Outreach 

NTIA’s  daily  efforts  working  with  the  media  have  helped  generate  awareness  of 
the  DTV  transition  and  Coupon  Program.  During  these  first  3  months,  the  Coupon 
Program obtained more than 200 million print and broadcast media impressions, as 
well  as  over  1.8  million  online  impressions.  The  high  level  of  interest  in  the  Pro-
gram and the correspondingly high application rate indicate that consumers are be-
coming increasingly aware of the DTV transition and are ready to take action. 

Multiple consumer surveys bear this out: a recent survey released by the Associa-
tion  of  Public  Television  Stations  shows  a  50  percent  jump  in  consumer  awareness 
about  the  transition  in  just  the  last  4  months—from  51  percent  in  November  2007 
to  more  than  76  percent  in  March  2008.  Surveys  conducted  by  Consumers  Union 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

(64 percent) and the Consumer Electronics Association (74 percent) reveal similarly 
high  levels  of  consumer  awareness.  In  other  words,  our  combined  efforts  to  get  the 
word out are succeeding. 

One of the keys to the success of this program is its voluntary nature, which has 
fostered  strong  public-private  partnerships.  As  I  have  discussed  this  issue  with 
other  Federal  officials,  non-profit  leaders,  and  private  sector  organizations  with 
which NTIA is collaborating, I have witnessed their willingness to work together to 
make  the  transition  a  success.  The  industries  most  directly  affected  by  the  transi-
tion  have  initiated  significant  educational  efforts  with  real  financial  commitments 
to  ensure  that  no  household  is  caught  unprepared  on  February  18,  2009.  The  DTV 
Coalition is also making great strides in educating the American public about their 
options for making the transition. 

As  a  complement  to  these  efforts,  NTIA  has  instituted  a  proactive  campaign  to 
educate  consumers  about  the  role  of  the  Coupon  Program  in  the  DTV  transition, 
leveraging  relationships  with  consumer  groups,  community  organizations,  Federal 
agencies,  and  industry  to  inform  consumers  of  their  options.  NTIA  is  collaborating 
with  more  than  200  partner  organizations,  including  social  service  and  community 
organizations  with  ties  to  the  senior  citizens,  rural,  minority,  and  disabled  commu-
nities,  as  well  as  a  variety  of  Federal  agencies  with  direct  communications  with 
other  constituent  groups.  NTIA  is  reaching  out  to  trusted  institutions,  such  as  the 
NAACP,  AARP,  Spanish-language  broadcasters,  and  the  Native  American  Journal-
ists Association to reach populations most likely to be affected by the transition. 

These  groups  are  responding  with  thoughtful  and  creative  ways  to  spread  the 
word  to  their  constituencies  about  the  transition.  A  good  example  is  the  4–H  arm 
of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture’s  (USDA)  Cooperative  State  Research  Edu-
cation  and  Extension  Service  (CSREES).  Collegiate  4–H—the  college  student  4–H 
organization—selected the DTV transition as its 2008 National Service Project topic. 
During  the  year,  each  chapter  must  carry  out  at  least  one  DTV  project  based  on 
lesson-plan material developed by NTIA. A project might include helping vulnerable 
individuals fill out an application or installing their converter boxes. 

NTIA  is  keenly  aware  of  the  need  to  reach  out  to  non-English-speaking  commu-
nities, some of which rely heavily on over-the-air broadcasts. Information about the 
Coupon  Program  is  being  made  available  in  numerous  foreign  languages—Spanish, 
French, Chinese, Vietnamese, Korean, Filipino, and Tagalog. On December 1, 2007, 
Secretary  of  Commerce  Carlos  M.  Gutierrez  was  featured  in  the  first  of  a  series  of 
public  service  programs  entitled,  ‘‘TV  Digital  . . .  ¿Que  Tal?’’  aired  throughout  the 
United  States  and  Puerto  Rico  by  the  Spanish-language  Univision  Television  Net-
work. The program discussed the benefits of digital television broadcasting and pro-
vided  detailed  information  about  the  need  for  viewers  that  rely  on  over-the-air 
broadcasting to obtain digital-to-analog converter boxes to continue to use their ana-
log television sets, and how to access the Coupon Program to obtain coupons for the 
purchase of boxes. 

Just  last  week,  NTIA  kicked  off  ‘‘Digital  Television:  Experience  the  Benefits,’’  a 
consumer  education  campaign  we  are  coordinating  with  local  organizations  across 
the  country  to  educate  consumers  about  the  benefits  of  DTV  and  the  TV  Converter 
Box  Coupon  Program.  Our  initial  event  on  March  31st  gave  consumers  an  oppor-
tunity to ‘‘Ask the Experts’’ at RadioShack’s flagship store in Fort Worth, Texas. To-
morrow,  Secretary  Gutierrez  will  discuss  the  digital  television  transition  in  Fort 
Worth,  Texas,  and  later  in  the  week  will  travel  to  McAllen,  Texas—one  of  the  Na-
tion’s  highest  over-the-air  television  markets—for  a  similar  event.  NTIA  will  con-
tinue to work with an ever-increasing number of interested industry and community 
groups  to  ensure  that  information  about  the  DTV  transition  reaches  these  non- 
English-speaking communities as broadly and often as possible. 

While  relevant  industry  segments  are  taking  the  initiative  to  ensure  their  con-
sumers  have  the  information  to  navigate  the  transition,  the  Federal  Government 
has  a  role  in  ensuring  that  all  population  groups,  particularly  those  that  are  least 
likely  to  receive  industry-produced  information,  and  those  more  likely  to  rely  on 
over-the-air  television,  receive  a  consistent  and  accurate  message.  Recognizing  the 
importance  of  such  a  holistic  approach  from  the  start,  NTIA  hosted  a  meeting  on 
January 24, 2008, with more than 15 other Federal agencies, including the Federal 
Communications Commission; the Departments of Veterans Affairs and Agriculture, 
the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services’  Administration  on  Aging;  and  the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Federal  Emergency  Management  Agency,  to 
further  coordinate  Federal  efforts  to  educate  the  Nation  about  the  February  17, 
2009, deadline to transition to digital television. During the meeting, NTIA outlined 
its  current  and  upcoming  consumer  education  efforts,  and  the  agencies  discussed 
their strategies and existing communications efforts to raise consumer awareness of 
the DTV transition and the Coupon Program. The response from agencies has been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

positive.  For  example,  the  Department  of  Veterans  Affairs  (VA)  has  made  a  con-
certed  effort  to  educate  its  employees,  veterans,  and  their  families  about  the  DTV 
transition and Coupon Program. Among other things, the VA has publicized the Pro-
gram through Vanguard magazine, VA News, the American Veterans, and the Pen-
tagon  channel.  It  has  distributed  Coupon  Program  information  to  National  Veteran 
Services Organizations such as the American Legion, VFW, Disabled American Vet-
erans, Paralyzed Veterans Associations, AMVETS, and the Vietnam Veterans Asso-
ciation. 

NTIA  has  worked  with  IBM  and  Ketchum,  the  subcontractor  with  expertise  in 
public  outreach  efforts  related  to  the  Program,  to  develop  a  comprehensive  toolkit 
of  information  to  help  organizations  that  are  playing  a  critical  role  in  educating 
their  members,  constituents  and  customers  about  the  Coupon  Program.  Available 
for  use  since  January  1,  2008,  the  Toolkit  attempts  to  offer  simple  tips  and  rec-
ommendations  to  help  each  organization  reach  its  members  with  information  about 
the  Coupon  Program  in  a  way  that  will  resonate  best  with  them.  The  Toolkit  con-
sists  of  a  set  of  materials,  including  fact  sheets,  a  poster,  a  mailer,  sample  presen-
tations and other materials that can be co-branded for use by partners. The Toolkit 
also  contains  specific  tools  and  strategies  that  can  be  used  to  reach  the  media  to 
effectively deliver the Coupon Program message, and ideas and resources for inform-
ing consumers through community and in-store events or other activities. 

The  Toolkit  includes  four  sections,  each  of  which  can  be  used  on  its  own,  or  in 

conjunction with other parts of the Toolkit: 

• Program Background. This section includes background information on the DTV 
transition  and  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program.  Partners  are  strongly 
encouraged  to  familiarize  themselves  with  the  Coupon  Program  and  with  what 
consumers told us they want to know. 
• Development  and  Dissemination  of  Messages  and  Materials.  This  section  in-
cludes  a  series  of  tailored  messages  about  the  Coupon  Program  that  partners 
can incorporate into their own materials to explain how to apply for and redeem 
coupons.  The  messages  have  been  tested  in  consumer  focus  groups  to  ensure 
that  they  are  easily  understood  and  have  been  reviewed  by  NTIA  for  accuracy 
and  consistency.  This  section  also  outlines  the  ready-made  materials  available 
for downloading, co-branding and use by all partners. 
• Communicating  Through  the  Media.  This  section  provides  guidance  and  ideas 
for generating ‘‘earned media’’ coverage through television, radio, print or online 
information  sources.  The  information  in  this  section  ranges  from  ideas  for  con-
ducting proactive media outreach, to placing public service announcements and 
tips on conducting a solid media interview. 
• Conducting  Outreach  Activities.  The  Toolkit  includes  creative  ideas  for  commu-
nicating  about  the  Coupon  Program  through  existing  organizational  resources, 
as well as developing events and activities that focus specifically on the TV Con-
verter Box Coupon Program. 

The Toolkit also is an extremely useful resource for Members of Congress seeking 
to communicate to their constituents about the Coupon Program. NTIA has worked 
closely with many offices to help prepare materials for town hall meetings, franked 
mailings,  and  other  outreach,  including  to  senior  centers  and  other  critical-to-reach 
groups. 
Manufacturer and Retailer Participation 

NTIA  has  been  very  pleased  with  the  high  level  of  participation  in  the  Coupon 
Program,  both  by  converter  box  manufacturers  and  consumer  electronics  retailers. 
As  of  today,  NTIA  has  certified  66  converter  boxes,  each  designed  for  the  exclusive 
statutory  purpose  of  enabling  a  consumer  to  view  digital  broadcast  signals  on  an 
analog television. 

NTIA’s  rules  also  permit  certain  other  features,  including  the  ability  to  pass- 
through  analog  broadcast  signals.  These  boxes  can  be  found  at  leading  retailers  for 
as  little  as  $45.  We  are  continuing  to  review  and  certify  boxes  as  manufacturers 
come into this Program. A complete list of converter boxes certified to date is avail-
able on NTIA’s website, and is attached to my testimony. 

The response from America’s retailers has been similarly outstanding. As of April 
1, 2008, the Program includes more than 1,100 participating retailers. These retail-
ers  represent  11,448  participating  outlets  nationwide,  including  locations  in  all  50 
states,  Puerto  Rico  and  the  U.S.  Virgin  Islands.  Participating  retailers  include  four 
of  the  largest  consumer  electronics  retailers—Best  Buy,  Circuit  City,  RadioShack, 
and  Wal-Mart—as  well  as  hundreds  of  smaller  retailers.  NTIA  expects  four  other 
large retailers—Kmart, Sam’s Club, Sears and Target—to participate shortly. Addi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

tionally,  consumers  can  choose  from  among  seven  online  retailers  and  three  phone 
retailers. In short, consumers—even those in areas where the closest consumer elec-
tronics  retailer  is  fifty  or  one  hundred  miles  away—will  have  ready  access  to  cou-
pon-eligible converter boxes. 

At  the  request  of  many  of  these  retailers,  NTIA  has  made  information  available 
about the number of coupons requested not only on a per state basis but now based 
on 5-digit zip code. NTIA and IBM have made employee training materials available 
to  all  participating  retailers  so  that  they  will  be  ready  to  answer  consumers’  ques-
tions  about  certified  boxes  and  the  use  of  the  coupon  for  payment.  Participating 
stores have completed certification in the Coupon Program and indicated that their 
employees  are  trained,  they  have  converter  box  inventory  in  their  stores,  and  their 
systems  are  prepared  to  redeem  coupons.  Participating  retailers  can  be  found  on 
www.DTV2009.gov under ‘‘Locate a Retailer Near You.’’ 

We  are  pleased  with  the  progress  that  has  been  made  in  these  first  few  months 
of  the  Coupon  Program’s  operational  phase  and  we  are  confident  our  continued, 
combined  and  cooperative  efforts  will  only  add  to  this  success  to  the  benefit  of  all 
Americans, as well as other stakeholders such as public safety entities. 
Addressing Challenges That Arise 

That  said,  as  with  any  program  as  large  and  complex  as  this,  there  are  bound 
to  be  bumps  in  the  road  and  challenges  that  arise.  NTIA  currently  faces  several 
such challenges and is working diligently to resolve them as quickly as possible and 
in a manner that serves the best interests of the American people. 

NTIA  is  concerned  about  how  to  best  meet  the  needs  of  viewers  of  Class  A,  low- 
power television and television translator stations. As this Committee is well aware, 
these  stations  are  not  subject  to  the  February  17,  2009,  analog  broadcasting  cutoff 
deadline, and viewers of these stations who wish to continue receiving these analog 
broadcasts  as  well  as  the  new  digital  signals  after  the  February  17,  2009  deadline 
may  choose  to  get  a  converter  box  that  includes  an  analog  signal  pass-through  fea-
ture.  When  the  Coupon  Program  regulations  were  issued,  NTIA  asked  manufactur-
ers  to  take  this  into  consideration  in  the  development  of  certified  converter  boxes. 
At  the  same  time,  NTIA  asked  manufacturers  interested  in  including  this  feature 
to  investigate  options  that  would  provide  an  acceptable  analog  signal  pass-through 
with minimal signal loss. On February 5, 2008, I sent a letter to each of the prospec-
tive  converter  box  manufacturers  involved  in  the  certification  process  to  once  again 
encourage  them  to  consider  the  needs  of  all  viewers,  including  the  viewers  of  Class 
A,  low-power  television,  and  television  translator  stations,  in  the  development  of 
converter boxes for the Coupon Program. Currently, NTIA has certified seven boxes 
with an analog pass-through capability, and several more are in the testing process 
of  becoming  certified.  NTIA  highlights  boxes  with  this  feature  on  the  Program’s 
website  and  in  consumer  mailings  with  the  coupons.  In  addition,  NTIA  has  sent 
helpful  information  to  operators  of  Class  A,  low-power  television  and  television 
translator  stations  so  that  they  can  inform  their  viewers  of  the  options  they  have 
regarding the digital transition. 

Congress  set  aside  a  total  of  $75  million  in  auction  proceeds  to  fund  two  grant 
programs that will assist eligible Class A, low-power television, and television trans-
lator stations to make the transition as quickly and smoothly as possible. The Low- 
Power Television and Translator Digital-to-Analog Conversion Program will provide 
$1,000 to eligible low-power stations that must purchase a digital-to-analog conver-
sion  device  to  convert  the  incoming  digital  signal  of  a  full-power  television  station 
to  analog  for  transmission  on  the  low-power  station’s  analog  channel.  To  date,  213 
grants  have  been  awarded  under  this  program.  Applications  will  be  accepted  until 
February 17, 2009. 

Of course, stations that operate at less than full power will eventually convert to 
digital  broadcasts.  The  Low-Power  Television  and  Television  Translator  Upgrade 
Program  established  by  Congress  directs  NTIA  to  assist  this  effort  through  a  pro-
gram  that  provides  $65  million  for  equipment  upgrades  to  stations  in  eligible  rural 
communities. To implement this program in a timely manner, a technical correction 
to  the  program  authorization  is  required  to  permit  the  agency  to  begin  making 
funds  available  during  Fiscal  Year  2009.  S.  2607,  which  Senator  Snowe  has  intro-
duced, would make this correction. NTIA will continue to work with the FCC, indus-
try  and  the  broadcast  community  to  assist  low-power  television  stations  and  their 
viewers during the transition to digital broadcasting. 

As the Coupon Program moves forward, NTIA will continue to address challenges 
and  work  diligently  to  resolve  issues  that  arise.  For  example,  NTIA  is  currently 
looking  at  concerns  about  program  eligibility,  including  for  residents  of  nursing 
homes  and  applicants  who  use  a  post  office  box.  NTIA  is  finalizing  proposed  rule 
changes  and  expects  to  release  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  in  near  future. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Changes to the rule, at this stage, will pose challenges for the Program, but we will 
meet those challenges. 

Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  today.  I  will  be  happy 

to answer your questions. 

ATTACHMENT 

Coupon Eligible Converter Boxes 04/07/08 

AccessHD DTA1010D 
AccessHD DTA1010U 
AccessHD DTA1020D 
AccessHD DTA1020U 
AMTC AT–2016 
Apex DT1001 
Apex DT1002 
Artec T3A 
Artec T3APro 
CASTi CAX–01 
Channel Master CM–7000 
Coship N9900T 
Denca DAC–100 
Denca NL8118 
Denca NL8119 
Denca TBX1005A 
Digital Stream D2A1D10 
Digital Stream D2A1D20 
Digital Stream DSP6500R 
Digital Stream DSP7500T 
Digital Stream DSP7700T* 
Digital Stream DTX9900 
Digital Stream DX8700* 
Echostar TR–40* 
Fuyai ATSC 630 
GE 22729 
GE 22730 
Goodmind DTA1000 
Goodmind DTA900 
Goodmind DTA980 
Gridlink GLT–200 
Gridlink GLT–300 
Insignia NS–DXA1 

* Analog pass-through capable converter. 

Kingbox K8V1 
Kingbox K8V8 
Lasonic LTA–260 
Lasonic LTR–260 
MAG CCB7707 
Magnavox TB–100MG9 * 
Magnavox TB100MW9 
MaxMedia MMDTVB03 
MicroGem MG2000 
Microprose MPI–500 
Mustek MAT–K50 
Olevia DTA100 
Philco TB100HH9 * 
Philco TB150HH9 * 
RCA DTA 800A 
RCA DTA 800B 
RCA DTA800B1 * 
Sansonic FT300A 
Sansonic FT300RT 
Skardin DTR–0727 
SVA DAC100 
Synergy Global Supply SYN2009 
Tatung TDB3000 
Tivax STB–T9 
Tunbow Electronics E60010 
Venturer STB7766G 
Winegard RC–DT09 
Zenith DTT900 
Zentech DF2000 
Zinwell ZAT–756A 
Zinwell ZAT–856 
Zinwell ZAT–857 
Zinwell ZAT–970 

[The  document  entitled  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program—A 
Guide  for  Partnership  Activities  has  been  retained  in  Committee 
files.] 

The CHAIRMAN. Madam Secretary, thank you very much. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much. 
And  Mr.  Martin,  Chairman,  we  have  looked  through  your  full 
statement, I commend you for the depth of your report to the Com-
mittee, as far as what you’re trying to do to make sure that every-
one has heard about this process. 

Have you given any thought to what the fallback is for those peo-
ple  who  don’t  get  the  word,  and  suddenly  find  that  they’ve  got— 
they’re cut off? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  our  first  and  primary  goal  is  to  make 
sure  that  everyone  is  aware  of  it,  as  much  as  possible.  Obviously 
the  transition  is  going  to  occur,  by  law,  next  February,  so  they’ll 
all be impacted at that time. But, I think our most important thing 
that  we  can  do  is  continue  to  try  to  get  the  word  out  in  more  and 
diverse forms. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

We  have  given  some  thought  to  some  of  the  suggestions  by  one 
of  my  colleagues,  Commissioner  Copps,  of  trying  to  identify  a  test 
market,  to  try  to  go  through  a  test  kind  of  a  transition  at  some 
point  between  now  and  then,  so  that  we  could  see  just  how  many 
consumers  are  unaware,  or  we  have  not  been  able  to  reach,  so  we 
can figure out how to better tailor our message. But, I think that’s 
the  extent  of  what  we’ve  given,  as  far  as  thoughts  as  far  as  a  fall-
back. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  had  in  mind  something  like  what  we 
see  every  once  in  a  while  on  the  screen  or  hear  over  the  radio, 
‘‘This  is  a  test,  this  is  a  test,  this  is  a  test,  in  the  event  there  was 
an  emergency,  this  is  where  you  would  get  your  information,  et 
cetera,’’ have you thought at all about the power of the Commission 
to  ask  all  broadcasters,  all—everyone  in  the  industry  to  start  a 
process  sometime  this  fall  saying,  in  effect,  ‘‘do  you  know,  do  you 
know,  do  you  know?  On  the  date  below  this  system  is  going  to 
change,  and  you  must  be  ready  for  it.’’?  Is  there  any  real  reason 
to pursue that kind of approach? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  We  did  adopt  a  requirement  that  all  the  broad-
casters were either required to go through a series of public service 
announcements with very specific language about what’s coming up 
on  the  DTV  transition,  or  to  follow—as  a  safe  harbor—the  NAB’s 
proposal  of  a  series  of  both  over-the-air  public  service  announce-
ments  and  screen  crawls,  or  other  ways  to  identify  to  their  con-
sumers. 

We  haven’t  explicitly,  thought  about  utilizing  the  Emergency 
Broadcast  Warning  message,  that  kind  of,  ‘‘This  is  a  test,’’  so  to 
speak.  But  we  have  required  the  broadcasters  to  either  follow  our 
plan or the NAB’s plan, one of the two. 

So, they will all be having to undergo increasing numbers of pub-
lic  service  announcements  and  screen  crawls,  like  the  Emergency 
Warning  System,  but  we  don’t  actually  use  that  kind  of  wording, 
and we can certainly consider whether or not that should be incor-
porated—I  would  be  concerned  that  we  don’t  want  to  confuse  peo-
ple that an emergency has actually occurred. 

Senator  STEVENS.  No,  I  don’t  mean  call  it  an  emergency,  but  a 
warning  that  something  has  to  be  done.  Too  many  people  on 
these—answering  these  polls  indicate  they  don’t  know  that  this 
process is coming at all. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  certainly,  one  of  the  things  we’re  most  con-
cerned  is  that,  while  there  is  an  increasing  number  of  people  that 
know the DTV transition is occurring, they don’t know what they’re 
going  to  do  about  it  or  what  to  do.  And  I  think  that’s  as  much  of 
a concern, as well—not only making sure everyone knows about it, 
but that they know what they need to do about it. 

So  like  I  said,  I  think  you  are  going  to  see  an  increasing  fre-
quency  by  broadcasters  and  by  all  the  different  people  that  the 
Commission regulates, and all the people involved in the transition 
with providing increasing consumer information. 

You know, we’re requiring bill inserts, not only in the cable oper-
ators’  bills,  but  in  all  of  those  telecommunications  providers  who 
receive  Universal  Service  support.  We  are,  requiring  a  whole  host 
of ways, trying to get an additional message out. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

But, certainly broadcasters are a critical—and the most critical— 

component of getting that message out. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Ms.  Baker,  do  you  think  your  agency  has  any 
burden to follow through to make certain that people have learned 
of this transition? 

Ms. BAKER. Absolutely. And I think that the consumer education 
campaign  is  beginning  to  work.  We  have  devoted  the  first  third  of 
our  consumer  education  money  in  developing  the  materials—some 
of which you see in front of you—and the second two-thirds will be 
in outreach to the media markets. 

I  think  it’s  important  to  note  that  the  coupon  program  actually 
runs through March 31st—Congress was very smart when they did 
that—so that, for those people who actually don’t turn on their tel-
evision that often, but they turn it on, on February 20-somethingth 
or March 15th—that they can still get a coupon, and they can still 
get  a  converter  box—they’re  valid,  obviously,  for  90  days.  So,  the 
last  coupon  mail  outs  will  go  out  on  March  31st,  and  be  valid  for 
90 days. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  think  we  all  just  pray  that  it  works.  I 
do wonder about those people that are in the rural areas that real-
ly  rely  on  the  system,  but  don’t  pay  any  attention  to  it,  in  effect. 
I think we’ve got to find some way to make certain that these peo-
ple  are  contacted,  and  it’s  going  to  be  a  problem  for  us—particu-
larly those of us who live in the rural areas. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  told  that  in  my  second-largest  city,  Fair-
banks,  about  40  percent  of  the  people  still  depend  upon  over-the- 
air  broadcast.  They’re  the  most  involved  in  this  transition,  aren’t 
they?  They’re  the  most  affected  by  it,  I  would  say,  do  you  agree 
with that? 

Mr. MARTIN. Oh, absolutely. 
Senator STEVENS. Well, is there any particular requirement that 
the broadcasters report to you that they have contacted the people 
they serve, in their area? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Oh,  yes.  Not  only  is  there  a  requirement  for  how 
many  public  service  announcements,  screen  crawls  and  other 
things  they’re  supposed  to  be  doing,  but  there  is  a  requirement 
they provide on a quarterly basis, between now and the transition, 
an update on exactly what they’ve been doing, provide it to us, and 
put  it  in  their  public  file,  in  terms  of  what  they’ve  been  doing  to 
educate  their  consumers,  in  the  content  of  what  they,  of  the  mes-
sage they’ve been putting it in. 

Senator  STEVENS.  They’re  not  easy  to  contact,  they  don’t  get  a 
bill  for  services,  they  just  turn  on  their  set,  and  listen.  And  I’m 
most worried about those, or elderly who live in the rural areas at 
finding  ways  to  connect  with  them.  So,  if  you  have  any  ideas  of 
what we might do, those in public office would appreciate it. 

Mr. MARTIN. OK. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Mr. MARTIN. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Smith? 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Ms. Baker, you heard, perhaps, in my opening statement concern 
expressed  for  those  living  in  assisted-living  facilities  and  nursing 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

homes—do  you  have  an  estimate  of  how  many  folks  we’re  talking 
about who will be impacted by the DTV transition? 

Ms.  BAKER.  Well,  you  know,  when  the  rule  was  developed,  we 
were  at  the  Department  of  Commerce  and  the  statute  said  for  us 
to  give  a  coupon—up  to  two  coupons  to  each  U.S.  household.  So, 
we  looked  down  the  hall  to  the  Census,  and  we  used  the  Census 
definition  of  household.  Unfortunately,  of  course,  that  excludes 
group  housing,  which  is,  in  fact,  nursing  homes  and  assisted  liv-
ing—— 

Senator  SMITH.  Do  I  understand  you’re  changing  a  rule  on  that, 

so that they can get them? 

Ms. BAKER. We are. 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Ms. BAKER. We are. That NPRM should be out shortly. But what 
we  wanted  to  make  sure  is  that  for  those  who  are  in  nursing 
homes,  we  could  actually  provide  them  the  assistance  they  need. 
Sometimes those in nursing homes can’t actually call up, get a cou-
pon, go get a box. So, we wanted to make sure guardians could also 
effectuate this transition for them, as well as possibly the adminis-
trators of the nursing homes. 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  you’re  going  to  go  a  long  way  toward  solv-
ing the problem for many elderly Americans, if you get over the as-
sisted  living  and  nursing  home  issues.  And  so  I  simply  draw  your 
attention to that and encourage that. 

Several have commented on the repeater relay of these signals— 
translators,  as  we  call  them  in  my  area.  They’re  not  converting 
until  2010,  or  2012.  I’ve  got  400  translators  in  my  State,  serving 
rural  Oregonians.  Do  they  have  to  get  TV  converter  boxes  to  con-
tinue to receive their programming after February 2009? 

Ms.  BAKER.  What  they’ll  need  is  an  analog  pass-through  box,  or 

a splitter for a regular box. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  I  understand  there  is  a  shortage  of  those? 
Ms.  BAKER.  There  should  be  enough  of  these  boxes  in  major 
stores nationwide by the beginning of May. Currently, there is only 
one that’s being sold, online and by phone. 

Senator SMITH. OK, but that’s happening? 
Ms. BAKER. Indeed. 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Commissioner  Martin,  a  recent  Nielson  Report  ranked  Portland, 
Oregon dead last in terms of preparedness for DTV transition. The 
report  cited  a  high  number  of  viewers  who  receive  their  television 
over-the-air only, and a lack of understanding of how the transition 
will affect them, as contributing factors. 

Further adding to the confusion, 15 stations in Oregon—three of 
which serve Portland—will have transition, will be transitioning to 
a  different  channel  post.  These  channel  changes  will  require  the 
stations to power down their broadcasts, I understand, sometime in 
October—so what is this, this is even ahead of February 2009. Can 
you  assure  me  that  viewer  disruption  will  be  minimized  by  those 
served  by  stations  in  my  State  that  are  changing,  literally,  their 
posting, their channel site? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  can’t  assure  you  that  they  are  going  to  be  mini-
mizing  the  amount  of  consumer  disruption.  Indeed,  we’ve  tried  to 
make sure that they’re making those kind of changes as late in this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

process as possible, to ensure that we’re minimizing that consumer 
disruption. 

They’re  also  required  to  notify  the  consumers,  starting  30  days 
before they make any of those changes, that they will be having to 
begin  powering  down,  to  make  some  of  the  technical  changes  they 
will need to turn on their final digital system. 

So,  we’re  not  only  trying  to  minimize  that,  but  we’re  also  trying 

to make sure they inform consumers ahead of time. 

Senator  SMITH.  That’s  the  reason,  Mr.  Chairman,  why  I  raised 
the  Ducks  and  the  Beavers  football  game,  because  this  is  going  to 
hit  during  football  season,  not  just  in  February.  And  so  I’m  highly 
focused on that. 

And  I  thank  you  both  for  all  you’re  doing,  and  I  just  encourage 

more of it. 

And, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. And again, thank you 
for  keeping  the  focus  on  this  issue,  because  it’s  a  very  important 
issue. 

Chairman  Martin,  thank  you  for  coming  in  last  week  to  talk 
about a variety of issues. I appreciate your time and your consider-
ation on those issues. 

But let me start, if I may, with Secretary Baker. As I understand 
it,  Secretary  Baker,  you  considered  making  analog  pass-through  a 
converter  box  requirement,  but  chose  not  to.  Why  did  you  choose 
to not do that? 

Ms. BAKER. We did it for a couple of reasons. The first being that 
not  all  viewers  are  going  to  need  it.  And  when  we  had  our  Notice 
of  Proposed  Rulemaking  out  there,  we  received  comments  that  it 
actually degraded the signal by 3 DBs, which is roughly 50 percent. 
So,  for  those  who  didn’t  need  this  pass-through  function,  it  would 
degrade the digital viewing. And we also heard—from manufactur-
ers—that it was going to cost more. 

So,  what  we  did,  was  we  made  it  a  permitted,  not  required,  fea-
ture,  as  we  did  with  other  features,  such  as  Smart  Antennas,  En-
hanced Programming Guides, the ENERGY STAR certification. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And—but  if  I  understand  your  response  to  Sen-
ator Smith’s questions a few moments ago, if you want to get a low- 
power  signal,  then  probably  since  those  are  not  required  to  transi-
tion  for  another,  what,  year  or  so  after  this,  if  you  want  to  receive 
that, you will need that pass-through box? 

Ms. BAKER. That’s right. We’re working with the low-power com-
munity to help educate their viewers that to continue to receive the 
channels  that  they’re  watching,  they  will  need  to  buy  an  analog 
pass-through box. 

Senator PRYOR. And I was jotting something down when you said 
this, but there is a Senate bill that you have encouraged us to look 
at, is it S.—what did you say, S. 2657? Two six—— 

Ms. BAKER. Twenty-six oh seven. 
Senator PRYOR.—oh seven. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Ms.  BAKER.  Right.  It’s  the  technical  correction  for  the  $65  mil-

30 

lion, for the upgrade for the low-powers. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  And  if,  in  your  view,  if  the  Congress  were 
to  pass  that,  and  the  President  were  to  sign  it,  would  it  take  care 
of some of the concerns that the low-powers have right now? 

Ms.  BAKER.  Yes,  because  it’s  the  digital  transition,  and  it  would 

help the low-power stations to actually upgrade to digital. 

Senator PRYOR. Chairman Martin, since we’re talking about low- 
power,  you  know,  for  example  in  my  State,  I  heard  what  Senator 
Smith said about his, I think I have a total of—I’d have to think— 
12  or  maybe  13  traditional,  over-the-air  broadcast  stations  that 
people think of, but I think I have a total of 83 low-power stations 
in  my  State,  and  obviously,  a  lot  of  them  are  very  small  and  very 
localized. 

But, when you have gone through this transition, this digital tel-
evision  transition,  did  the  FCC  make  any  special  accommodations, 
or  give  any  special  attention  to  low-power?  Or  was  that,  sort  of  a 
second-tier issue? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  we  have  tried  to  work  to  give  some 
special  attention  to  low-power,  in  large  part,  the  Commission  and 
Congress  didn’t  require  that  low-power  stations  make  the  transi-
tion  during  the  same  time-frame,  because  of  concerns  that  low- 
power  stations  had  raised  about  the  financial  implications  for 
that—that they didn’t have enough money to be able to buy all that 
equipment.  That  was  part  of  the  reason  why  Congress  allocated 
them some additional funding, to make that transition. 

So,  we  do  allow  the  low-power  stations  to  make  that  transition 
today,  if  they  want  to,  they’re  just  not  required  to,  the  same  way 
the full-power stations are. 

Senator PRYOR. Yes, I do think that resources are a big issue for 

most low-power stations. 

Last,  Secretary  Baker,  let  me  point  something  out  that  was  in 
this  weekend’s  Washington  Post  by  Rob  Pegoraro—I’m  not  quite 
sure  how  to  pronounce  his  name.  He  may  be  here—if  you’re  here, 
I’m sorry for mispronouncing your name. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  But,  it’s  about  someone  trying  to  get  on 
DTV2009.gov and not being able to—did you see this little blurb in 
the Washington Post? 

Ms. BAKER. I didn’t see this one. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Apparently,  there  is  just  a,  sort  of  a  technical 
problem  that  if  you  don’t  type  in  the  exact  right  website  address, 
or  something  like  that,  then  you  start  to  get  errors  or  something. 
So,  I’ll  give  this  to  you  before  you  leave,  and  I  think  it  would  just 
be  good  for  John  Q.  Public  out  there  if  we  made  sure  that  our 
websites, that we’re up and running, we’re running correctly—even 
with  a  little  margin  of  error,  they  still  would  be  running  correctly. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
You know, we always talk about the digital revolution, and then 
the digital divide, so now we’re going to talk about the digital cliff. 
And  what  I’m  concerned  about  is  that  if  everything  goes  well,  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

consumers,  say,  get  their  converter  boxes,  and  they  get  coupons,  if 
they  want  to  get  those  coupons,  and  they  redeem  them  and  they 
bring  the  converter  boxes  home  and  they  figure  out  how  to  attach 
them  properly  to  their  set,  for  some  of  them  there  will  still  be  a 
problem.  And  if  those  viewers  are  in  rural  areas  where  they  al-
ready have kind of a snowy signal for their analog TV, as I under-
stand it, and that means their signal is weak, it may be necessary 
for  that  group  of  consumers—even  though  we’re  saying,  ‘‘Get  this 
converter  box,  and  you’re  OK,’’  to  also  get  a  new  antenna,  in  addi-
tion to getting a converter box. And I’m just wondering if you know 
what percentage of consumers will need a new antenna, in addition 
to a converter box, so as to be prepared for the transition. 

And what I understand, the reason they call this going down the 
digital cliff is that if they don’t have this antenna, their picture will 
be completely blank, even if they have the converter box. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  One  of  the  benefits  of  a  digital,  over  an  analog  sig-
nal, is that if you’re able to get a signal, it’s better. So, for the peo-
ple that have a snowy picture, and are able to get reception—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Correct. 
Mr.  MARTIN.—it’s  going  to  be  increased—it’s  going  to  be  better. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. I agree. 
Mr. MARTIN. But they’re—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. But I think they might be a little surprised 

if they get no picture. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  That’s  right—but  for  the  ones  on  the  other  side  of 
that  cliff,  so  to  speak,  the  ones  that  are  fuzzy  enough  that  they 
won’t be able to, you’re right, they’ll need to get an antenna. 

Our  engineers  estimate  that—that  could  affect  approximately  5 

percent of those viewers. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  that’s  how  many—how  many  people  do 

we think have analog right now, in the Nation? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, there is—— 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I’m  just  thinking  in  Minnesota,  430,000  if 
you  roughly  say  10  percent—that’s,  you  know,  40,000  people.  So, 
it’s a lot. 

Mr. MARTIN. There’s about—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Or, 40,000 households. 
Mr. MARTIN. It’ll affect 5 percent—it could affect 5 percent of the 
households,  but  there  is  no  guarantee  that  that  5  percent  of  the 
households  would  be  ones  that  are  over-the-air  viewers.  In  other 
words,  5  percent  of  the  households  on  the  edge  could  be  impacted 
by  this,  but  that  doesn’t  mean  that  some  of  them  may  not  be  sub-
scribing to cable or satellite. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Mr. MARTIN. So, if you assume that 5 percent of those homes on 
the  edge  could  be  adversely  impacted,  then  it’s  only  15  percent  of 
those, on average, that are over-the-air viewers, it could be slightly 
higher in those rural areas—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. So—— 
Mr.  MARTIN.—than  15  percent.  So,  it’s  more  like  15,  20,  25  per-

cent of the 5 percent of homes. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. I see. 
Mr. MARTIN. But I do think that it will have that impact. That’s 
our engineers’ best estimates. The only place where there has been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

a  similar  transition  is  in  the  U.K.,  where  they’ve  attempted  to  do 
this in several different markets, they estimate that it’s turned out 
to  be  about  5  to  10  percent,  again,  of  those  people  on  the  edges  of 
the community that would need to get a new one. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And so, are these antennas that need to go 

on their TV, or go on their roof? How expensive are they? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  It  would  probably  impact  you,  depending  on  wher-
ever  your  antenna  is  today,  so  it  could  be  the  ones  on  top  of  your 
TV, or on top of your roof wherever you need to place the antenna 
to be able to get that signal today. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. So, do we know how much it’s going to cost 

to put a new antenna in? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  There  are  a  variety—again,  it  could  vary  dramati-
cally,  there  are  a  variety  of  antennas  that  are  available,  and  that 
are  already  being  marketed  by  the  consumer  electronics  industry, 
and they vary quite dramatically in price. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  I  would  have  to  get  back  to  you  to  get  you  the 

exact—— 

it. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. But it could be around a hundred bucks, or 

something like that, or—— 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  will  have  to  get  back  to  you  for  the  estimates  of 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
What  are  you  doing  to  educate  people  about  this?  Do  you  have 
special  ads  for  people  with  fuzzy  signals?  I’m  just  trying  to—I 
mean, these are people that are going to think they did everything 
right,  because  they  got  their  converter  box,  and  then  suddenly 
they’re  going  to  have  no  signal  at  all.  So,  what  are  we  going  to  do 
for those—and I’m sure they’re hard to ferret out, but I’m—— 

Mr. MARTIN. As I say, part of the challenge is that it will be very 
difficult  to  figure  out  exactly  which  of  those  consumers  they  are 
until we actually try to begin the process of the transition. 

So,  it’ll  be  very  difficult  to  end  up  figuring  out  who  those  con-
sumers  are,  until  they  actually  get  the  converter  box  and  try  to 
plug it in and get a signal. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. Has the government published any de-
tailed  information  on  this?  I  know  it’s  on  the  FCC  website,  I  just 
haven’t  heard  us  talking  as  much  about  this.  And  I  think  it  will 
involve,  you  know,  percentage-wise  it  may  be  small,  but  a  lot  of 
people  when  you  look  across  the  country,  who  are  in  very  remote 
areas, so—— 

Mr.  MARTIN.  We  do  have  enough—having  some  information,  so 
do  some  of  the  industry  groups,  particularly  consumer  electronics 
industries.  There’s  actually  a  website  that  they  have  that  you  can 
go in and type in your address, and they try to indicate what kind 
of antenna you might need, if you need another antenna. 

So  there  is  a  method  for  people  that  want  to  go  to  determine 
whether  they  would  need  a  new  antenna,  there  is  a  best  estimate, 
again,  that’s  no  guarantee,  that’s  just  some  of  their  models,  to  de-
termine what kind of antenna—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR.—and I know to make messages simple, and 
you  know,  I’ve  been  doing  the  same  thing,  you  want  to  make  it 
simple,  so  you  say,  ‘‘You  need  a  converter  box,  you  need  this,’’  but 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

I  think  there  are  going  to  be  a  lot  of  people  that’ll  be  surprised  if 
we don’t get the message out there. 

Just one last question, retailers, I know, have been interested in 
getting  geographic  breakdowns  of  your  coupon  demand  and  re-
demption  data,  so  that  they  can  track  the  demand  for  converter 
boxes and figure out what they should be doing, where they should 
be  doing  it.  If  this  information  is  available,  have  you  been  sharing 
it with retailers, or will you share it with them, if asked? 

Ms. BAKER. That one’s for me. 
Yes,  as  a  matter  of  fact,  we  have  been—we’ve  been  trying—we 
have  a  very  accommodating  relationship  with  the  retailers,  it’s  a 
voluntary program, and we’re thrilled with their participation. And 
so,  to  the  extent  that  we  can  provide  them  five-digit  zip  code  data 
on  coupon  redemption  rates,  we’re  happy  to  do  so.  It’s  also  on  our 
website. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
First,  let  me  thank  both  of  you,  both  of  your  organizations  have 
been  incredibly  cooperative  and  helpful.  In  Missouri,  NTIA  hand- 
delivered a number of pamphlets to my office in St. Louis, in order 
for  us  to  get  them  out  to  an  event  we  were  having.  The  FCC  staff 
has  been  accompanying  my  staff  all  over  the  State.  We  have  been 
in  contact  with  every  senior  center  in  Missouri,  and  have  done  a 
great number of presentations, and both of you have just been ter-
rific, in terms of your organizations being helpful. 

We  have  one  in  five  Missourians  that  are  going  to  be  impacted 
by  this  conversion.  And  as  you  all  may  be  aware,  we  just  went 
through  some  rough,  dangerous  times  in  our  State.  We  had  severe 
ice  storms  that  isolated  a  lot  of  people  in  rural  communities  with-
out  the  ability  to  get  the  basic  essentials  of  life,  and  then  we’ve 
now  had  a  number  of  very  serious  flooding  situations,  many  of 
them in areas where we have a high number of people that are on 
analog  television.  So,  I’m  very  worried  about  what  happens  if  we 
get to the date and there are still people out there, as Senator Ste-
vens referenced, that maybe have not taken advantage of the infor-
mation  that  we  are  now  doing  a  much  better  job  of  getting  out  to 
them, I think. 

And one of the things I wanted to talk about was the number of 
coupons. I look at the assumptions that you have made, Ms. Baker, 
about whether or not we’re going to have enough coupons, and I’ve 
got to tell you, I’m very skeptical of the assumptions. The assump-
tion  that  the  rate  of  demand  for  these  coupons  remains  constant, 
doesn’t make sense to me. 

It appears—I mean, I think common sense would dictate that, as 
the  date  gets  closer,  and  as  more  information  gets  out  there,  the 
demand is going to go up for the coupons, not stay constant. 

And  then  your  assumptions  said  that  if—assuming  the  demand 
remains  constant—which  I  don’t  think  it  will,  and  100  percent  are 
redeemed,  we’re  going  to  run  out  3  months  before  the  date.  Well, 
that’s a really bad time to run out. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

The  second  was,  that  demand  would  remain  constant,  and  only 
50  percent  would  be  redeemed.  And  then  we’d  have  enough  to  go 
until  the  date  of  transition,  but  it’s  not  clear  to  me  by  what  I’ve 
read,  whether  or  not  that  goes  beyond  the  date  of  transition,  to 
those people who realize, that day, when they turn on their TV sets 
and it doesn’t work, they’ve got to do something. 

Where  do  these  assumptions  come  from?  Did  we  pull  them  out 
of  thin  air?  Or  is  there  some  kind  of  methodical  basis  that  was 
done  to  decide  that  demand  wasn’t  going  to  go  up  for  these  cou-
pons? 

Ms.  BAKER.  Well,  we  don’t  have  any  information  that  the  eco-
nomic  analysis  that  we  did  last  summer  when  we  were  doing  our 
rulemaking does not stand solid, as it is. In that economic analysis, 
we  took  the  numbers,  as  you  know,  the  numbers  are  kind  of  all 
over  the  map,  but  we  took  CEA’s  numbers,  GAO  numbers,  NAB 
numbers, and the Consumers Union numbers. 

And so, what we ended up with some people using the transition 
was  between  Consumers  Union’s  80  million  and  74.2  million,  or 
CEA’s 32.7 and 29.1 million. 

When you take a demand of, say, 70 percent—which is somewhat 
out  of  the  air,  although  it  does  follow  different  surveys  that  we’ve 
had—as  well  as  the  demand  for  coupons,  and  we  came  up  to  a 
range of 20.4 million sets, to 51.9 million sets. 

So, I think our economic analysis stands—we don’t have any fur-
ther  redemption  data  that  is  more  accurate  or  the  actual  number 
of sets that are out there. 

I think you’re very right, as you will see in your own State, that 
as  you’ve  conducted  events,  which  we’re  grateful  to  you  for  doing, 
then  the  demand  on  the  coupon  spikes.  Currently,  you  have  had 
140,886 coupon applications, and you’ve had 10,784 that have been 
redeemed. 

It’s, you know, I think we will continue to see these spikes, we’ve 
seen  them  spike  at  the  very  beginning  of  the  program,  we  had  a 
huge  spike  the  first  week  in  coupon  applications,  we  also  had  a 
very  large  spike  around  the  February  17th  year-out  event.  As  we 
move  forward,  we’re  now  doing  Experience  the  Benefits  weeks, 
we’re  seeing  spikes  if  we  go  to  communities.  We’re  going  to  do  ap-
plication round-ups in the fall, and certainly as we do the 100 Days 
Out, I think we’ll continue to see spikes. 

So, at this point we think that the numbers that we have are the 
best  that  we  have  at  this  point,  until  we  start  getting  more  accu-
rate redemption data, as to whether these people are just applying 
for  the  coupons  and  don’t  need  them,  because  they  have  cable  or 
satellite or some other pay television, or whether they are actually 
redeeming them. 

And,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  May  27th  is  the  first  re-
demption data we’ll see. It becomes a little bit difficult to gauge be-
cause  of  the  60-day  certification,  because  of  the  second  tranche  of 
money, and the 90-day exemption data. So, I would think that you 
would  see  me  asking  for  as  far  as  proper  program  management 
goes, the second tranche of money, sooner rather than later. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  I  know  that  you  will  help  us  stay  on 
top of the redemption, and I do think, particularly with the elderly, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

there is going to be a tendency to ask for the coupon, because they 
just want to be sure, just in case they might need it. 

And so, I do think if we have any way of assessing what percent-
age of these requests are elderly as opposed to others, I think that 
you  probably  will  have  a  less  than  100  percent  redemption,  per-
haps,  with  some  of  the  elderly  population  than  you  might  with 
some of the others. 

Now,  let  me  ask  about—this  is  a  little  awkward,  but,  you  know, 
I  think  you’re  doing  a  very  good  job  right  now,  Ms.  Baker,  and  I 
would  ask  Chairman  Martin—don’t  you  think  Ms.  Baker  is  doing 
a good job? 

Mr. MARTIN. Oh, absolutely. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK,  well,  then  I  don’t  get  this—what  we 
need  right  now  is  continuity.  What  we  need  right  now  is  to  not 
have,  you  know,  I  mean,  I’ve  laughingly  and  cynically  and,  maybe 
unfairly talked about the deck chairs on the ship of the Titanic, in 
terms of the movement that we have had in terms of personnel sur-
rounding  this  issue.  I  mean,  it  seems  to  me  the  last  thing  in  the 
world  we  need  right  now  is  to  confirm  someone  new  to  take  your 
job  as  this  date  is  quickly  approaching,  and  what  we  need  most 
desperately is continuity. 

I  don’t  understand  why  the  White  House  is  interested  in  replac-
ing  you,  Ms.  Baker,  and  I  don’t  want  to  put  you  on  the  spot,  here, 
but  I  want  to  say  for  the  record,  I  think  you  should  stay.  I  think 
you  should  stay  through  the  date  of  the  transition.  I  think  this  is 
a  really  bad  time  to  play  politics  with  this  position,  because  there 
are real consequences in terms of the program, and I just feel very 
strongly  that  the  last  thing  in  the  world  we  need  right  now  is  to 
put  a  new  person  in  because  of  some  political  consideration  when 
we  have  a  program  necessity,  in  terms  of  making  this  thing  work 
for the American people. So, I wanted to get that on the record. 

And then, finally, the last thing I wanted to talk about is the la-
beling  of  the  boxes  as  ‘‘coupon  eligible.’’  One  well-known  online  re-
tailer  does  not  have  its  coupon-eligible  boxes  labeled  as  such,  and 
there  is  also  another  retailer  online  that  says  consumers  must  re-
deem  their  coupons  in  the  store—are  you  all  taking  steps  to  ad-
dress those two problems that I see, in terms of the online commu-
nity? 

Ms. BAKER. Yes. As far as the labeling goes, at first we were wor-
ried about the fraud, that people would use our label and say that 
this  is  coupon  eligible  when  it  wasn’t.  We’ve  since  changed—there 
has  been  a  course  correction  in  this  program,  and  we  are  encour-
aging people to use both our label, as well as say ‘‘coupon eligible’’ 
on the boxes. Any further instances that we see as we come along, 
we’ll do continual course corrections. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  what  about  the  retailer  that’s  saying 
that  you  can’t  redeem  online,  you  have  to  come  in  the  store.  Have 
you  all  made  any  attempt  to  contact  them  and  talk  to  them  about 
that problem? 

Ms.  BAKER.  We’ve  had  a  number  of  retailer  issues  that  we’ve 

been working through. 

appreciate it. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  OK.  If  you’d  keep  us  advised  of  those,  we’d 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Thank you both very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Wicker? 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROGER F. WICKER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator WICKER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’ll  also  ask  an  awkward  question—Chairman  Martin  and  Sec-
retary  Baker—don’t  you  think  Senator  McCaskill  is  doing  a  really 
good job? 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  WICKER.  I  have  a  particular  concern  about  my  home 
State  of  Mississippi,  because  there  is  so  much  new  construction 
going  on  because  of  Hurricane  Katrina,  I  don’t  know  if  either  one 
of you are aware of it, but two and a half years after Katrina, there 
are still homes where we haven’t even poured a new foundation be-
cause  we  just  can’t  get  there  yet,  because  of  Federal  bureaucracy, 
or the magnitude of the storm. 

Now, the coupon program is going to be based on valid street ad-
dresses  provided  by  the  Postal  Service.  I’m  told  that  that  process 
has  been  viewed  as  unsatisfactorily  slow  in  some  areas,  and  so— 
how  do  you  get  a  new  address  registered  in  the  system,  and  could 
you  help  us  give  particular  attention  to  a  place  like  South  Mis-
sissippi, where so many people will be moving into new residences? 
Ms.  BAKER.  We’re  certainly  willing  to  work  with  you,  as  I  think 
we  have  thus  far.  I  think  what’s  happening  is  that  those  folks— 
we’re using the Coding Accuracy Support System or CASS system, 
which  is  the  Post  Office  system,  that  they  recognize  whether  it’s  a 
residential  or  a  business.  It  depends  on  exactly  where  your  con-
sumer’s  applying—if  it’s  on  the  web,  they’ll  actually  pull  up  a—an 
exemption  application,  they  can  apply  immediately  for  an  exemp-
tion.  And  they  can  self-certify  that  they  are  a  residential  address, 
and  they  will  get  their  coupons.  And  I  think  we’re  making  that 
easy for folks just like—— 

that? 

Senator  WICKER.  They  self-certify  and  their  word  is  taken  for 

Ms. BAKER. Yes. 
Senator WICKER. OK. 
Ms.  BAKER.  So,  we’re  working—it’s  easiest  when  they  apply  on 
the web—it’s a little bit slower on the phone because the folks that 
are  answering  the  phone  aren’t  allowed  to  grant  exemptions,  so  it 
will take up to 5 days, and if it’s via mail, it takes two to 3 weeks. 
Senator WICKER. OK, well, I would just appreciate it if you could 
continue  to  be  aware  of  our  particular  circumstance,  there.  And 
give us some sort of comfort level that the eligible household data-
base will be updated as often as possible. 

And it also strikes me that there are so many people on this com-
mittee  who  are  from  rural  States,  or  States  with  a  lot  of  rural 
areas,  where  people  actually  do  rely  on  over-the-air  signals  for 
their primary service. There are a number of people like that in my 
State.  There’s  also  a  sub-set  of  individuals  who  have  satellite,  but 
they rely, also, on over-the-air signals for emergency weather infor-
mation, for local weather and things like that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

So, if there is currently no digital service in these areas, I’m told 
that these residents have no ability to test their existing antennas. 
And  so  my  question  to  both  of  you  is,  is  this  a  matter  where  the 
FCC and NTIA are providing guidance to individuals, and how are 
you providing this guidance? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  let  me  first  focus  on  the  broadcasters  side, 
you’re  right,  they  have  to  have  their  final  digital  signal  up  and 
going  to  be  able  to  see  how  it  will  fully  reach.  Many  of  the  broad-
casters  will  begin,  many  broadcasters  already  have  that  up  and 
going,  but  many  of  them  will  also  continue  to  be  doing  that 
throughout  the  year,  so  that’s  going  to  be  an  ongoing  process.  The 
ones  that  will  require  some  changes  do  have  to  notify  consumers, 
as I mentioned in my testimony earlier, but they will end up being 
able  to  go  through  and  trying  to  get  that  digital  signal  up  and 
going,  so  consumers  can  actually  see  what  they  would  be  able  to 
end up doing. 

But as far as educating on the consumer side, we’ve been focused 
on educating on the transition and taking the first steps, which in-
volve getting the boxes and trying to get them home and plug them 
in,  but  you’re  right—it  is  going  to  be  a  two-way  street,  in  that 
sense,  we’re  going  to  have  to  get  the  broadcasters  to  the  point 
where they’re getting that digital signal up, so it can be fully test-
ed. 

Senator WICKER. Madam Secretary? 
Ms.  BAKER.  I  think  the  antenna  issue,  as  the  Chairman’s  out-
lined, is you know, there are certain areas of the country that have 
this  antenna  issue—I  think  we’d  be  surprised  if  most—when  you 
put  antennas  and  you  put  the  box  on  the  television,  you  switch  to 
a  digital  signal,  if  you  don’t  have  to  go  like  this,  in  very  simplistic 
terms,  you’re  going  to  have  to  probably  adjust  the  antenna.  Some 
of our boxes, actually, have a permissible feature, which is a Smart 
Antenna,  which  will  adjust  your  antenna  for  you,  but  I  think  it’s 
just  part  of  the  educational  program  that  we’re  going  to  have  to 
reach  out  toward  consumers.  As  well  as,  you  know,  the  Consumer 
Electronics  Association  has  done  a  great  website,  which 
is 
antennaweb.org that all of us have linked to, that provides more in-
formation for this. 

Senator WICKER. Well, thank you. 
And I want to thank you, Mr. Chairman for holding this hearing. 
It  strikes  me  that  we’re  going  to  be  able  to  get  through  this  all 
right,  but  I  do  think  that  someday,  some  very  intellectual  person 
may  end  up  doing  a  doctoral  thesis  or  dissertation  on  this  transi-
tion,  and  the  law  of  unintended  consequences  and  how  it  played 
out. So, it’s going to be interesting to watch. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you, sir. 
Senator Carper? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
To our witnesses, welcome. Thank you for joining us today. 
In  the  last,  I  guess,  the  last  couple  of  months  I’ve  had  a  chance 
to  hold,  really,  forums  around  the  State  of  Delaware.  It  reminded 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

me a little bit of what we did when the Medicare prescription pro-
gram  was  passed,  and  we  just  wanted  to  reach  out  to  people  and 
make  sure  that  they  knew  what  benefit  was  going  to  be  offered  so 
they  could  understand  that  benefit  and  make  the  best  choices  for 
themselves. 

So,  what  we’re  endeavoring  to  do  in  Delaware  is  just  to  use  my 
own office and position to—not to be Paul Revere, but to let people 
know  that  a  change  is  coming,  and  that  could  affect  some  of  the 
people  in  our  State,  and  to  make  sure  that  they’re  in  the  position 
to make the right decisions for themselves, understand the options. 
And  I  found  there  is  a  whole  lot  of—believe  it  or  not—a  whole 
lot  of  confusion.  And  it  reminded  me,  again,  of  Medicare  Part  D 
plan,  which  is,  as  you  may  recall,  very  confusing,  particularly  for 
people  that  are  in  their  70s,  80s,  90s.  And  a  lot  of  the  people,  I 
think, inordinately, some of the people who use analog TV over-the- 
air  reception,  are  folks  who  tend  to  be  older—not  all—but  a  num-
ber of them do. 

And  I  guess  one  of  my  first  questions  is—in  terms  of  developing 
an  outreach  program  to  folks,  to  educate  them,  to  bring  them 
along,  so  they  can  make,  really,  the  best  informed  decision  for 
themselves—do  we  take  that  into  account?  I  know,  I  used  to  say, 
when  we  were  working  on  Medicare  Part  D,  and  trying  to  put  to-
gether  the  outline  of  the  program  and,  in  being  able  to  explain  it 
to people, I always used my mom as an example—is there any way 
my  mom  would  understand  Medicare  Part  D?  And  I  finally  said, 
‘‘Probably not.’’ She’s going to have to get some other people to help 
explain it to her. 

And  I  just  hope  at  the  end  of  the  day  we’re  not  nearly  as  com-
plicated  here  with  the  digital  transition.  So,  let  me  just  start  with 
that,  are  we  considering,  at  all,  the  particular  age  cohort  of  some 
of the folks that we need to outreach to? 

Mr. MARTIN. We do try to end up focusing on the consumers that 
we  think—and  that  we  know—are  disproportionately  over-the-air 
viewers,  like  the  elderly  and  like  seniors.  And  I  think  that  that  is 
a prominent part of our outreach plan. So, for example, we’ve sent 
the Commission staff throughout the country located in our field of-
fices  to  over  3,000  different  senior  centers  throughout  the  country, 
and  then  about  almost  another  1,000  community  centers  that  are 
frequented by the elderly to try to provide information and do semi-
nars and outreach events to try to explain in very simplistic terms 
what  the  transition  is  going  to  mean  to  them,  and  what  steps 
they’ll need to take. 

We do reach out to other targeted groups, as well, but we do try 

to take that into account. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thank you. 
Ms. Baker? 
Ms.  BAKER.  Luckily  for  us,  we  have  each  hired  Ketchum,  which 
has  experience  in  Medicare  Part  D,  so  they  have  a  track  record  of 
understanding how to reach out to these groups. 

We conducted 17 different focus groups across the country includ-
ing seniors, trying to get our language right, trying to get our ma-
terials right. It’s how we ended up with, I think, the coupons being 
handed  around.  It’s  red—consumers  liked  red.  It  has  the  Depart-
ment  of  Commerce  logo  on  it,  because  that  gave  seniors,  in  par-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

ticular,  some  validation  that  it  was  from  the  government.  It’s  how 
we  started  using,  ‘‘It’s  a  one-time  buy-in,’’  type  of  language,  it’s  a 
discount—— 

Mr. MARTIN. If she gives it back, I’ll let her show it to you. 
Ms. BAKER.—it’s a discount, not a rebate. And government-run— 
they  like  to  make  sure  it’s  government-run.  The  expiration  in  90 
days—all of this language comes from these focus groups, and par-
ticularly  the  seniors.  I  think  outreach  is  critical.  We  often  hear 
about  the  United  Kingdom,  and  how  they’ve  gone  to  every  house-
hold for over 75, they’ve gone to hook up the box for the senior citi-
zens,  and  that’s  really,  you  know,  a  nice  program,  the  way  that 
they’re  running  it  there,  but  that’s  not  the  way  we’re  running  it 
here. 

Every  time  I  speak  to  a  senior’s  group,  we  go  through  the  dif-
ferent  ways  that  you  can  make  the  transition,  and  inevitably  they 
all  put  their  hands  up  and  say,  ‘‘I  have  cable,  do  I  need  the  box?’’ 
So,  I  do  think  it’s  something  that  we  all  need  to  reach  out  to  our 
neighbors  and  reach  out  to  our  church  groups,  really  try  and  get 
as  many  people  to  understand  this  as  we  can,  particular  the  vul-
nerable groups. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thank you. 
I’m going to ask each of you, and this question may have already 

been asked, and I apologize if it has been. 

But my sons are both—one’s in college, one’s in high school, and 
my  youngest  son  is  going  to  be  graduating  in  May  and  we  talk 
about  grades  a  lot,  and  how  things  are  going,  turns  out  they’re 
going pretty well. 

But,  I  just  want  to  talk  to  you  about  assigning  grades,  and  ask 
each  of  you  to  maybe  help  me  in  assigning  grades,  maybe  a  letter 
grade, in looking with respect to how well we’re doing in educating 
consumers.  And  I’m  encouraged  by  what  you  just  shared  with  us, 
but—when  you  say,  if  you’re  assigning  a  grade  for  how  well  your 
own  agencies  are  doing  in  the  education  process,  you  know,  A,  B, 
C,  D—what  kind  of  grade  would  you  assign  at  this  point  in  time, 
incomplete? I don’t know. 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  certainly  I  think  it  is  incomplete  until  we 
know  where  we  are  at  the  end  of  the  day—until  we  get  further 
along in the transition. I think that you do have to look at the dra-
matic  changes  that  have  occurred  over  the  last  3  or  4  months.  As 
one of the recent surveys was done by the Association of Public Tel-
evision  Stations,  they  said  that  in  the  last  3  months,  consumer 
awareness  of  the  DTV  transition  has  increased  from  about  50  per-
cent to over 76 percent. 

Senator CARPER. From about what, to—— 
Mr.  MARTIN.  From  about  50  percent  to  over  76  percent.  So, 
you’ve  seen  a  dramatic  increase  in  DTV  awareness  over  the  last 
few  months.  So,  in  the  context—over  the  last  few  months,  I  think 
that both agencies have been doing a very good job of trying to get 
out a message through both the resources that we have and the ad-
ditional resources that Congress has recently provided to us. 

But,  I  do  think  that  most  of  the  education  efforts  by  both  of  our 
agencies and by the industry have all just started, but I think that 
there  is  a  reason  for  that,  I  don’t  think  people  thought  it  was  ap-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

propriate to begin that education process until we got closer to that 
year-out time-frame for the transition. 

Ms.  BAKER.  I’d  have  to  get  an  incomplete  thus  far,  as  well,  but 
you  know,  for  the  roughly  third—beginning  third  that  we’ve  done, 
which is focus groups, and generating materials and doing the mar-
ket  research—we  have  10  million  coupon  requests.  So,  I  think  the 
numbers  speak  for  themselves,  so  we’re  doing  a  pretty  good  job  so 
far.  We  have  a  lot  of  work  to  be  done,  and  I  think,  you  know,  as 
soon as we see the redemption rates, and in which DMAs these re-
demption  rates  are—what  those  numbers  are,  in  which  area,  then 
we’ll  know  where  to  spend  the  rest  of  our  time  and  our  education. 
I  think  the  numbers  speak  for  themselves,  that  we’ve  done  a 

good job so far. 

Senator CARPER. About 10 million? Ten million? 
Ms. BAKER. Ten million, yes. 
Senator CARPER. OK, would you say most of those are from Dela-

ware? 

[Laughter.] 
Ms. BAKER. I can tell you what’s in Delaware, as a matter of fact. 
In  Delaware  we  have  had  11,409  coupon  applications.  We’ve  only 
had 740 redeemed, so far, though. 

Senator CARPER. All right, well we have our—— 
Ms. BAKER. But we’ll keep you updated. 
Senator CARPER.—we have our work cut out for us, OK. 
Let me ask, a similar kind of question if you could, maybe, think 
of  a  letter  grade  you  might  assign  to  the  work  being  done  by—the 
education  work  being  done—by  the  broadcast  industry  itself—how 
are they doing? 

Mr. MARTIN. Oh, by the broadcast industry themselves? 
Senator CARPER. Yes, on this front. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  that  they  are  obviously  the  most  crit-
ical  in  this.  And  so,  in  the  end  they  need  to  get  an  A,  because 
they’re  the  ones  who  are  going  to  be  making  sure  that  their  view-
ers  are  making  that  transition.  I  think  that  they  just  announced 
at the end of February their most recent plan for how they’re going 
to be doing that, they began a $700 million campaign last fall, they 
changed it, and modified it, and increased what they were going to 
be doing. 

And again, I don’t think we can give them a grade, as of yet, be-
cause  we’ve  got  to  get  further  along  in  the  process,  and  closer  to 
the transition to understand. 

Senator CARPER. Ms. Baker? 
Ms. BAKER. I’m not quite as shy in giving them a good grade, be-
cause  I  think  they  really  have  done  a  terrific  job.  They’ve  pledged 
a  billion  dollars,  they  realize  that  it’s  their  customers,  that  it’s 
their  business  that’s  at  stake,  and  really,  they’re  the  experts  on 
how to get the word out on a program like this, and I think they’ve 
really stepped up, and are doing it. 

Senator CARPER. Good. 
My  youngest  son’s  in  high  school,  he’s  just  started—they  started 
yesterday,  the  fourth  marking  period  out  of  four.  And  so  maybe 
we’re  in  the—are  we  in  the  first  marking  period,  here?  Do  you 
want an A in the first marking period? OK, fair enough. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

How  about  the  cable  industry  itself?  What  kind  of  grade  would 

you give our friends in the cable industry? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  again,  I  think  that  they’ve  provided  not  as 
many  resources  as  the  broadcasters,  but  this  is  not  as  much  their 
challenge. So, I think that their willingness to participate has been 
very  good.  Because,  as  I  said,  this  isn’t  really  their  responsibility. 

Senator CARPER. All right. 
Ms. Baker? 
Ms.  BAKER.  I  also  am  very  grateful  to  them  for  all  of  the  efforts 
that they’ve done to educate their consumers, and also to see these 
groups  working  together  on  an  issue  that’s  as  historic,  and  as  im-
portant as this, is really valuable. 

Senator CARPER. And, last but not least, the retailers? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  I  think,  again,  the  retailers  haven’t  made  as  many 
public commitments in terms of education as early as the other two 
industries  did,  but  they  also  have  done  a  very  good  job  in  starting 
to  stock  the  stores  with  the  converter  boxes,  and  they’ve  become 
much  more  active,  recently,  in  just  a  very  practical  part  of  how 
we’re going to make the transition occur. 

I  don’t  know  if  you  have  a  better  sense,  having  worked  with 
them  directly  on  the  converter  box  program,  what  would  you  say? 
Ms. BAKER. Again, it’s a voluntary program for them, and we are 
very  grateful  for  their  participation.  We  have  over  1,000  retailers 
with  11,000  outlets  across  the  Nation,  online,  you  know,  telephone 
operators—it’s  a  big  investment  for  them  to  be  certified.  They  had 
to  actually  put  point-of-sale  software  into  their  stores,  they  had  to 
train  their  people,  they  had  to  agree  to  be  audited,  they  have  to 
provide  NTIA  with  electronic  redemption  information,  they  had  to 
agree  to  accept  the  coupon,  and  have  the  automatic  payment  sys-
tem  from  the  Treasury.  For  them  to  voluntarily  step  up  and  par-
ticipate in this program, we are very grateful. 

Senator  CARPER.  Although  I’d  say  if  I  were  a  retailer,  maybe,  a 
retailer  with  a  national  network  of  stores,  I  would  love  to  be  the 
only  retailer  handling  these  coupons.  Just  think  of  all  of  the  mil-
lions of households, shoppers, that you can get into your store. And 
they  get  them  to  come  in  and  redeem  their  coupon,  but  maybe  in 
the  hopes  that  when  they’re  in  your  store,  they  could  buy  some 
other stuff, too. 

In  fact,  if  I  were  a  retailer,  I  would  put  the  coupon  redemption 

operation all the way in the back of the store—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator CARPER. And kind of hide it so people really had to look 

around for it. But hopefully, they won’t be quite that thorough. 

Just  to  follow  up  on  this  one,  Secretary  Baker—have  retailers 
contacted your agency about getting geographic breakdowns of your 
coupon  demand  and  redemption  data  in  order  to  be  able  to  track 
the local demand for converter boxes? 

Ms.  BAKER.  We’re  providing  that  to  them  by  zip  code,  and  it’s 

also available on our website, so anybody can look at it. 

Senator CARPER. All right, good. Fair enough. 
And the last question, Mr. Chairman, I’d have for our witnesses, 
this  is  a  question  to  Mr.  Martin,  if  I  could.  I  think  you  probably 
know better than anyone else that there is a lot going on in terms 
of  telecommunications  policy  these  days.  At  the  same  time,  how-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

ever,  the  FCC  has  been  charged  with  a  great  deal  of  the  responsi-
bility  for  overseeing  this  digital  TV  transition—we  have  a  hard 
date,  as  we  know,  of  about,  oh  gosh,  a  little  less  than  11  months 
away. 

Given  the  daunting  task  that’s  before  us,  let  me  just  ask  if  you 
believe that the digital TV transition should be the top focus of the 
FCC, one of the top focuses of the FCC—I realize that the National 
Telecommunications  and  Information  Administration  also  has  a 
significant role and part in the transition, but I’m concerned about 
the FCC role of being an effective proponent of the transition, even 
as your agency has to be focused on a lot of other unrelated issues? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  I  certainly  think  it’s  one  of  the  most  important 
issues that we’re facing. I think certainly another issue that’s very 
critical  was  related  to  that,  it  was  the  auction  that  we  just  com-
pleted  of  the  spectrum  that  we’re  going  to  be  getting  back  as  a  re-
sult  of  the  transition.  I  think  that  was  critical  for  us  to  complete 
to  get  the  spectrum  back  into  use,  both  for  the  economic  benefits 
for the country, when you’ve got spectrum being fully utilized, and 
also in terms of increasing wireless broadband deployment. 

We  have  one  piece  of  the  auction  that  we  need  to  end  up  com-
pleting, we’ve got to go back and re-evaluate what to end up doing 
with  the  D  Block,  which  not  only  serves  the  potential  for  wireless 
broadband,  but  also  has  the  potential  to  dramatically  increase,  for 
example,  public  safety’s  ability  to  solve  their  interoperability  prob-
lems. 

So,  while  I  think  this  is  certainly  right  at  the  top,  and  the  most 
important  thing  in  the  media  area,  I  do  think  that  making  sure 
we’re  focusing  on,  for  example,  solving  public  safety’s  interoper-
ability problems, I think I have to always say is a top challenge for 
us, as well. 

Senator CARPER. All right. 
My thanks to both of you. 
Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Thune? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you  for 
holding  the  hearing.  I  want  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  providing 
valuable  information  today  on  the  road  ahead  for  this  transition. 
There’s a lot of benefit that we gain from, I think, transforming the 
way  that  we  enjoy  television  by  this  transition  to  digital,  and  I 
recollect  my  days  growing  up  in  South  Dakota—I  grew  up  in  a 
rural  area  of  the  State  in  a  town  that  now  has  about  600  people 
in it, and we had one TV station until, I think, I was about in 8th 
grade, we got the CBS network affiliate. And as much time as peo-
ple in the Dakotas spend in their houses during the winter months, 
and  you  only  had  one—I  don’t  know  how  we  survived  on  one—but 
I  remember  when  the  NBC  network  affiliate  came  when  I  was  in 
the  8th  grade,  it  was  like  winning  the  lottery,  you  know,  we  had 
double the television. 

But,  that’s  just  kind  of  put  into  context,  though,  things  have 
changed  a  lot  in  rural  areas—we  have  satellite,  we  have  cable, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

there  are  lots  of  opportunities  for  accessing  information  in  rural 
areas that didn’t exist before. 

And  as  this  transition  occurs,  however,  there  are  still  a  lot  of 
people out there who derive their TV through the—through an ana-
log  signal,  and  I  think  are  probably  likely  to  be  more  proportion-
ately  impacted  by  this  change  than  perhaps  our  folks  in  other 
areas of the country. 

And  so,  as  I  have  in  the  past  at  some  of  these  hearings,  focused 
primarily on the impact on rural areas of the country, and I guess 
one  of  the  things  I  would  like  to  ask  with  respect  to  rural  areas, 
is  also  tribal  lands,  because  we  have  a  lot  of  tribal  lands  in  South 
Dakota—we  don’t  have  data  on  how  many  people  we—television 
users out there that derive their services through an analog signal. 
We do have, however, in comparing the statistics with Delaware, 
as  Senator  Carper  was  pointing  out—14,000  households  have  ap-
plied  for  over  21,000  coupons—and  so  I  think  we’ve  got  a  signifi-
cant  number  of  people  out  there  who  are  going  to  have  to  make 
this transition. 

But  what  efforts  has  the  FCC  made  with  respect  to  tribal  areas 
and  tribal  lands?  I  know  that  you  had  some  kind  of  an  outreach 
workshop that was conducted here in Washington, can you tell me 
a  little  bit  about  that?  And  what  other  things  might  be  done  to 
reach out into those areas of, more rural areas of the country? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  we  have  done  a  workshop  where  we  even  fo-
cused  specifically  on  how  we  can  reach  out  to  viewers  who  are  liv-
ing  in  rural  areas,  and  in  tribal  lands,  in  particular.  We’ve  been 
working  closely  with  several  of  the  organizations  that  are  rep-
resenting  the  Indian  community,  on  how  we  can  reach  out  to  that 
community,  to  make  sure  we  are  getting  that  message  out  effec-
tively—both  in  terms  of  providing  them  information  about  the  up-
coming transition, and what they’ll need to end up doing. 

We’ve  also  been  working  with  the  Bureau  of  Indian  Affairs  to 
make sure that we work with all of their regional offices, in getting 
them the kind of information that they need in terms of flyers and 
outreach material, to help them get that message out. 

I  also  would  point  out  that  both  telephone  companies  in  rural 
areas, and particularly those serving tribal areas, also receive Uni-
versal  Service  funding,  and  they  will  be  some  of  the  ones  who 
would  be  required  under  our  recent  orders  to  also  be  getting  the 
message out in terms of billing inserts for their consumers, if they 
were  receiving  Universal  Service  funds,  for  example,  for  our  Life-
line and Link-Up Program—it would provide service to many tribal 
areas, then those telephone companies would have to be putting in-
serts  into  their  bills  that  will  be  identifying  this  upcoming  transi-
tion. 

So,  we  both  had  workshops  here,  we’ve  been  trying  to  get  the 
message  out  in  working  with  the  advocacy  groups,  and  going  out 
into  the  field  with  the  advocacy  groups  when  they’re  having  con-
ventions, and also trying to work with the Bureau of Indian Affairs 
to specifically try to adjust the tribal areas. 

Ms. BAKER. I would say, we’ve worked with the Native American 
groups  from  the  very  beginning.  I  think  when  we  were  developing 
our rule, we heard from Council Tree, so we included a specific ex-
emption in our rule to permit those that were living on Indian res-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

ervations and Alaskan Native communities to apply for the coupon, 
even though they use a P.O. box. We thought we had solved it, but 
obviously  we  didn’t.  So  we  are,  as  you  might  have  heard,  we  have 
a  draft  NPRM  to  change  that  rule  so  people  who  use  a  post  office 
box can certify that they have a household, and we’ll be able to give 
them coupons, as well. 

I think we have an October event with the National Congress of 
American  Indians  scheduled,  but  we  are  certainly  happy  to  reach 
out in any other ways that we can, and look forward to any sugges-
tions  you  might  have  as  to  what  else  we  can  do  to  reach  out  to 
these important groups. 

Senator  THUNE.  My  State  of  South  Dakota,  of  course,  too  we’ve 
got  particular  concern  with  seniors.  And  I  guess  my  question  has 
to  do  with  what  the  FCC,  Mr.  Chairman,  may  be  doing  to  coordi-
nate  with  community  social  service,  grassroots  organizations, 
Meals-On-Wheels—points  of  access  that  seniors  use  on  a  regular 
basis to get information? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  first,  we’ve  actually  asked  our  field  offices  to 
go out into every State and try to provide information to every sen-
ior center and every community center which is frequented by sen-
iors about this—offering to do presentations both about the upcom-
ing transition and what they’ll need to do, and actually how they’ll 
need  to  utilize  a  set-top,  a  converter  box,  to  make  sure  they  can 
still watch television. 

That program, in and of itself has reached out to over 3,000 sen-
ior  centers,  and  almost  another  1,000  community  centers.  And  I 
think that’s been instrumental in trying to get that message out at 
the grassroots level. 

But we have also been trying to work with some of the local com-
munity  service,  or  senior  service  areas—both  through  HHS,  and 
also  through  some  of  the  corresponding  State  agencies.  And  I  can 
get you some more of the specifics about what we’ve done in South 
Dakota. I don’t know off the top of my head, but I can get that for 
you. 

Senator  THUNE.  Secretary  Baker,  you  talked  about  the  coupon 
program  for  converter  boxes,  and  those  coupons  being  good  for  3 
months.  I  think  it’s  been—has  it  been  about  3  months  or  so,  or  a 
little  over,  since  the  first  wave  of  those,  since  the  applications  for 
coupons were submitted, is that—— 

Ms. BAKER. May 27th is when we’re going to see our first expira-

tion date. 

Senator  THUNE.  And  that’s  when  you’ll  have  the  first  good  data 

on the redemption rates for those? 

Ms.  BAKER.  It’s  going  to  be  our  first  data.  You  know,  our  first 
week  we  mailed  out  350,000,  our  first  few  weeks  we  only  mailed 
out  350,000.  We’re  now  mailing  out  over  a  million  a  week.  So,  our 
first  data  is  going  to  be  a  little  bit  less  conclusive.  I  would  say,  by 
the end of June, beginning of July, we’ll probably have pretty good 
data on redemption rates. 

Senator THUNE. Do you have any anticipation, expectation about 
what  those  redemption  rates  might  be?  I  mean,  do  you  have  any-
thing so far that would give you an insight into—— 

Ms.  BAKER.  You  know,  it’s  really  too  early.  We’ve  had  260,000 
coupons  redeemed.  We’ve  had  data  that  we’ve  had  surveys,  we’ve 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

had  data  that  we’ve,  you  know,  gleaned  from  our  own  interaction 
with  groups.  We’ve  had—we  have  general  data  on  how  many  peo-
ple  use  a  coupon,  but  I’m  not  sure—this  is  a  unique  program,  and 
so  I  don’t  think  I  should  give  a  guess  as  to  what  the  redemption 
rate is really going to be. 

Senator  THUNE.  Well,  we  won’t  ask  you  to  extrapolate,  but  I 
didn’t  know  if  you  had  any  preliminary  data  that  might  tell  you 
something about that. 

Well,  I  appreciate  your  attention  to  this,  and  you’ve  got  a  big 
challenge ahead of you, both of you. I know it’s—up to the FCC and 
NTIA  to  get  this  job  done,  and  up  to,  what,  20  million  or  there-
abouts,  folks  around  the  country  that  are  going  to  need—be  edu-
cated and understand how to make this transition? So, we wish you 
well,  and  I  hope  that  you  will—if  there  are  things  that  we  can  be 
doing to be helpful, in that regard, that you’ll make sure that we’re 
aware of those, as well. 

Thank you for your testimony. 
Mr. MARTIN. Thank you. 
Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. All right. 
Thank you very much. 
I  noted  in  your  testimony  that  about  6  weeks  ago,  the  National 
Association of Broadcasters and the Consumers Union issued a re-
port  on  their  findings  of  the  polls.  The  National  Association  of 
Broadcasters suggested that awareness has grown to about 79 per-
cent. 

However,  at  the  same  time,  the  Consumers  Union  poll  indicated 
that  74  percent  of  those  polled  were  really  not  aware  of  what  was 
happening,  they  had  major  misconceptions;  and  these  numbers 
trouble me. So, I hope that both agencies will be able to advise this 
committee on a monthly basis as to progress you’re making in, you 
know, management of this transition. I think it would be very help-
ful to us. 

Mr. MARTIN. Of course. We’d be happy to. 
The CHAIRMAN. And I’m pleased to advise you that, Madam Sec-
retary,  S.  2607,  the  low-power  bill,  will  be  considered  on  April  24, 
and at that time it will pass unanimously. 

Ms. BAKER. Thank you very much. 
[Laughter.] 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And,  I’d  like  to  thank  both  of  you  on  behalf  of 
the  Committee  for  your  testimony,  it’s  been  very  helpful.  I’ve  just 
got my fingers crossed. I hope everything turns out well. 

Mr. MARTIN. Thank you. 
Ms. BAKER. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 4:21 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

In  less  than  a  year,  on  February  17,  2009,  two-and-a-half  million  televisions  in 
Massachusetts  will  go  dark  unless  their  owners  take  action  when  major  broadcast 
stations are required to switch from analog broadcast of television signals to digital 
transmission. 

For  the  most  part,  the  switch  to  digital  is  a  good  thing.  Digital  transmission  will 
provide  TV  watchers  with  a  clearer  picture  and  provides  an  opportunity  for  an  in-
crease  in  the  amount  of  local  programming  available.  It  will  also  free  up  some 
‘‘beachfront  real  estate’’  on  our  public  airwaves,  which  will  be  used  to  improve  the 
way our public safety officials communicate during an emergency and for other inno-
vative purposes. 

But in order to get to that point, we need to make sure that the millions of Ameri-
cans who are in jeopardy of losing TV service on 2/17/09 are aware of the steps they 
need to take. 

There needs to be a real concerted effort at the FCC and at the NTIA to educate 
those who will be affected. Congress needs to provide sufficient funding so that gov-
ernment  can  partner  with  industry  to  get  the  word  out  effectively,  and  I  am  con-
fident we will do that. 

But equally important to funding is the emphasis placed on this effort by the Ad-
ministration.  The  DTV  transition  represents  an  historic  moment  for  this  country, 
and  is  the  most  significant  development  in  television  technology  in  half  a  century. 
It deserves the full attention of this Administration, lest it result in mass confusion 
and frustration on behalf of the millions of affected American households. 

I  urge  Chairman  Martin  and  Acting  Assistant  Secretary  Baker  to  expend  every 
effort  on  smoothing  the  transition  for  the  elderly  and  low-income  populations  that 
studies  show  will  be  adversely  impacted.  And  I  urge  you  also  to  leave  less  critical, 
more politically charged issues to be dealt with in due time. On behalf of Americans 
across  the  country  still  reliant  on  over-the-air  television,  we  must  get  this  right  on 
February 17, 2009. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

On  February  17,  2009,  American  consumers  will  see  one  of  the  biggest  changes 

in broadcast media since color television was introduced in the late 1950s. 

On  that  day,  all  full-power  television  stations  broadcasting  in  the  United  States 

will discontinue their analog signals, and switch to all-digital broadcasts. 

Digital  television  broadcasting  will  allow  consumers  to  receive  multiple  video 
channels  from  a  single  broadcaster,  superior  picture  resolution,  and  CD-quality 
sound. 

This  transition,  however,  will  only  be  a  success  if  all  Americans  learn  about  how 

the transition will impact them. 

So far, the record is mixed. 
A  January  30,  2008,  study  by  Consumers  Union  found  that  74  percent  of  con-
sumers  who  knew  about  the  digital  television  transition  had  major  misconceptions. 
Perhaps  most  troubling,  the  study  also  found  that  one-third  of  consumers  living 
in  households  with  only  analog,  over-the-air  reception  televisions  still  had  no  idea 
that the transition was happening. 

On  February  19,  2008,  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  adopted 
an Order requiring broadcasters to provide on-air information about the digital tele-
vision transition to their viewers. 

This is a good start. 
However,  it  is  critical  that  the  FCC  follow-up  on  this  outreach  to  ensure  that  it 
is  being  received  by  populations  that  may  be  disproportionately  impacted  by  the 
transition, such as rural viewers and senior citizens. 

(47) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

This could be accomplished by conducting studies in certain targeted areas to en-
sure  that  the  message  is  getting  through  to  key  impacted  groups.  The  Commission 
could then use this data to ensure that public outreach programs are effectively tar-
geted for maximum impact. 

The  FCC  has  recently  focused  on  a  number  of  other  non-urgent  issues—such  as 
relaxation of the media ownership rules. With little over 10 months remaining until 
the  transition  deadline,  it  is  imperative  that  the  Commission  make  the  success  of 
the digital television transition one of its top concerns. 

I  also  have  some  concerns  about  the  National  Telecommunications  and  Informa-
tion  Administration’s  (NTIA)  ‘‘digital-to-analog’’  converter  box  coupon  subsidy  pro-
gram. 

These  converter  boxes  allow  consumers  with  older,  ‘‘analog-only’’  televisions  sets 
to  convert  digital  broadcasts  into  analog  signals  that  their  television  sets  can  use. 
Currently, the base component of this program provides up to two $40 converter box 
subsidy coupons to every American household that requests them. 

As  of  April  7,  2008,  almost  10  million  converter  box  coupons  had  been  ordered 

from NTIA. 

This  level  of  demand  is  positive.  Unfortunately,  NTIA’s  rules  governing  the  pro-

gram may leave some Americans behind. 

For  example,  NTIA’s  current  rules  define  ‘‘household’’  as  all  persons  living  at  a 
‘‘U.S. Postal Service address.’’ However, this definition appears to exclude many peo-
ple  living  in  multiple  tenant  dwelling  units  at  a  single  address.  Therefore,  an  as-
sisted  living  center—with  50  individual  rooms  at  a  single  U.S.  Postal  Service  mail-
ing address—would only be eligible for two converter box coupons. 

Furthermore, even when consumers get the coupons, they may not be able to use 
them.  The  coupons  currently  have  a  90-day  expiration  date—with  no  provision  to 
replace them if they expire. While NTIA has signed up a number of retailers to par-
ticipate in the converter box program, no one is monitoring retailers to ensure that 
they actually have converter boxes available for purchase. 

Finally, NTIA needs to do a better job of ensuring that viewers of low-power and 
Class  A  television  stations  know  that  some  of  these  stations  will  not  transition  to 
digital broadcasts next February—and that affected consumers will need a converter 
box with an ‘‘analog pass-through’’ feature to continue receiving these channels. 

The  digital  television  transition  holds  great  promise  for  America—but  also  sub-
stantial  perils.  I  hope  both  the  FCC  and  NTIA  take  this  opportunity  to  address 
these concerns, before it’s too late. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 
I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens  for  holding  this 
important hearing. Last summer, when the Committee held its last oversight hear-
ing  on  the  digital  television  transition,  I  expressed  concerns  that  this  is  a  train 
wreck for American consumers waiting to happen. 

A  half  year  later,  I  still  don’t  have  a  warm  feeling  about  it.  Surveys  indicate  a 
high level of consumer awareness of the transition. But while the level of awareness 
may be high, the level of confusion seems even higher. And unlike the approach the 
Clinton  Administration  took  with  Y2K,  there  is  no  one  person  or  organization  ac-
countable  for  ensuring  a  smooth  DTV  transition  for  all  involved.  Even  at  this  late 
stage,  there  remains  a  need  for  a  White  House  level  interagency  working  group  to 
coordinate DTV activities government-wide. 

The effort to make Americans aware of the transition and to educate them on how 
to  be  prepared  remains,  by  and  large,  decentralized  and  voluntary.  I  do  want  to 
thank  broadcasters,  cable  system  operators,  consumer  electronics  companies,  and 
too  many  not-for-profit  organizations  to  name  for  their  voluntary  efforts  to  educate 
consumers about the coming transition. These contributions are significant. The re-
cently-released, long-awaited DTV education order will continue to build awareness, 
but  awareness  is  only  the  first  of  many  steps,  particularly  for  disadvantaged  popu-
lations. 

Over the course of the past year, I have met with a number of not-for-profit orga-
nizations that work daily with seniors, the disabled, low-income, non-English speak-
ers,  and  Native  Americans.  It  is  clear  that  these  organizations  will  need  additional 
resources  to  take  on  any  additional  responsibilities  helping  these  underserved 
groups prepare for the DTV transition. 

For  example,  I  thought  the  Corporation  for  National  and  Community  Service  did 
a  great  job  in  explaining  Medicare  Part  D  to  seniors.  I  ran  into  their  volunteers 
wherever I went in my state. I could see the organization taking on a similar effort 
with  respect  to  the  DTV  transition,  including  providing  technical  assistance,  but 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

they clearly will need some additional resources. The challenge is clear: there is vir-
tually no time to get a funding increase enacted, and out the door of a Federal agen-
cy quickly enough to have an impact. 

Finally,  I  want  to  touch  on  Senator  Snowe’s  DTV  technical  corrections  bill  that 
I  have  co-sponsored.  Washington  State  has  a  combined  total  of  196  low-power  TV, 
translator,  and  Class  A  television  stations.  While  some  of  these  low-power  stations 
fill  in  gaps  in  coverage  in  the  Seattle  market  due  to  the  terrain,  the  majority  of 
these  stations  provide  over-the-air  television  programming  to  consumers  in  small 
communities throughout central, eastern, and coastal Washington. 

Many  of  the  rural  translator  stations  are  financed  through  a  mechanism  called 
a  Translator  Investment  District,  where  residents  literally  pass  the  hat  around  the 
community to pay for operating expenses. The Act makes a simple technical correc-
tion  to  current  law  regarding  two  grant  programs  authorized  at  the  Department  of 
Commerce  to  allow  these  low-power  stations  to  upgrade  their  equipment  a  little 
sooner. 

Thank you and I look forward to hearing from the panel. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question  1.  On  March  15,  The  Garden  Island,  the  newspaper  on  Kauai,  printed 
an article entitled ‘‘Kauai Not Affected by ‘09 Analog TV Deadline.’’ According to the 
newspaper, Kauai residents are served exclusively by low-power broadcasting facili-
ties.  What  is  the  FCC  doing  to  prevent  residents  on  Kauai  from  being  confused  by 
national  messages  about  the  transition  telling  consumers  to  make  changes  to  their 
televisions to prepare for digital reception? 

Answer.  On  February  19,  2008,  the  Commission  adopted  a  DTV  Consumer  Edu-
cation  Initiative  Report  and  Order  requiring  television  broadcasters,  multichannel 
video  programming  distributors  (MVPDs),  telecommunications  carriers,  retailers, 
and  manufacturers  to  promote  awareness  of  the  Nation’s  transition  to  digital  tele-
vision. The educational efforts of these industry groups are intended to provide con-
sumers, including those in rural and small communities, with clear and accurate in-
formation about the DTV transition. 

The  Report  and  Order,  among  other  things,  encourages  all  LPTV  broadcasters, 
particularly those that plan to continue analog-only broadcasting, to begin educating 
their  viewers  immediately  about  the  effect  of  the  DTV  transition  on  LPTV  service. 
For  instance,  LPTV  stations  should  notify  their  viewers  that:  (1)  they  are  watching 
a low-power broadcast station that, unlike full-power stations, may continue to offer 
analog service after February 17, 2009, and (2) viewers who plan to purchase a con-
verter  box  in  order  to  view  digital  signals  should  select  a  model  with  analog  pass- 
through capability in order to continue watching that station. 

In  addition,  we  have  developed  a  list  of  those  communities  that  appear  to  be 
served exclusively by low-power, Class A, and/or translators, and shared this list as 
well  with  the  interested  parties.  We  have  been  coordinating  with  these  groups  to 
see how they are using this information, particularly with respect to consumer edu-
cation  and  outreach.  The  list  is  available  on  the  Commission’s  website  (http:// 
www.dtv.gov/consumercorner.html#faq22). 

Question  2.  I  believe  the  DTV  transition  requires  that  we  have  ‘‘block  captains’’ 
in  communities  across  this  country.  We  need  troops  on  the  ground  to  get  the  word 
out  and  assist  consumers  with  preparing  for  the  transition.  What  efforts  have  the 
NTIA  made  to  coordinate  and  put  DTV  block  captains  and  authorities  in  place 
through the Corporation for National and Community Service? Would it be possible 
to use organizations like Americorps and Seniorcorps to assist with the DTV transi-
tion in the communities where they serve? 

Answer. We cannot report what efforts the NTIA has made to coordinate and put 
DTV  block  captains  and  authorities  in  place  through  the  Corporation  for  National 
and Community Service. 

The Commission has been coordinating with several grass roots organizations, in-
cluding Americorps and Seniorcorps (which are part of the Corporation for National 
and  Community  service  (‘‘CNCS’’)),  regarding  educating  and  assisting  consumers 
about the DTV transition in local communities. 

As a result, the Director of Seniorcorps has notified all of their 1,300 local grant-
ees  and  asked  them  to  start  working  on  this  issue  in  their  local  communities. 
Seniorcorps  has  indicated  that  it  can  assist  the  DTV  transition  effort  through  its 
three programs: ‘‘RSVP Program’’ which can help by getting the word out to commu-
nities, ‘‘Senior Companion Program,’’ which can use the information themselves and 
also  inform  and  assist  the  clients  they  serve  each  year;  and  the  ‘‘Foster  Grand-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

parents Program,’’ where volunteers will receive training about the analog-to-digital 
issue at one or more of the monthly in-service trainings that they attend. According 
to the staff at CNCS, it does not appear that there will be an opportunity to involve 
Americorps because of that organization’s grant cycle. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question  1.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  digital  transition  is  helping  to  increase  the  sales 
of  digital  televisions.  It  is  estimated  that  45  million  sets  will  be  sold  in  2008–2009. 
It  is  important  that  the  manufacturers  of  these  sets  know  what  IP  they  need,  who 
owns it, and that the licensing terms are transparent. In order to ensure a free and 
open  market,  manufacturers  need  these  facts.  Therefore,  please  provide  the  Com-
mittee  with  information  as  to  which  patents  are  essential  for  manufacturers  to 
make and sell ATSC televisions in the United States. Who owns the patents essen-
tial  for  manufacturers  to  make  and  sell  ATSC  televisions  in  the  United  States  and 
what are the licensing terms for all manufacturers? 

Answer.  The  Commission  does  not  maintain  a  list  of  patents  on  the  numerous 
technologies used in the Advanced Television Systems Committee (ATSC) standard, 
nor  is  there  a  single  private  compendium  that  lists  those  patents  or  the  holders  of 
rights  to  those  patents.  Rather,  manufacturers  developing  products  for  operation 
under  the  ATSC  standard  must  identify  relevant  patents  and  those  holding  patent 
rights  by  conducting  patent  searches  in  the  same  manner  as  for  any  other  tech-
nology.  The  Commission’s  staff  has,  however,  obtained  information  from  the  ATSC, 
the  Consumer  Electronics  Association  (CEA),  Commission  decision  documents,  ex 
parte presentations by parties opposing royalty payments, Internet searches and LG 
Electronics Company, Inc. to respond to the specific questions raised on this matter, 
as  described  below.  We  do  not  have  complete  information  on  the  amounts  actually 
charged  for  patent  licenses  because  those  licenses  are  business  arrangements  that 
are  negotiated  on  a  case-by-case  basis;  we  do  have  some  information,  however, 
which is provided below. 

There are at least 16 entities licensing patents that are essential to the manufac-
ture of ATSC receivers. One of those entities, MPEG LA, provides a service that en-
ables manufacturers to acquire essential patent rights from multiple patent holders 
in  a  single  transaction,  as  an  alternative  to  negotiating  separate  licenses.  The 
MPEG  LA  ‘‘MPEG–2  portfolio’’  includes  essential  patents  owned  by  25  entities: 
Alcatel  Lucent;  British  Telecommunications  plc;  Canon,  Inc.;  CIF  Licensing,  LLC; 
Columbia University; France Te´le´com; Fujitsu; General Instrument Corp.; GE Tech-
nology  Development,  Inc.;  Hitachi,  Ltd.  (Hitachi);  KDDI  Corporation  (KDDI); 
Koninklijke  Philips  Electronics  N.V.  (Philips);  LG  Electronics  Inc.  (LG);  Matsushita 
Electric 
(Panasonic);  Mitsubishi  Electric  Corporation 
(Mitsubishi);  Nippon  Telegraph  and  Telephone  Corporation  (NTT);  Robert  Bosch 
GmbH;  Samsung  Electronics  Co.,  Ltd.  (Samsung);  Sanyo  Electric  Co.,  Ltd.  (Sanyo); 
Scientific-Atlanta,  Inc.  (Scientific-Atlanta);  Sharp  Corporation  (Sharp);  Sony  Cor-
poration  (Sony);  Thomson  Licensing;  Toshiba  Corporation  (Toshiba);  and  Victor 
Company  of  Japan,  Limited  (JVC).  Royalties  for  the  MPEG–2  portfolio  of  video  en-
coding/decoding patents are $2.50/unit. 

Industrial  Co.,  Ltd. 

MPEG  LA  also  manages  another  portfolio  of  32  patents  specific  to  the  ATSC 
standard for seven entities: LG, Panasonic, Mitsubishi, Philips, Samsung, Scientific- 
Atlanta, Inc., and Zenith Electronics LLC (parent company LG Electronics, Inc.). Ze-
nith had previously licensed separately a number of its patents for the 8–VSB trans-
mission  system  used  in  the  ATSC  system.  It  recently  indicated  to  us  that  it  now 
licenses those patents through MPEG LA ATSC also, so that all of its ATSC patents 
are  licensed  through  that  entity.  The  royalty  on  the  MPEG  LA  ‘‘ATSC  portfolio’’  is 
$5.00/unit (this is in addition to the royalty for the MPEG–2 portfolio). Information 
on  the  MPEG  LA  patent  portfolios,  patent  holders,  patent  numbers,  and  licensing 
terms  is  available  at  http://www.mpegla.com  (see  http://www.mpegla.com/atsc/ 
atsc-agreement.cfm. 

Dolby Laboratories, Inc. (Dolby) holds the patent for the AC–3 digital audio tech-
nology used in the ATSC standard. Information on the Dolby AC–3 patent, including 
the  patent  number  and  patent  numbers  of  related  technologies,  is  available  at 
http://www.freepatentsonline.com/7283965.html.  We  do  not  have  confirmed  infor-
mation on the licensing terms or rates for the Dolby AC–3 patent. In addition, Tri- 
Vision  Electronics  Inc.  (Tri-Vision)  holds  the  rights  to  the  patent  for  the  ATSC  V- 
chip  parental  control  program  blocking  technology.  General  information  on  the  Tri- 
Vision  and  the  V-chip  technology  is  available  at  http://www.tri-vision.ca.  A  docu-
ment  with  the  Tri-Vision  V-chip  patent  number  is  attached;  we  do  not  have  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

firmed information on the licensing terms or rates for the Tri-Vision V-chip patent. 
Funai  (brand  names  Emerson,  Philco,  Symphonic,  and  Magnavox)  holds  one  ATSC 
patent (U. S. Patent No. 6924848) that it acquired from Thomson/RCA and licenses 
separately. 
is  available  at  http:// 
www.freepatentsonline.com/6924848.html. We do not have confirmed information on 
the licensing terms or rates for the Funai patent. 

the  Funai  patent 

Information  on 

U.S.  patent  numbers  and  additional  information  for  the  above  technologies  are 
provided in materials that are attached separately. Copies of the information avail-
able on the websites discussed above and other materials also are attached (See Ap-
pendix A.) * There also may be additional patents for technologies used in the ATSC 
standard that are not included in the above sources. 

At  least  one  of  the  entities  holding  the  original  rights  to  an  ATSC  patent  subse-
quently  transferred  its  rights.  AT&T  sold  U.S.  Patent  No.  5,243,627  to  Rembrandt 
Technologies, L.P. (Rembrandt), a patent holding company. We do not have specific 
information  on  Rembrandt’s  licensing  terms  or  rates  for  this  patent.  However,  the 
Harris Corporation (Harris) claims that Rembrandt is seeking very high rates. 

Question  2.  Mr.  Chairman,  it  is  also  critical  to  ensure  the  American  consumer  is 
not paying too much for their digital television sets. A way to ensure our consumers 
are  paying  the  appropriate  price  is  to  compare  what  it  costs  for  patent  licenses  in 
Europe  and  Japan  versus  here  in  the  United  States.  What  digital  broadcast  tele-
vision standards have been adopted in Europe and Japan? What patent licenses are 
needed  to  build  televisions  using  those  standards?  Who  owns  those  patents  and 
what  are  the  terms  of  licensing?  Is  the  total  cost  of  patents  needed  to  build  digital 
televisions  for  U.S.  citizens  higher  than  the  total  cost  of  patents  needed  to  build 
televisions for sale in Europe and Japan? 

Answer.  Japan  and  Europe  have  adopted  digital  broadcast  television  standards 
that are different from the ATSC standard. Japan has adopted the ‘‘Integrated Serv-
ices Digital Broadcasting-Terrestrial’’ (ISDB–T) standard for its broadcast DTV serv-
ice.  This  standard  was  developed  by  the  Association  of  Radio  Industries  and  Busi-
nesses,  a  Japanese  standards-making  body.  The  Internet  newsletter  ‘‘EE  Times 
Asia’’ 
(http://www.eetasia.com/ARTl8800452486l480700lNTld776b8f3.HTM) 
states  that  Mitsubishi,  Panasonic,  and  Sony  have  established  Uldage  Inc.  (Uldage) 
to provide a one-stop patent-licensing program for DTV receivers in Japan; however, 
we  have  not  been  able  to  obtain  the  specific  Japanese  patents  covered  by  Uldage. 
Under  this  program,  manufacturers  and  distributors  of  digital  broadcasting  devices 
can  license  major  patents  for  ISDB–T  DTV  receivers  at  a  relatively  low  cost.  Thus 
far, the Uldage program includes patents owned by France Te´le´com, Hitachi, Japan 
Broadcasting  Corporation,  JVC,  Mitsubishi,  Panasonic,  Sanyo,  Sharp,  Sony,  Tele-
diffusion  de  France,  and  Toshiba.  Uldage  has  also  indicated  that  its  program  does 
not yet include all of the relevant patents and that it will continue inviting partici-
pants to achieve full coverage. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  the  Uldage  program  includes  only  a  portion  of  the 
patents  needed  for  operation  of  the  ISDB–T  standard;  in  particular  it  does  not  in-
clude  patents  for  the  MPEG–2  video  and  audio  technologies  that  ISDB–T  uses.  As 
noted in the response to Question 1 above, those patents are licensed by MPEG LA, 
with  a  $2.50  royalty  for  the  MPEG–2  portfolio;  however,  we  have  not  been  able  to 
determine  whether  this  royalty  is  collected  for  products  sold  outside  the  United 
States. As indicated by EE Times Asia, there may also be essential patents for other 
technologies  used  in  the  ISDB–T  standard  that  are  not  included  in  either  the 
Uldage or MPEG LA portfolios. 

Europe has adopted the ‘‘Digital Video Broadcasting—Terrestrial’’ (DVB–T) stand-
ard  for  its  broadcast  digital  television  service.  The  patents  for  this  standard  are 
managed by MPEG LA and the royalty for this ‘‘DVB-T portfolio’’ is 0.75 Euros/unit 
(at  current  exchange  rates,  about  $1.20/unit).  The  DVB–T  portfolio  includes  essen-
tial  patents  owned  by  France  Te´le´com,  JVC,  and  Panasonic.  However,  licenses  for 
the essential patents for the MPEG–2 technology used in the DVB–T standard, i.e., 
the  MPEG–2  portfolio,  are  not  included  in  the  license  for  the  DVB–T  portfolio.  The 
royalties for those patents are an additional $2.50 per unit (see e-mail message from 
Larry Horn of MPEG LA in Appendix A responding to an inquiry on this point). In-
formation  on  the  MPEG–2  and  DVB–T  patent  portfolios,  patent  holders,  patent 
numbers,  and  licensing  terms  is  available  at  http://www.mpegla.com  (see  http:// 
www.mpegla.com/m2/m2-agreement.cfm for the DVB–T license agreement). 

Question  3.  Mr.  Chairman,  when  the  ATSC  standard  was  adopted  in  1996  the 
FCC  said  that  the  relevant  patents  must  be  made  available  free  of  charge  or  on  a 
reasonable,  nondiscriminatory  basis.  Manufacturers  reportedly  pay  more  than  $20 

* This appendix is retained in the Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

per  television  set  for  ATSC  patent  royalties.  By  comparison,  consumers  in  Japan 
pay  82  cents  per  set,  and  consumers  in  Europe  pay  less  than  $1  per  set  for  com-
parable  digital  standards.  Do  ATSC  royalties  of  more  than  $20  per  set  meet  the 
FCC  standard  for  reasonableness?  What  can  the  FCC  do  to  address  this  disparity? 
What, if anything, has been done or is under consideration? 

Answer. The ATSC requires that participants with essential patent claims to tech-
nologies  used  in  the  standard  make  their  technologies  available  on  a  ‘‘reasonable 
and non-discriminatory’’ (RAND) basis. The ATSC also requires participants holding 
patent rights to sign a patent statement affirming this commitment. More informa-
tion is available in the ATSC Patent Policy available on the ATSC website (http:// 
www.atsc.org/policyldocuments/). At least 17 ATSC participants assert ownership 
of  essential  patents  which  may  amount  to  thousands  of  claims  in  hundreds  of  pat-
ents. The ATSC patent statements as signed by original patent holders are available 
at  http://www.atsc.org/patentstatements.html.  A  copy  of  the  ATSC  patent  policy 
and  the  ATSC  patent  statements  submitted  by  patent  holders  from  that  website  is 
attached (See Appendix B).** 

It is also important to note that only participants in the ATSC standards develop-
ment  process  are  covered  by  the  ATSC  patent  policy.  The  identities  and  actions  of 
other  entities  that  may  hold  essential  claims  are  not  known  at  this  time.  Many  of 
the original ATSC patent holders have sold or assigned their patent rights to other 
entities  (see,  for  example,  the  list  of  patent  holders  participating  in  the  MPEG  LA 
portfolio, several of which are not included in those signing the original ATSC state-
ments)  (See  Appendix  A),  but  the  requirement  to  adhere  to  the  RAND  commitment 
in  the  ATSC  patent  statements  continues  to  apply  to  subsequent  rights  holders.  In 
its 1996 decision adopting the ATSC standard as the U.S. DTV standard, the Com-
mission  stated  that  the  standard  is  premised  on  the  reasonable  and  nondiscrim-
inatory  licensing  of  relevant  patents.  The  Commission  also  concluded  that  greater 
regulatory  involvement  was  not  necessary  at  that  time.  The  Commission  indicated, 
however,  that  it  remained  committed  to  this  principle  and  would  take  appropriate 
action if a future problem is brought to its attention. See, Fourth Report and Order 
in MM Docket No. 87–268, 11 FCC Rcd 17771 (1996). 

No  party  has  filed  a  formal  complaint  with  the  Commission  regarding  access  to 
patents to produce digital televisions or digital-to-analog converter boxes. The Com-
mission  is  aware  of  some  issues  regarding  access  to  patent  rights.  Several  parties 
have made presentations to the Commission concerning the acquisition of one of the 
ATSC  patents  (U.S.  Patent  No.  5,243,627)  by  Rembrandt  Technologies,  and  the 
amount  of  the  license  fees  that  the  company  is  requesting  from  TV  networks  and 
transmission equipment manufacturers. More recently, the ‘‘Coalition United to Ter-
minate  Financial  Abuse  of  the  Television  Transition’’  has  made  informal  presen-
tations  to  the  Commission  asserting  that  high  rates  for  ATSC  patent  royalties  are 
increasing  the  price  of  DTV  receivers.  In  addition,  the  Consumer  Electronics  Asso-
ciation  has  requested  that  the  Commission  clarify  its  rules  with  respect  to  DTV  V- 
chip  functionality  based  in  part  on  concern  that  patent  royalties  demanded  by  Tri- 
Vision,  a  Canadian  entity,  would  adversely  affect  the  price  of  DTV  receivers  (see, 
Petition  for  Clarification  and/or  Reconsideration  of  the  Commission’s  Report  and 
Order in MB Docket No. 03–15). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question. In February, the Government Accountability Office issued a report find-
ing  that  the  FCC  closed  83  percent  of  complaints  with  no  enforcement  action.  Do 
you  think  this  is  an  acceptable  record?  Might  it  make  more  sense  to  split  up  the 
current  Consumer  and  Government  Affairs  Bureau  (CGB)  into  a  separate  Office  of 
Consumer Affairs that is focused solely on dealing with consumer complaints? 

Answer.  While  the  GAO  states  that  83  percent  of  the  investigations  were  listed 
as closed with no action, Commission review of the databases and paper records in-
dicate only 3 percent were closed with no action. In fact, 71 percent were closed with 
compliance  found,  15  percent  closed  after  taking  action  and  11  percent  closed  due 
to  insufficient  information.  GAO  states  that  the  Commission’s  existing  enforcement 
databases  do  not  contain  information  about  the  disposition  of  a  complaint.  This  is 
incorrect. This information resides in the problem resolution or similar notation sec-
tions of the Commission’s database systems. This section of the database was read-
ily  accessible  to  GAO  during  the  course  of  their  investigation.  During  the  prepara-

** This appendix is retained in the Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

tion of this report, the Commission informed the GAO of our concerns that the draft 
report contained factual flaws or errors in presenting certain data. 

The Commission is a proponent of strong enforcement action to protect consumers 
and to ensure the Communications Act of 1934 (the Act) is carried out in the man-
ner intended by Congress. During my tenure, the Commission has undertaken more 
than 3,400 enforcement actions. These enforcement actions have resulted in assess-
ing  more  than  $65.7  million  in  fines,  forfeitures,  and  consent  decree  payments—in-
cluding  more  than  $43  million  in  2007  alone,  which  the  GAO  acknowledges  is  the 
highest annual amount since the Enforcement Bureau was created in 1999. In addi-
tion,  the  Commission  has  devoted  significant  resources  to  reviewing  and  taking  ac-
tion on a backlog of more than 113,000 consumer complaints. 

Finally, the CGB responded to more than 128,000 consumer complaints on a vari-
ety  of  topics,  including  cable  and  satellite  services,  radio  and  television  broad-
casting,  and  wireline  and  wireless  telecommunications  during  Fiscal  Year  2007,  as 
reported in the Performance and Accountability Report for Fiscal Year 2007. In ad-
dition, as a result of CGB’s efforts, during calendar year 2007 consumers were bene-
fited by credits totaling over $3 million. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question 1. Looking ahead over the next 10 months till the DTV hard date, what 
do you consider to be the highest risk factor with respect to U.S. consumers getting 
through the DTV transition with minimal interruption? 

Answer.  There  have  been  some  concerns  raised  that  viewers  will  need  to  replace 
or  upgrade  their  existing  antennas  to  receive  DTV  service.  Many  of  the  difficulties 
viewers currently encounter in receiving DTV service result from the fact that some 
stations are not currently operating their DTV signals to serve the same geographic 
areas  as  the  areas  served  by  their  analog  signals.  After  the  February  2009  transi-
tion,  these  stations  will  generally  provide  DTV  service  within  the  same  or  larger 
service  areas  than  their  former  analog  service  areas.  Also,  some  consumers  who  do 
not  have  antennas  that  can  provide  good  reception  of  UHF  TV  signals  may  need 
to  upgrade  or  replace  their  antennas  so  that  they  can  adequately  receive  the  full 
range  of  TV  channels.  The  Commission  has  drafted  and  disseminated  an  Antennas 
and Digital Television Fact Sheet which includes reception information and tips for 
consumers.  This  Fact  Sheet  is  available  at  www.dtv.gov/publications.html  and  via 
mail by calling 1–888–CALL–FCC (voice) or 1–888–TELL–FCC (TTY). 

Question  2.  A  consumer  receiving  over-the-air  television  broadcasts  records  pro-
grams  for  their  personal  use  on  a  VCR  model  that  has  a  built  in  tuner,  allowing 
the  viewer  to  watch  one  channel  while  recording  another.  If  this  consumer  pur-
chases  the  set-top  box  for  that  television,  will  the  consumer  still  be  able  to  record 
programming from one channel while watching programming from a different chan-
nel with the provided equipment? If not, what options does that consumer have and 
how would they become aware of them? 

Answer. Consumers using a single set-top box will not be able to watch one chan-
nel  while  recording  another  channel  on  a  VCR.  In  order  to  watch  one  channel  and 
record  another  it  is  necessary  to  have  two  DTV  tuners—one  to  tune  the  channel 
being  watched  and  the  other  to  tune  the  channel  being  recorded.  Each  set-top  box 
can  tune  only  a  single  channel  and  thus  cannot  support  the  provision  of  separate 
tuned channels to a TV and VCR. 

In  order  to  watch  one  channel  and  record  another,  a  consumer  has  two  principle 
options.  One  option  is  to  use  two  separate  set-top  boxes,  with  one  connected  to  the 
VCR and the other to the TV set. 

The second option is for the consumer to use a set-top box connected to the analog 
VCR  and  a  new  TV  receiver  with  a  digital  tuner.  Information  on  use  of  VCRs  with 
digital-to-analog  set-top  converter  boxes  is  provided  by  the  National  Telecommuni-
cations and Information Administration, which manages the digital-to-analog set-top 
converter  box  program, 
frequently  asked  questions  at  https:// 
www.dtv2009.gov/FAQ.aspx. Information on how to connect set-top boxes, VCRs, TV 
receivers and other home entertainment devices is also on a website provided by the 
Consumer Electronics Association at http://www.ceaconnectionsguide.com. 

its 

in 

Question  3a.  What  percentage  of  households  in  the  country  will  need  a  new  roof-
top  antenna  in  order  to  receive  over-the-air  digital  broadcasts?  What  is  the  range 
of estimates? What is the basis of the estimates? 

Answer.  Our  engineers  estimate  that  approximately  5  percent  of  households  that 
are  currently  watching  a  poor  or  snowy  analog  picture  may  fall  on  the  down  side 
of  the  digital  cliff-affect  and  will  need  to  obtain  a  new  antenna  to  obtain  service. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

Approximately  85  percent  of  households  are  receiving  their  signals  by  cable  or  sat-
ellite  and  will  not  be  affected.  Therefore,  it  is  only  5  percent  of  the  remaining  15 
percent of households that are viewing signals over-the-air that may need a new an-
tenna.  We  have  published  a  consumer  guide  on  TV  antennas  that  explains  to  con-
sumers  they  should  first  try  their  existing  antenna,  what  to  do  if  they  have  prob-
lems, and information on how to obtain a new antenna should they need one. 

Question  3b.  What  information  is  your  agency  providing  to  consumers  on  this 

Answer.  The  Commission  has  posted  a  Fact  Sheet  with  information  on  antennas, 
factors  needed  for  good  quality  reception  of  digital  broadcasts,  and  tips  on  how  to 
get the best reception with an antenna on its website at http://www.dtv.gov/publi-
cations.html. We have also included information on use of antennas for reception of 
DTV service in the presentations and programs on DTV education that our staff pro-
vides to the public at events across the country. 

Question  3c.  Are  there  any  tools  available  to  give  consumers  an  idea  if  they  may 

issue? 

need a new outdoor antenna? 

Answer.  The  Consumer  Electronics  Association,  in  conjunction  with  the  National 
Association of Broadcasters, has established a website that provides a software ‘‘an-
tenna  tool’’  for  consumers  to  use  to  determine  the  appropriate  antenna  needed  to 
receive digital television channels at their individual location. The AntennaWeb tool 
considers  DTV  signal  strengths  and  geographical  maps  and  makes  a  recommenda-
tion 
is  available  at 
www.antennaweb.org. 

for  appropriate  outdoor  antennas.  This  antenna  tool 

Question  3d.  How  sensitive  are  rooftop  and  rabbit  ear  antennas  with  respect  to 
direction  of  the  incoming  digital  signal  when  compared  to  incoming  analog  signals? 
Will  some  homeowners  with  rooftop  antennas  have  to  readjust  the  orientation  of 
their antenna to receive a signal? 

Answer. The directionality of an antenna is determined by its physical character-
istics and is not affected by the modulation of the radio signals that it may receive. 
That  is,  antennas  perform  the  same  with  respect  to  directionality  for  both  analog 
and digital signals. 

Question  4.  Should  there  be  a  DTV  hard  date  for  all  television  broadcasts?  If  so, 
when  should  that  be?  What  actions  would  the  FCC  have  to  take  and  complete  in 
order for the DTV hard date for low-power stations to occur with minimal disruption 
to consumers? 

Answer. The February 17, 2009, DTV transition ‘‘hard date’’ for full-power TV sta-
tions  does  not  apply  to  low-power  television  stations,  television  translator  stations 
and Class A television stations (collectively ‘‘LPTV stations’’). 

I  have  circulated  an  item  for  the  Commission’s  consideration  which  seeks  com-
ment  on  whether  the  analog  transmissions  of  LPTV  stations  should  be  terminated 
in  2012.  The  proposed  rulemaking  also  requests  public  comment  concerning  how 
best to minimize any consumer disruption related to the LPTV transition, including 
ensuring that all stations in the LPTV services have the channels necessary to con-
vert to digital and that procedures are developed to ensure a smooth digital transi-
tion for these stations. 

In  the  interim,  the  Commission  is  taking  steps  to  help  inform  and  facilitate  the 
dissemination  of  information  to  consumers  in  LPTV  communities  about  the  DTV 
transition  and  the  effect  of  the  transition  on  LPTV  service.  On  February  19,  2008, 
the  Commission  adopted  a  DTV  Consumer  Education  Initiative  Report  and  Order 
which,  among  other  things,  encourages  all  LPTV  broadcasters,  particularly  those 
that plan to continue analog-only broadcasting, to begin educating their viewers im-
mediately  about  the  effect  of  the  DTV  transition  on  LPTV  service.  For  instance, 
LPTV  stations  should  notify  their  viewers  that:  (1)  they  are  watching  a  low-power 
broadcast station that, unlike full-power stations, may continue to offer analog serv-
ice  after  February  17,  2009,  and  (2)  viewers  who  plan  to  purchase  a  converter  box 
in order to view digital signals should select a model with analog pass-through capa-
bility in order to continue watching that station. The LPTV station also could direct 
viewers to the NTIA converter box coupon program, and in particular the NTIA list-
ing of certified converter boxes. Finally, the Order urges the industry and the Com-
mission’s  private  and  public  sector  partners  to  do  what  they  can  to  educate  con-
sumers  generally  about  LPTV  issues,  and  to  assist  in  the  effort  to  ensure  that  no 
American loses a signal due to the DTV transition. 

The Commission also has compiled lists of all low power, Class A, and translator 
stations which we have shared with the parties involved in the low-power issue, in-
cluding  the  Community  Broadcasters  Association  (CBA)  and  National  Translator 
Association (NTA), as well as the Consumer Electronics Retailers Coalition (CERC), 
CEA,  and  NAB.  In  addition,  we  developed  a  list  of  those  communities  that  appear 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

to  be  served  exclusively  by  low  power,  Class  A,  and/or  translators,  and  shared  this 
list  as  well  with  the  interested  parties.  We  have  been  coordinating  with  these 
groups to see how they are using this information, particularly with respect to con-
sumer education and outreach. Additionally, the public can utilize a new web-based 
search tool to easily search for low-power stations in their area by simply inserting 
a zip code. The search tool is available at: http://fjallfoss.fcc.gov/eb/zipsrch/. 

Last fall, the Commission also issued a Consumer Advisory on ‘‘The DTV Transi-
tion  and  LPTV/Class  A/Translator  Stations.’’  The  Advisory  explains  the  status  of 
LPTV, Class A, and translator stations, and provides background information on the 
stations  and  on  ways  to  determine  whether  a  viewer  is  watching  one  of  them.  The 
Commission  recently  updated  this  Consumer  Advisory  to  explain  digital-to-analog 
converter  boxes  with  analog  pass-through  capability  and  the  availability  of  analog 
pass-through  boxes  that  have  been  certified  by  NTIA’s  DTV  Coupon  Program.  The 
Consumer  Advisory  is  available  on  the  Commission’s  website  (http://www.fcc.gov/ 
cgb/consumerfacts/DTVandLPTV.html).  This  information  also  is  posted  in  the  Fre-
quently  Asked  Questions  section  of  our  www.dtv.gov  website  (http://www.dtv.gov/ 
consumercorner.html#faq22). 

Finally, on February 12, 2008, I sent a letter to the National Association of Broad-
casters,  the  National  Cable  &  Telecommunications  Association,  the  Satellite  Indus-
try  Association,  the  Consumers  Electronics  Association,  and  the  Consumer  Elec-
tronics  Retailers  Coalition  concerning  the  DTV  transition  and  low-power  television 
stations. In the letter, I requested that manufacturers of consumer electronic equip-
ment incorporate analog pass-through capability in digital-to-analog converter boxes 
and requested that retailers make analog pass-through boxes available to the public. 
The  letter  also  encouraged  the  carriage  of  low-power  stations  on  cable  and  satellite 
television systems on a voluntarily basis, and asked full-power broadcasters to make 
a  portion  of  their  stations’  digital  capacity  available  for  the  use  of  low-power  sta-
tions. 

Question 5. What do you see as the role of the Federal Communications Commis-
sion  compared  to  that  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  with  respect  to  consumer 
protection issues surrounding the DTV transition? 

Answer.  As  the  independent  agency  with  primary  responsibility  for  the  digital 
transition,  the  FCC  has  special  responsibility  to  ensure  a  successful  transition  to 
digital  television  by  February  17,  2009.  As  many  consumers  consider  new  equip-
ment  to  realize  the  full  technological  benefits  of  the  digital  transition,  the  FCC’s 
consumer  protection  efforts  have  focused  on  ensuring  that  those  consumers  do  not 
unknowingly  purchase  equipment  without  elements  important  to  the  digital  transi-
tion. For example, the FCC has taken numerous enforcement actions against manu-
facturers  for  the  importation  or  interstate  shipment  of  televisions  without  digital 
tuners or V-chip technology. The FCC also recently took action against retailers that 
failed  to  properly  disclose  that  certain  televisions  receivers  offered  for  sale  lacked 
the  ability  to  receive  over-the-air  digital  television  signals  and  adopted  a  consumer 
education order that requires broadcasters, manufacturers, and others to inform the 
public  about  the  digital  transition.  Finally,  the  FCC  has  held  numerous  consumer 
awareness sessions across the country to make sure that consumers know about the 
transition and understand their options. 

The  FCC  and  the  FTC  have  often  accommodated  the  missions  of  each  other  in 
areas  of  shared  interest.  The  FTC  has  a  part  to  play  here  in  protecting  consumers 
from fraudulent or deceptive practices related to the digital transition. For example, 
the FTC’s broad jurisdiction may allow that agency to take appropriate action if any 
retailers  participating  in  the  NTIA’s  converter  box  coupon  program  engage  in  ‘‘bait 
and  switch’’  tactics,  for  example,  by  encouraging  consumers  to  buy  digital  TVs  in-
stead of utilizing their coupons. 

Question  6.  My  constituents  living  in  Bellingham,  Washington  and  other  border 
communities  receive  over-the-air  broadcasts  from  Canada.  Cable  and  satellite  sub-
scribers in Bellingham receive programming from the Seattle market. They hear the 
PSAs  telling  them  what  they  need  to  do  to  prepare  for  the  DTV  hard  date.  There 
are  a  number  of  these  subscribers  that  have  a  second  television  that  receives  over- 
the-air  broadcasts  from  Canadian  stations  in  Vancouver  and  Victoria,  British  Co-
lumbia.  As  you  can  imagine,  this  sometimes  leads  to  confusion  as  the  Canadian 
DTV transition is not slated until August 2011. Are all Canadian full-power stations 
within the border region broadcasting currently in both analog and digital formats? 
Are changes required to our existing treaty with Canada due to the DTV transition, 
and if so, what are they and what is the status of the treaty modifications? 

Answer.  At  this  time,  very  few  Canadian  television  broadcast  stations  transmit 
both  an  analog  and  a  digital  signal.  It  appears  unlikely  that  any  Canadian  station 
will  cease  analog  broadcasting  prior  to  their  August  31,  2011  required  transition 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

date.  Consequently,  viewers  in  the  U.S.-Canada  border  areas  should  continue  to 
have  access  to  analog  programming  from  Canadian  stations  during  Canada’s  DTV 
transition period. 

The  United  States  has  bilateral  mechanisms  with  Canada  governing  the  deploy-
ment  of  DTV  stations  in  the  border  areas.  These  procedures,  however,  will  need  to 
be  revised  to  accommodate  the  final  configuration  of  DTV  stations  in  the  United 
States  after  the  completion  of  the  DTV  transition  in  February  2009.  The  United 
States and Canada have been engaged in discussions concerning the DTV transition 
for  the  past  few  years,  and  recently  reached  an  agreement  to  develop  a  DTV  plan 
and  an  associated  agreement  to  facilitate  changes  to  that  plan  on  a  going  forward 
basis. It is anticipated that a DTV plan between the United States and Canada will 
be  completed  this  summer.  Once  agreement  is  reached  on  the  DTV  plan,  U.S.  sta-
tions  in  the  border  areas  will  be  entitled  to  operate  in  accordance  with  that  plan 
and Commission rules. The associated formal DTV agreement will not be concluded 
until after Canada’s DTV transition occurs. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question  1.  The  rules  for  coupon  eligible  converter  boxes  require  manufacturers 
to self certify compliance with NTIA’s technical specifications and to submit the test 
results  and  samples  of  tested  equipment  to  the  FCC  for  verification.  Does  the  FCC 
test each piece of equipment provided to it through this process across all channels, 
or are the tests limited to a small number of sample channels? 

Answer.  The  NTIA  is  responsible  for  all  aspects  of  the  coupon  eligible  converter 
box program, including establishment of the technical standards and process for en-
suring  compliance.  The  NTIA  requires  submittal  of  a  written  application  and  test 
results  showing  compliance  with  its  standards.  The  NTIA  and  the  FCC  have  a 
Memorandum  of  Understanding  under  which  the  FCC  tests  converter  boxes  upon 
request  from  NTIA.  As  the  lead  agency  in  this  matter,  the  NTIA  determines  which 
boxes need to be tested and the scope of the tests. NTIA requires the boxes to com-
ply  with  its  standards  on  all  TV  channels  but  may  ask  the  FCC  to  test  only  some 
channels.  NTIA  has  not  made  public  what  channels  may  be  tested  by  the  FCC  in 
order  to  mitigate  the  possibility  that  manufacturers  would  design  for  compliance 
only on the channels selected for the tests. 

Question  2.  If  the  answer  to  Question  1  is  that  the  FCC  tests  only  on  a  limited 
number  of  channels,  why  does  the  FCC  not  test  across  all  channels  to  test  for  pos-
sible  adjacent  channel  interference  that  could  prevent  reception  of  all  digital  chan-
nels? 

Answer.  The  boxes  are  tested  on  certain  channels  based  on  guidance  from  NTIA. 
The channels that are selected are designed to detect potential non-compliance and 
additional channels may be tested as appropriate. 

Question 3. Does the FCC do any post approval testing of production model boxes 

sold directly to consumers? 

Answer. The FCC does not independently conduct any post approval sampling and 
testing  of  NTIA  approved  converter  boxes.  The  FCC  will  test  any  NTIA-approved 
model  including  post-approval,  that  NTIA  asks  us  to  examine.  Indeed,  the  agree-
ment between the agencies expressly allows the NTIA to request post-approval test-
ing of any converter box for compliance with the NTIA rules. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question  1.  It  is  now  10  months  before  the  DTV  transition.  However,  recent  re-
ports  from  the  NTIA  suggest  that  46  percent  of  the  base  funds  for  converter  box 
coupons have already been requested. At the current rate of request, when will the 
NTIA  run  out  of  coupons?  Do  you  believe  more  coupons  will  be  necessary  to  meet 
consumer demand? 

Answer. Coupons are being requested at a rate of approximately 105,000 per day, 
on  average.  The  availability  of  funds  for  coupons  is  determined  by  two  main  fac-
tors—demand for coupons and redemptions. NTIA does not have a view toward how 
many consumers might want to redeem coupons toward the purchase of converters, 
and  therefore  cannot  predict  the  availability  of  funding  for  coupons  at  this  time. 
Many consumers may choose to purchase digital televisions or subscribe to pay serv-
ices in order to adjust to the digital transition. Assuming a 100 percent redemption 
rate  of  the  coupons  requested,  which  we  think  is  unlikely,  and  using  current  appli-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

cations  rates  of  approximately  105,000  coupons  per  day,  NTIA  estimates  it  will 
reach the limit on issuance of coupons using initial funds on August 6, 2008. Assum-
ing a 50 percent redemption rate, which we think is more likely, and using current 
application rates of approximately 105,000 per day, NTIA estimates it will reach the 
limit  of  coupons  using  the  initial  funds  on  March  26,  2009.  Under  this  scenario, 
most  of  the  contingent  funds  would  be  returned  to  the  Treasury.  NTIA  is  tracking 
coupon  request  and  redemption  information  closely  and  will  update  the  Congress, 
retailers and manufacturers, and our consumer education partners regularly. 

Based  on  the  information  currently  available  and  in  order  to  avoid  potential  pro-
gram delays, on April 25, 2008, NTIA submitted a statement, as required by Section 
3005(c)(3)  of  the  Act  to  release  the  remaining  $510  million  in  appropriated  funds, 
certifying  our  anticipation  that  the  initial  funds  of  $990  million  will  be  insufficient 
to  fulfill  the  requests  for  coupons  from  eligible  households,  specifically  with  respect 
to administrative resources. Program changes contemplated in the recently released 
NPRM  would  require  the  use  of  some  of  the  administrative  funds  from  the  contin-
gent pool. 

Question  2.  On  March  15,  The  Garden  Island,  the  newspaper  on  Kauai,  printed 
an article entitled ‘‘Kauai Not Affected by ‘09 Analog TV Deadline.’’ According to the 
newspaper, Kauai residents are served exclusively by low-power broadcasting facili-
ties. What is the NTIA doing to prevent residents on Kauai from being confused by 
national  messages  about  the  transition  telling  consumers  to  make  changes  to  their 
televisions to prepare for digital reception? 

Answer. The broadcast community is leading in educating their viewers about the 
digital  television  transition.  Recently,  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters 
(NAB) announced an effort to target messages regarding low-power broadcasting in 
markets  with  at  least  ten  translators,  including  Hawaii.  The  purpose  of  these  cam-
paigns  is  to  ensure  that  consumers  in  these  markets  will  hear  messages  more  ger-
mane  to  their  circumstances.  In  addition  NTIA  is  working  with  the  NAB  and  the 
Consumer  Electronics  Retailers  Coalition  (CERC)  to  share  retailer  data  by  market, 
so that our industry partners can increase the likelihood that analog ‘‘pass through’’ 
converter  boxes  will  be  available  and  will  be  advertised  by  broadcasters  and  retail-
ers alike. 

Question  3.  I  believe  the  DTV  transition  requires  that  we  have  ‘‘block  captains’’ 
in  communities  across  this  country.  We  need  troops  on  the  ground  to  get  the  word 
out  and  assist  consumers  with  preparing  for  the  transition.  What  efforts  have  the 
NTIA  made  to  coordinate  and  put  DTV  block  captains  and  authorities  in  place 
through the Corporation for National and Community Service? Would it be possible 
to use organizations like Americorps and Seniorcorps to assist with the DTV transi-
tion in the communities where they serve? 

Answer.  NTIA  is  coordinating  with  the  Corporation  for  National  and  Community 
Service  to  provide  Coupon  Program  information  to  its  Corporation  State  Offices. 
State  Office  employees  have  oversight  for  SeniorCorps  and  AmeriCorps  VISTA 
projects.  CNS’  Office  of  Human  Capital  is  including  an  article  on  the  Coupon  Pro-
gram in its monthly publication, update, which is sent to all CNS employees. NTIA 
has  also  sent  information  packets  to  all  State  Service  Commissions  of  the  Corpora-
tion  for  National  and  Community  Service.  We  are  coordinating  with  CNS’  Office  of 
Human  Capital  and  will  be  happy  to  explore  with  them,  at  the  next  opportunity, 
your  very  interesting  idea  to  mobilize  block  captains  to  prepare  consumers  for  the 
digital transition. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question  1.  On  February  11,  2008,  I  sent  you  a  letter  expressing  concern  that 
some  senior  citizens  may  be  excluded  from  the  converter  box  program  because 
NTIA’s current rules appear to define nursing homes as a single ‘‘household.’’ Under 
that  definition,  an  entire  nursing  home  complex  would  be  eligible  for  only  two  con-
verter  box  coupons—even  though  there  might  be  50–60  residents  with  old  analog 
televisions  at  that  location.  It  is  my  understanding  that  NTIA  staff  is  currently 
working on a ‘‘fix’’ for this problem—and I appreciate your efforts on this. However, 
we  have  also  been  told  that  it  may  take  up  to  6  months  for  the  fix  to  be  imple-
mented  through  a  rulemaking  process.  Is  there  any  way  you  can  speed  the  process 
up?  Have  you  asked  OMB  for  expedited  approval  of  the  rulemaking?  In  the  alter-
native,  have  you  considered  an  expedited  waiver  process  for  nursing  home  applica-
tions? 

Answer. NTIA published a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking in the Federal Register 
on  April  24,  2008,  proposing  certain  changes  to  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

gram  (Program)  rules,  such  as  waiving  the  ‘‘eligible  household’’  application  require-
ments for individuals residing in nursing homes or other senior care facilities. Com-
ments  must  be  submitted  no  later  than  June  9,  2008.  Details  are  available  at: 
http://www.ntia.doc.gov/ntiahome/frnotices/2008/DTVlNPRMl080424.pdf. 
NTIA  provided  a  relatively  short  (45-day)  comment  period  and  will  expedite  the 
rulemaking to the extent it is able. 

Question  2.  When  a  consumer  calls  the  DTV  coupon  request  number  and  says 
they need physical assistance to connect the DTV converter box, where do you refer 
them?  Also,  has  any  effort  been  made  to  coordinate  a  national  assistance  program 
with interested organizations—such as AARP? 

Answer.  NTIA  is  working  with  its  partners  to  mitigate  difficulties  some  con-
sumers  may  have  in  installing  the  converter  boxes.  NTIA  has  information  on  its 
website about installation and trusts that most consumers will be able to install the 
converter  box  using  the  instructions  provided  by  the  manufacturer.  If  consumers 
have specific questions, they should ask the retailer from which they purchased the 
converter  box  or  call  the  manufacturer’s  technical  support  hotline.  NTIA  has  also 
worked  with  the  Consumer  Electronics  Association  to  produce  a  generic  ‘‘Quick 
Start  Guide’’  and 
installation  video,  both  of  which  are  available  at 
www.DigitalTips.org. 

NTIA has also teamed up with Collegiate 4-H which selected the digital TV tran-
sition  as  its  2008  National  Service  Project  topic.  Each  Collegiate  4-H  chapter  will 
do  at  least  one  DTV  project  in  2008,  based  on  lesson-plan  materials  developed  by 
NTIA.  A  project  could  include  helping  individuals  most  at  risk  of  losing  television 
reception  fill  out  coupon  applications  or  install  their  converter  boxes.  Additionally, 
NTIA  is  working  with  its  partner,  the  Family,  Career  and  Community  Leaders  of 
America  (FCCLA),  to  educate  local  communities  about  the  DTV  transition  through 
FCCLA’s  ‘‘Keep  Your  TV  On’’  Award.  This  program,  which  began  in  January  and 
continues  through  May  2008,  recognizes  and  rewards  FCCLA  Chapters  that  have 
excelled in planning and implementing a local DTV public awareness campaign. We 
are also in constant dialogue with AARP and would be happy to assist them in any 
way appropriate to ensure their efforts to assist seniors are successful. 

Question  3.  Your  testimony  noted  that  over  1,100  retailers  signed  up  to  partici-
pate  in  the  converter  box  coupon  program  by  NTIA’s  March  31,  2008,  deadline.  In 
some  areas,  however,  consumers  have  few  retail  choices—and  may  not  be  able  to 
purchase  a  box  by  the  end  of  the  coupon’s  90-day  deadline  if  those  retailers  do  not 
have  stocks  of  converter  boxes  on  hand.  Does  NTIA  have  a  contingency  plan  if  the 
number of retailers in an area is not sufficient to meet demand? 

Answer.  NTIA  is  very  pleased  with  the  number  of  retailers  that  are  voluntarily 
participating  in  the  Program.  There  are  over  1,600  retail  organizations  with  over 
16,000  stores,  as  well  as  22  virtual  retailers  participating  (7  by  telephone,  15  with 
an  online  presence).  We  require  retailers  to  stock  and  manage  inventory  according 
to  commercially  reasonable  methods.  NTIA  is  not  aware  of  any  geographic  area 
where there is an insufficient number of retailers to meet demand. 

Question  4.  In  your  testimony,  you  note  that—as  of  April  7—5.2  million  house-
holds  have  requested  DTV  converter  box  coupons.  Do  you  have  any  information  on 
the demographic breakdown of these requests? Furthermore, is NTIA looking at de-
mographic  information  to  ensure  that  traditionally  hard-to-reach  populations  are 
taking advantage of the converter box coupon program? It is now 10 months before 
the DTV transition. However, recent reports from the NTIA suggest that 46 percent 
of the base funds for converter box coupons have already been requested. At the cur-
rent  rate  of  request,  when  will  the  NTIA  run  out  of  coupons?  Do  you  believe  more 
coupons will be necessary to meet consumer demand? 

Answer.  Because  NTIA  does  not  collect  consumer  information  beyond  their  home 
address,  it  is  not  feasible  to  ascertain  detailed  demographic  breakdowns  from  the 
data  on  hand.  We  are  monitoring  the  markets  that  are  disproportionately  over-the- 
air  reliant  to  determine  whether  anomalies  in  coupon  requests  may  require  special 
consumer outreach. 

Coupons are being requested at a rate of approximately 105,000 per day, on aver-
age.  The  availability  of  funds  for  coupons  is  determined  by  two  main  factors—de-
mand  for  coupons  and  redemptions.  NTIA  does  not  have  a  view  toward  how  many 
consumers  might  want  to  redeem  coupons  toward  the  purchase  of  converters,  and 
therefore  cannot  predict  the  availability  of  funding  for  coupons  at  this  time.  Many 
consumers  may  choose  to  purchase  digital  televisions  or  subscribe  to  pay  services 
in order to adjust to the digital transition. Assuming a 100 percent redemption rate 
of the coupons requested, which we think is unlikely, and using current applications 
rates  of  approximately  105,000  coupons  per  day,  NTIA  estimates  it  will  reach  the 
limit  on  issuance  of  coupons  using  initial  funds  on  August  6,  2008.  Assuming  a  50 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

percent  redemption  rate,  which  we  think  is  more  likely,  and  using  current  applica-
tion  rates  of  approximately  105,000  per  day,  NTIA  estimates  it  will  reach  the  limit 
of  coupons  using  the  initial  funds  on  March  26,  2009.  Under  this  scenario,  most  of 
the  contingent  funds  would  be  returned  to  the  Treasury.  NTIA  is  tracking  coupon 
request  and  redemption  information  closely  and  will  update  the  Congress,  retailers 
and manufacturers, and our consumer education partners regularly. 

Based  on  the  information  currently  available  and  in  order  to  avoid  potential  pro-
gram delays, on April 25, 2008, NTIA submitted a statement, as required by Section 
3005(c)(3)  of  the  Deficit  Reduction  Act  (the  Act)  to  release  the  remaining  $510  mil-
lion in appropriated funds, certifying our anticipation that the initial funds of $990 
million  will  be  insufficient  to  fulfill  the  requests  for  coupons  from  eligible  house-
holds,  specifically  with  respect  to  administrative  resources.  Program  changes  con-
templated  in  the  recently  released  NPRM  would  require  the  use  of  some  of  the  ad-
ministrative funds from the contingent pool. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question 1. Looking ahead over the next 10 months till the DTV hard date, what 
do you consider to be the highest risk factor with respect to U.S. consumers getting 
through the DTV transition with minimal interruption? 

Answer.  NTIA  clearly  wants  to  reduce  to  the  smallest  number  possible  those 
households not taking action to keep their televisions working on or before February 
17,  2009.  Because  television  is  a  primary  means  of  receiving  information,  it  is  crit-
ical  we  monitor  data  closely  to  make  any  program  adjustments  required  to  assist 
vulnerable  Americans.  For  example,  NTIA  is  monitoring  consumer  awareness  sur-
veys closely and is adjusting its consumer education strategy to maximize the oppor-
tunity that hard-to-serve consumers will be made aware of the digital transition and 
the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program  (Program).  We  are  also  analyzing  request 
and redemption data at the DMA level to determine what markets may require spe-
cial  outreach  due  to  low  request  and/or  redemption  numbers.  We  are  also  sharing 
this information with our retail and manufacturer partners so they can make supply 
chain  adjustments  possible  to  meet  converter  box  demand.  As  the  analog  shutoff 
date  approaches,  we  will  be  intensifying  our  messages,  in  partnership  with  the 
broadcast  community,  to  alert  over-the-air  consumers  to  the  need  to  take  action  so 
they do not lose their television service. 

Question  2.  A  consumer  receiving  over-the-air  television  broadcasts  records  pro-
grams  for  their  personal  use  on  a  VCR  model  that  has  a  built  in  tuner,  allowing 
the  viewer  to  watch  one  channel  while  recording  another.  If  this  consumer  pur-
chases  the  set-top  box  for  that  television,  will  the  consumer  still  be  able  to  record 
programming from one channel while watching programming from a different chan-
nel with the provided equipment? If not, what options does that consumer have and 
how would they become aware of them? 

Answer.  The  Consumer  Electronics  Association  has  an  excellent  website— 
DigitalTips.org—that  shows  consumers  how  to  install  a  converter  box,  including 
adding  a  VCR  or  DVD  recorder  to  the  set  up.  This  is  shown  visually,  through  a 
video,  and  on  paper,  through  a  ‘‘Quick  Start  Guide,’’  that  provides  step-by-step  in-
structions to consumers. NTIA provides a link to this installation information on our 
DTV2009.gov  website.  Unfortunately,  a  consumer  cannot  connect  a  VCR  to  a  con-
verter box and watch one channel while recording another. A consumer should con-
sult  with  a  consumer  electronics  retailer  associate  to  find  out  what  options  are 
available to watch and record separate channels. 

Question 3. What percentage of households in the country will need a new rooftop 
antenna in order to receive over-the-air digital broadcasts? What is the range of es-
timates?  What  is  the  basis  of  the  estimates?  What  information  is  your  agency  pro-
viding  to  consumers  on  this  issue?  Are  there  any  tools  available  to  give  consumers 
an  idea  if  they  may  need  a  new  outdoor  antenna?  How  sensitive  are  rooftop  and 
rabbit  ear  antennas  with  respect  to  direction  of  the  incoming  digital  signal  when 
compared to incoming analog signals? Will some homeowners with rooftop antennas 
have to readjust the orientation of their antenna to receive a signal? 

Answer. Federal Communications Commission (FCC) Chairman Martin has stated 
that approximately 5 percent of viewers located at the outer reaches of a broadcast 
station’s  coverage  area  may  need  a  new  antenna.  NTIA  has  no  independent  basis 
on  which  to  base  any  estimates  of  antenna  performance.  We  refer  consumers  to 
www.antennaweb.org,  which  is  a  very  robust  website  provided  by  the  Consumer 
Electronics  Association  and  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters  to  help  con-
sumers optimize their over-the-air broadcast reception. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

Question  4.  My  understanding  is,  as  of  April  1st,  9.5  million  coupons  have  been 
requested  and  roughly  210,000  have  been  redeemed  for  set-top  boxes.  Does  NTIA 
have  a  mechanism  in  place  for  collecting  feedback  from  consumers  that  have  pur-
chased the set-top box? 

Answer.  On  a  monthly  basis,  our  Call  Center  handles  hundreds  of  thousands  of 
consumer  calls.  Mostly,  these  consumers  are  calling  to  order  coupons—but  we  do 
handle  consumer  questions  and  complaints  about  the  Coupon  Program.  Through 
this vehicle, NTIA is able to make appropriate adjustments to provide a better pro-
gram experience for consumers. 

Question  5.  Have  you  installed  a  DTV  set-top  converter  box  on  an  analog  tele-
vision?  Do  you  think  that  a  70  or  80  year  old  person  will  find  the  operation  of  the 
navigation menu intuitively obvious and easy to read? Consumers have lots of expe-
rience  tuning  in  a  strong  picture  with  analog  rabbit  ear  antenna  but  virtually  no 
experience with digital rabbit ear antennas. Rabbit ear antennas used for digital re-
ception  appear  much  more  sensitive  to  direction  and  small  movements  than  those 
used  for  analog  reception.  Additionally,  while  television  viewers  have  vast  experi-
ence tuning in an analog picture through a noisy background (‘snow’), the pixilation 
associated  with  loss  of  a  digital  signal  may  be  confusing.  Have  you  conducted  any 
focus  groups  with  seniors  on  the  installation  and  operation  of  the  set-top  boxes?  If 
so, what was the feedback? 

Answer. In fact, I have installed multiple TV converter boxes, and NTIA has set- 
up  TV-converter  box  displays  both  at  the  Department  of  Commerce  headquarters 
and on Capitol Hill. NTIA is working with its partners to mitigate difficulties some 
consumers  may  have  in  installing  the  converter  boxes.  If  consumers  have  specific 
questions, they should ask the retailer from whom they purchased the converter box 
or  call  the  manufacturer’s  technical  support  hotline.  As  discussed  above,  NTIA  has 
also worked with the Consumer Electronics Association to produce a generic ‘‘Quick 
Start  Guide’’  and 
installation  video,  both  of  which  are  available  at 
www.DigitalTips.org  and  linked  to  by  DTV2009.gov.  Additionally,  NTIA  worked 
with reporters from the Washington Post to tape an instructional video on converter 
box installation, which can be found on the Washingtonpost.com website. 

NTIA has also teamed up with Collegiate 4-H (one of the more than 200 partners 
with whom we are working) which has selected the digital TV transition as its 2008 
National Service Project topic. Each Collegiate 4-H chapter will do at least one DTV 
project  in  2008,  based  on  lesson-plan  materials  developed  by  NTIA.  A  project  could 
include  helping  individuals  most  at  risk  of  losing  television  reception,  such  as  sen-
iors,  to  fill  out  coupon  applications  or  to  install  their  converter  boxes.  Additionally, 
NTIA  is  working  with  its  partner,  the  Family,  Career  and  Community  Leaders  of 
America  (FCCLA),  to  educate  local  communities  about  the  DTV  transition  through 
FCCLA’s  ‘‘Keep  Your  TV  On’’  Award.  This  program,  which  began  in  January  and 
continues  through  May  2008,  recognizes  and  rewards  FCCLA  Chapters  that  have 
excelled in planning and implementing a local DTV public awareness campaign. We 
are  also  in  constant  dialogue  with  a  coalition  of  aging  organizations,  including 
AARP,  the  National  Association  of  Area  Agencies  on  Aging,  and  Meals  on  Wheels, 
who are exploring ways to assist our most vulnerable seniors with the Coupon Pro-
gram. 

Question 6. Significant areas of central and eastern Washington are served exclu-
sively  by  translator  stations.  These  are  places  like  Curlew,  Coulee  City,  Omak, 
Oroville, Tonasket, Wenatchee, and Twisp to name a few. We have heard about the 
need  for  a  set-top  box  that  converts  the  digital  signal  back  to  an  analog  one  and 
also  allows  the  analog  signal  to  pass  through  unblocked.  When  can  I  tell  my  con-
stituents  in  these  and  similar  communities  that  set-top  boxes  with  analog  pass 
through capability will be on their store shelves? As there are no inventory require-
ments,  how  do  we  ensure  that  there  are  sufficient  numbers  of  these  ‘‘analog  pass- 
through’’ boxes in the communities that require them? 

Answer. NTIA has certified 16 coupon-eligible converter models with analog pass- 

through function including: 
Alpha Digital AT2016 
APEX DT 250 
Digital Stream DSP7700T 
Digital Stream DX8700 
Digital Stream DTX9950 
DISH Network DTVPal 
EchoStar TR–40 
Insignia NS–DXA1–APT 

Jiuzhou DTT9001 
Magnavox TB–100MG9 
Philco TB150HH9 
Philco TB100HH9 
RCA DTA800B 1 
Tatung TDB3001 
Venturer STB7766G1 
Zenith DTT901 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Many  of  the  certified  pass-through  boxes  are  familiar  brands  sold  at  major  retail 
chains. In addition, analog pass-through boxes are being made available through on-
line and telephone participating retailers. It is not within the scope of the Program 
to track specific inventories at retail but more information would likely be available 
from these manufacturers. 

As I stated in testimony on April 8th, NTIA asked manufacturers early on to take 
into consideration the development of certified converter boxes with an analog pass- 
through  capability,  and  to  investigate  options  that  would  permit  them  to  do  so  in 
a  manner  that  minimizes  signal  loss.  On  February  5,  2008,  I  sent  a  letter  to  each 
of  the  prospective  converter  box  manufacturers  involved  in  the  certification  process 
to  once  again  encourage  them  to  consider  the  needs  of  all  viewers,  including  the 
viewers  of  Class  A,  low-power  television,  and  television  translator  stations,  in  the 
development of converter boxes for the Coupon Program. NTIA is working to ensure 
that  a  variety  of  analog  pass-through  boxes  are  available  to  consumers  who  need 
them  as  quickly  as  possible,  including  through  an  expedited  recertification  process 
for boxes re-designed to include this feature. 

Question 7. There is a 90-day expiration date on the coupons for the set-top boxes. 
I  can  imagine  situations,  particularly  in  rural  parts  of  my  state  where  consumers 
receive over-the-air television programming exclusively and require an analog pass- 
though  converter  box,  that  the  coupon  will  expire  before  the  unit  is  available  in 
stock  locally.  This  problem  could  be  exacerbated  given  there  are  no  retailer  inven-
tory  requirements.  If  a  consumer’s  coupon  expires  unused,  can  that  consumer  file 
again  for  a  coupon?  If  not,  what  is  the  rationale  for  preventing  a  consumer  from 
ordering and receiving another coupon? 

Answer. NTIA is sensitive to the concern that has been raised with regard to cou-
pon  reissuance,  and  plans  to  review  its  options  once  sufficient  redemption  data  is 
available. 

Question  8.  I  understand  consumers  living  in  nursing  homes,  assisted  living,  mo-
bile  parks,  group  homes,  and  Federal  housing  are  not  considered  to  have  valid  ad-
dresses for purposes of the coupon program, and are not eligible for the coupon pro-
gram.  I  commend  you  for  trying  to  fix  these  shortcomings  as  you  became  aware  of 
them.  I  would  like  to  focus  specifically  on  Native  Americans,  where  yet  additional 
changes may be required. As you are aware, many Native Americans live in Federal 
housing  on  reservations.  I  spoke  with  a  representative  from  the  National  Congress 
of American Indians and there appears to be confusion as to whether Native Ameri-
cans  meet  the  program’s  address  eligibility  criteria,  even  with  the  exception  in-
cluded in the final rule. 

The  rule  states  ‘‘residents  of  Indian  reservations,  Alaskan  Native  Villages  and 
other  rural  areas  without  home  postal  delivery  may  be  requested  to  supply  addi-
tional  information  to  identify  the  physical  location  of  the  household,  as  required.’’ 
What is the additional information required? What assurance can you give me that 
NTIA  will  ensure  that  individuals  living  on  Indian  reservations  who  need  the  con-
verter box will be eligible to obtain the converter box? 

Answer.  NTIA  crafted  its  Final  Rule  partly  in  response  to  concerns  from  Native 
Americans  on  reservations,  including  especially  Council  Tree,  who  depend  on  post 
office boxes to receive their mail. Section 301.3(a) expressly provides an opportunity 
for  residents  of  Indian  Reservations  to  use  a  post  office  box  in  the  case  where  the 
U.S.  Postal  Service  does  not  provide  home  mail  delivery.  As  stated  in  the  Final 
Rule, NTIA may ask these residents to supply additional information to identify the 
physical  location  of  the  household  (this  could  include  a  recently-issued  utility  bill, 
an  unexpired  homeowner’s  or  renter’s  insurance  policy,  or  other  proof  of  physical 
residence bearing the applicant’s name and physical address. 

Additionally, on April 25, 2008, NTIA issued a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking to 
waive  its  eligibility  requirements  with  respect  to  households  using  a  post  office  box 
who otherwise do receive U.S. Postal Service mail delivery, so long as the applicant 
provides proof of physical residence (such as those listed above). One of the desirable 
effects  of  this  rule  change  would  be  to  reduce  the  number  of  applications  being  de-
nied  due  to  the  use  of  post  office  boxes,  including  by  those  on  Indian  Reservations. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question 1. Prior to certifying individual converter boxes for eligibility in the cou-
pon  program,  does  NTIA  do  any  testing  of  the  boxes  for  potential  interference  con-
cerns? 

Answer.  Yes.  NTIA  has  entered  into  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  with  the 
Federal  Communications  Commission  (FCC)  under  which  the  FCC  Laboratory  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

ducts tests on sample converters including tests for potential interference concerns. 
For  example,  tests  relating  to  Co-Channel  Rejection,  First  Adjacent  Channel  Rejec-
tion, Taboo Channel Rejection, and Field Ensembles are conducted. 

Question 2. If the answer to Question 1 is no, does NTIA at least review test data 
and  the  FCC’s  verification  information  before  certifying  a  box  as  eligible  to  partici-
pate in the coupon program? 

Answer. In addition to testing boxes for potential interference concerns, NTIA re-
views  test  data  supplied  by  manufacturers.  For  your  information,  instructions  to 
manufacturers  were  issued  by  NTIA  in  May  2007  and  are  available  in  the  Public 
Notice  (available  at  http://www.ntia.doc.gov/ntiahome/frnotices/2007/DTVmanu 
facturerl053007.htm.) Items #2 and #3 provide guidance to manufacturers on test-
ing and how to report their test results. 

Question 3. Has NTIA done any post certification testing of converter boxes made 

available to consumers in retail locations as 47 CFR 301 permits? 

Answer.  Yes,  NTIA  plans  to  purchase  converters  at  retail  outlets  to  selectively 

test for continued compliance with NTIA’s technical specifications. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:52 Mar 17, 2009 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\44299.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

